<Sag-Wasow-Bender_2003>
*	We like us.
	We like ourselves.
	She likes herself.
	Nobody likes us.
*	Leslie likes ourselves.
*	Ourselves like us.
*	Ourselves like ourselves.
	She voted for her.
	She voted for herself.
	We voted for her.
*	We voted for herself.
*	We gave us presents.
	We gave ourselves presents.
*	We gave presents to us.
	We gave presents to ourselves.
*	We gave us to the cause.
	We gave ourselves to the cause.
*	Leslie told us about us.
	Leslie told us about ourselves.
*	Leslie told ourselves about us.
*	Leslie told ourselves about ourselves.
	We think that Leslie likes us.
*	We think that Leslie likes ourselves.
	Our friends like us.
*	Our friends like ourselves.
	Those pictures of us offended us.
*	Those pictures of us offended ourselves.
	We found your letter to us in the trash.
*	We found your letter to ourselves in the trash.
	Vote for us!
*	Vote for ourselves!
*	Vote for you!
	Vote for yourself!
@	We appealed to them to vote for them.
	We appealed to them to vote for themselves.
	We appealed to them to vote for us.
	We appeared to them to vote for them.
*	We appeared to them to vote for themselves.
	We appeared to them to vote for ourselves.
	We wrapped the blankets around us.
	We wrapped the blankets around ourselves.
	We admired the pictures of us in the album.
	We admired the pictures of ourselves in the album.
	Leslie used a pen.
	We put the pigs in a pen.
	We need to pen the pigs to keep them from getting into the corn.
	They should pen the letter quickly.
	The judge sent them to the pen for a decade.
	The cheetah will run down the hill.
	The president will run.
	The car won’t run.
	This trail should run over the hill.
	This dye will run.
	This room will run $200 or more.
	She can run an accelerator.
	They will run the risk.
	These stockings will run.
	There is a run in that stocking.
	We need another run to win.
	Fats won with a run of 20.
	Lee saw the student with a telescope.
	I forgot how good beer tastes.
	Visiting relatives can be boring.
	If only Superman would stop flying planes!
	That’s a new car dealership.
	I know you like the back of my hand.
	An earthquake in Romania moved buildings as far away as Moscow and Rome.
	The German shepherd turned on its master.
	I saw that gas can explode.
	Max is on the phone now.
	The only thing capable of consuming this food has four legs and flies.
	I saw her duck.
	I’m creating a committee. Kim – you’re in charge.
	Lights go out at ten. There will be no talking afterwards.
	They found the book on the table.
	They found the book on the atom.
	Which witnesses testified against defendants who incriminated them?
	Which witnesses testified against defendants who incriminated themselves?
	List all witnesses for the defendant who represented himself.
	List all witnesses for the defendant who represented themselves.
	List associates of each witness who speaks Spanish.
	List associates of each witness who speak Spanish.
*	We persuaded there to be several students at the talk.
*	They lost themselves’ books.
*	Sentences some go on and on.
	Some sentences go on and on and on.
*	Sentences some go on and on and on and on.
	Some sentences go on and on and on and on and on.
	That surprised me.
*	I noticed the .
	They were interested in his .
	This is my favorite .
	A large dog chased a small cat.
	A dog with brown spots chased a cat with no tail.
	Some people yell at the noisy dogs in my neighborhood.
	Some people yell at noisy dogs in my neighborhood.
	Some people yell at the dogs in my neighborhood.
	Some people yell at the noisy dogs.
	Some people yell at the dogs.
	Some people yell at noisy dogs.
	Some people yell at dogs in my neighborhood.
	Some people yell at dogs.
	Some people consider the noisy dogs in my neighborhood dangerous.
	Some people consider the noisy dogs dangerous.
	Some people consider the dogs in my neighborhood dangerous.
	Some people consider noisy dogs in my neighborhood dangerous.
	Some people consider the dogs dangerous.
	Some people consider noisy dogs dangerous.
	Some people consider dogs in my neighborhood dangerous.
	Some people consider dogs dangerous.
	We enjoyed the movie with Cher.
	The room was filled with noisy children and animals.
	People with children who use drugs should be locked up.
	I saw the astronomer with a telescope.
	The fool yelled at noon.
	This disease gave Leslie a fever in Rome.
	A tourist in Rome laughed.
	The love of my life and mother of my children would never do such a thing.
	The museum displayed no painting by Miro or drawing by Klee.
	Most elections are quickly forgotten, but the election of 2000, everyone will remember for a long time
	You asked me to fix the drain, and fix the drain, I shall.
	In the morning, they drink tea.
	It was a book about syntax that she was reading.
	It is study for the exam that I urgently need to do.
	It is after lunch that they always fall asleep.
*	Many artists were represented, but painting by Klee or drawing by Miro the museum displayed no.
*	It is painting by Klee or drawing by Miro that the museum displays no.
	The defendant denied the accusation.
	The problem disappeared.
*	The defendant denied.
*	The teacher disappeared the problem.
	The teacher handed the student a book.
*	The teacher handed the student.
*	The teacher handed a book.
*	The teacher handed.
	The bird sings.
	Birds sing.
*	The bird sing.
*	Birds sings.
	The bird devours the worm.
	The birds devour the worm.
*	The bird devour the worm.
*	The birds devours the worm.
	The bird gives the worm a tug.
	The birds give the worm a tug.
*	The bird give the worm a tug.
*	The birds gives the worm a tug.
	Terry wallowed in self-pity.
*	Terry wallowed.
*	Terry wallowed the self-pity.
	Kerry remarked (that) it was late.
*	Kerry remarked.
*	Kerry remarked the time.
	Provide examples showing that the verbs wallow and remark exhibit the same
	What additional categories and rules would be required to handle these verbs?
	Everyone loves puppies.
	Puppies are loved by everyone.
	We created a monster.
	I have the information.
	I have information.
	I was already aware of that fact.
*	I was already aware of fact.
	I know you.
*	I know the you.
	The defendant denies the allegation.
*	The defendant deny the allegation.
	The defendants deny the allegation.
*	The defendants denies the allegation.
	The defendant walks.
*	The defendant walk.
	The defendants walk.
*	The defendants walks.
	How many feature structure categories can label the mother node?
	How many feature structures categories can label the first daughter?
	How many feature structures categories can label the second daughter?
	Pat relies on Kim.
*	Pat relies.
	The child put the toy on the table.
*	The child put the toy.
	The teacher became angry with the students.
*	The teacher became.
	The jury believed the witness lied.
	The guests devoured the meal.
*	The guests devoured.
*	The guests dined the meal.
	The guests dined.
	The guests ate the meal.
	The guests ate.
	We relied on Leslie.
	We relied upon Leslie.
*	We relied over Leslie.
*	We relied with Leslie.
*	We relied on top of Leslie.
*	We relied above Leslie.
	We celebrated in the streets.
	We celebrated in the streets in the rain on Tuesday in the morning.
	The children are happy.
	The children are happy with the ice cream.
	The children are happy that they have ice cream.
*	The children are happy of ice cream.
*	The children are fond.
*	The children are fond with the ice cream.
*	The children are fond that they have ice cream.
	The children are fond of ice cream.
	A magazine appeared on the newsstands.
	A magazine about crime appeared on the newsstands.
	Newsweek appeared on the newsstands.
*	Newsweek about crime appeared on the newsstands.
	The report surprised many people.
	The report that crime was declining surprised many people.
	The book surprised many people.
*	The book that crime was declining surprised many people.
	The storm arrived after the picnic.
	The storm arrived after we ate lunch.
	The storm arrived during the picnic.
*	The storm arrived during we ate lunch.
*	The storm arrived while the picnic.
	The storm arrived while we ate lunch.
	This dog barked.
*	This dogs barked.
*	These dog barked.
	These dogs barked.
	Much furniture was broken.
*	A furniture was broken.
*	Much chair was broken.
	A chair was broken.
	They want/preferred them arrested.
	We want/preferred them on our team.
	With them on our team, we’ll be sure to win.
	With my parents as supportive as they are, I’ll be in fine shape.
	Kim walks.
*	We walks.
	The child walks.
*	The children walks.
	This dog barked.
*	This dogs barked.
	A dog barked.
*	A dogs barked.
*	These dog barked.
	These dogs barked.
*	Few dog barked.
	Few dogs barked.
	The dog barked.
	The dogs barked.
	Much furniture was broken.
*	A furniture was broken.
*	Much chair was broken.
	A chair was broken.
	I walk and Dana runs.
	Two cats and one dog live there.
	We like them.
	They like us.
*	We like they.
*	Us like them.
	Kim likes dogs.
	Dogs like Kim.
	A rat died yesterday.
*	A rat yesterday died.
	The person responsible confessed.
*	The person confessed responsible.
*	The cat slept soundly and furry.
*	The soundly and furry cat slept.
	Chris walks, eats broccoli, and plays squash.
	Chris walks, Pat eats broccoli, and Sandy plays squash.
	There was some particular dog who saved every family.
	Every family was saved by some dog or other.
	John frightens himself
	Susan frightens her .
	Susan told herself a story.
	Susan told her a story.
	Susan told a story to herself
	Susan told a story to her
	Susan devoted herself to linguistics.
*	Susan devoted her to linguistics.
	Nobody told Susan about herself
	Nobody told Susan about her
	Susan thinks that nobody likes herself
	Susan thinks that nobody likes her
*	That picture of Susan offended herself
	That picture of Susan offended her
	Sandy offended Jason
	He offended Sandy
*	I enjoy yourself.
*	He enjoys themselves.
*	She enjoys himself.
	They talk to themselves
	Nobody told Susan
*	Nobody told Susan
	Nobody talked to Susan
*	Nobody talked to Susan
	We compared him
	We compared them
	Protect yourself!
*	Protect you!
	I met the person who left.
	I met the person who they visited.
	Despite their average age, the Charge boasts an experienced roster.
	The Cardinal plays Arizona State at 7 p.m Saturday at Stanford.
	The picture of Sandy was awesome.
	The picture was awesome.
	We couldn’t find any pictures of Blind Mello Jello.
	Leslie slept.
*	Leslie slept the baby.
*	Dana relied.
*	Pat devoured.
*	Chris handed.
*	Chris handed Bo.
*	Chris handed a ticket.
*	We put.
*	We put on the shelf.
*	We put the book.
	Dana relied on Hilary.
	Pat devoured the sandwich.
	Chris handed Bo a ticket.
	We put the book on the shelf.
	Dana walked and Leslie ran.
*	Dana walking and Leslie ran.
*	Dana walked and Leslie running.
*	Dana walking and Leslie running.
*	the relier on Sandy left.
*	the relier left.
*	the putter of books on the table left.
*	the putter on the table left.
*	the putter of books left.
	Sandy porched the newspaper without difficulty.
	The senator houdinied his way out of the accusations.
	They have been computering me to death all morning.
	Jan gave Dale a book.
	Jan gave a book to Dale.
	Jan handed Dale a book.
	Jan handed a book to Dale.
	Kris donated a book to the library.
*	Kris donated the library a book.
	Dale gave Brooke a hard time.
??  Dale gave a hard time to Brooke.
	The police sprayed the protesters with water.
	The police sprayed water on the protesters.
	The students drove cars.
	These cars drive easily.
	Pat sneezed.
	Pat sneezed the napkin off the table.
	The horse kicked me.
	The horse kicked me black and blue.
	They yelled.
	They yelled their way into the meeting.
	Kim is standing here.
	Sandy has eaten dinner.
	The horse raced past the barn fell.
	The boat floated down the river sank.
	The horse that was raced past the barn fell.
	The horse taken to the hospital died.
	The boat that was floated down the river sank.
	The boat seen down the river sank.
	The evidence assembled by the prosecution convinced the jury.
	The thief seized by the police turned out to be our cousin.
	The evidence that was assembled by the prosecution convinced the jury.
	The thief who was seized by the police turned out to be our cousin.
	Lou forgot the umbrella.
	Lou forgot the umbrella was broken.
	Lou forgot the umbrella in the closet.
	Lou hoped the umbrella was broken.
*	Lou hoped the umbrella in the closet.
*	Lou put the umbrella was broken.
	Lou put the umbrella in the closet.
	Dana learned the umbrella was broken.
	Dana learned a new theorem in class.
	The artist drew the child with a pencil.
	Lynn likes the hat on the shelf.
	The artist drew the child with a bicycle.
	Lynn bought the hat on the shelf.
	The dog bit the cat.
	The cat was bitten by the dog.
	The cat was bitten.
*	The cat was bitten the mouse.
*	The cat was bitten the mouse by the dog.
	Pat handed Chris a note.
	Chris was handed a note by Pat.
*	Chris was handed Sandy a note by Pat.
	Chris was handed a note.
*	Chris was handed Sandy a note.
	TV puts dumb ideas in children’s heads.
	Dumb ideas are put in children’s heads by TV.
	Dumb ideas are put in children’s heads.
*	Dumb ideas are put notions in children’s heads.
*	Dumb ideas are put notions in children’s heads by TV.
	The patient died.
*	The patient was died by the doctor.
*	The patient was died.
*	The doctor died the patient.
*	Pat handed Chris.
*	Chris was handed by Pat.
*	Chris was handed.
	Pat handed Chris a note.
	Chris was handed a note by Pat.
	Chris was handed a note.
	TV puts dumb ideas into their heads.
	Dumb ideas are put into their heads by TV.
	Dumb ideas are put into their heads.
*	TV puts dumb ideas.
*	Dumb ideas are put.
*	Dumb ideas are put by TV.
	He was arrested by the police.
*	Him was arrested by the police.
	The cat got bitten (by the dog).
	Liked by many people but respected by few, Jean will have to run an aggressive
	Anyone handed a note will be watched closely.
	The cat was bitten by the dog.
*	The cat were bitten by the dog.
	There are storm clouds gathering.
	There is a monster in Loch Ness.
	It is obvious that Pat is lying.
	The FBI is keeping close tabs on Pat.
	Pat is on the roof.
	Pat is the captain of the team.
	Pat is fond of Chris.
	Pat is singing the blues.
*	Pat is likes Chris.
*	Pat is hate Chris.
*	Pat is mere.
	There is a unicorn in the garden.
	There were many people fond of Pat.
	There are people looking through the window.
	There was a felon elected to the city council.
	There is a seat available.
*	A seat available was in the last row.
*	Pat took a seat available.
*	I looked for a seat available.
	A unicorn is in the garden.
	Many people were fond of Pat.
	People are looking through the window.
	A felon was elected to the city council.
*	There loved Sandy.
*	Merle gave there a book.
*	We talked to them about there.
	That the Giants had lost really mattered.
	That the Giants had lost mattered.
	It really mattered that the Giants had lost.
	It mattered that the Giants had lost.
	That dogs bark annoys people.
	It annoys people that dogs bark.
	That Chris knew the answer (never) occurred to Pat.
	It never occurred to Pat that Chris knew the answer.
	It occurred to Pat that Chris knew the answer.
	That the Cardinal won the game gave Sandy a thrill.
	It gave Sandy a thrill that the Cardinal won the game.
	That the media discuss celebrities’ sex lives discomfits many Americans.
	It discomfits many Americans that the media discuss celebrities’ sex lives.
	That the Giants lost the series sucks.
	It sucks that the Giants lost the series.
	That the Giants lost the series bites.
	It bites that the Giants lost the series.
*	That Pat is innocent proves.
	It proves that Pat is innocent.
*	That Sandy had lied suggested.
	It suggested that Sandy had lied.
*	It loved Sandy.
*	I gave it to Pat.
	Cohen proved the independence of the continuum hypothesis.
	Cohen proved that the continuum hypothesis was independent.
	We forgot our invitations.
	We forgot that we needed invitations.
	Nobody saw Pat.
	Nobody saw that Pat had arrived.
	That Fido barks annoys me.
	Fido barks.
	Carrie kicked the bucket last night.
	The FBI kept tabs on Sandy.
	The candidates take advantage of the voters.
	Chris dreads the bucket.
	The police put tabs on undocumented workers.
	The candidates bring advantage to the voters.
	Tabs are kept on suspected drug dealers by the FBI.
	Advantage is taken of every opportunity for improvement.
	The bucket was kicked by Pat.



<Goldberg-Jackendoff_2004>
    Our friends won’t buy this analysis, let alone the next one we propose.
    One more pseudo-generalization and I’m giving up.
    One more pseudo-generalization or I’m giving up.
    The more we study resultatives, the crazier they get.
    Day by day the facts are getting murkier.
    I’ll fix you a drink.
    Fred watered the plants flat.
    Bill belched his way out of the restaurant
    We’re twistin’ the night away.
    Herman hammered the metal flat.
    The critics laughed the play off the stage.
    The pond froze solid.
    Bill rolled outof the room.
    The gardener watered the flowers flat.
    The gardener watered the flowers.
    Bill broke the bathtub into pieces.
    Bill broke the bathtub.
    They drank the pub dry.
*   They drank the pub.
    The professor talked us into a stupor.
*   The professor talked us.
    We yelled ourselves hoarse.
*   We yelled ourselves.
*   We yelled Harry hoarse.
    Harry coughed himself into insensibility.
*   Harry coughed himself.
*   Harry coughed us into insensibility.
    Bill followed the road into the forest.
    We drove Highway 5 from SD to SF.
    The sailors rode the breeze clear of the rocks.
    Fred tracked the leak to its source.
    John danced mazurkas across the room.
    Bill spit/urinated/coughed/sneezed out the window.
    Bill bled on the floor.
    The toilet leaked through the floor into the kitchen below.
    Bill ate off the floor.
    Bill drank from the hose.
    This metal hammers flat easily
    They made him president.
    They made him angry.
*   They caused him to become angry by making him
*   They caused him to become president by making him
*   They made him to exhaustion.
    They made him into a monster.
    The trolley rumbled through the tunnel.
    The wagon creaked down the road.
    The bullets whistled past the house.
    The knee-replacement candidate groaned up the stairs.
*   The car honked down the road.
*   The dog barked out of the room.
*   Bill whistled past the house
    The car honked its way down the road.
    The dog barked its way out of the room.
    Bill whistled his way past the house.
    The witch vanished into the forest.
    Bill disappeared down the road.
*   The witch went into the forest by vanishing.
    The witch went into the forest and thereby vanished.
    The building is tall and wide.
*   The building is tall and tall.
    This building got/is taller and wider than that one.
    This building got taller and taller.
*   This building is taller and taller.
*   This building got than that one.
*   This building is than that one.
@   For hours, Bill heated the mixture hotter and hotter.
@   For hours, Bill hammered the metal ever flatter.
@   For years, Penelope wove the shawl longer and longer.
    Bill floated into the cave
*@  Bill floated into the cave for hours
    Bill pushed Harry off the sofa
*@  Bill pushed Harry off the sofa for hours
    Bill floated down the river for hours
    Bill floated down the river
    Bill pushed Harry along the trail for hours
    Bill pushed Harry along the trail
    The road zigzagged down the hill.
    The rope stretched over the pulley.
    The weights stretched the rope over the pulley.
    The weights made the rope stretch over the pulley.
    The weights kept the rope stretched over the pulley.
    Sam cut himself free.
    Sam got free by cutting his finger.
    Bill cried himself to sleep.
*   Bill cried Sue to sleep.
    Bill wiggled himself through the hole.
    Bill sang himself to sleep.
    Bill wiggled the puppet through the hole.
    Bill sang Sue to sleep.
*   The elevator creaked itself to the ground.
    If the telephone rang, it could ring itself silly.
*   She yelled hoarse.
*   Ted cried to sleep.
    The tiger bled to death.
    He coughed awake and we were all overjoyed, especially Sierra.
    the kittens yawned awake and played
    John sneezed awake, rubbing his nose and cursing under his breath.
    John coughed himself awake on the bank of the lake where he and Bill had their play
    Ron yawned himself awake.
    She sneezed herself awake as the leaf landed on her nose.
    The worm wriggled onto the carpet.
    The chocolate melted onto the carpet.
*   The ball wiggled itself loose.
    Bill wiggled himself loose.
    Aliza wiggled her tooth loose.
    The mechanical doll wiggled itself loose.
    The off-center spinning flywheel shook itself loose





<Culicover and Jackendoff 1999>
    The more you eat, the less you want.
    If you eat more, you want correspondingly less.
    When you eat more, you want correspondingly less.
    As you eat more, you want correspondingly less.
    If you had eaten more, you would want less.
*   As you eat the most, you want the least.
    If you had eaten more, you would want less.
*   As you eat the most, you want the least.
*   The more you would want, the less you would eat.
*   The most you want, the least you eat.
    The more you eat, the less you want.
    The angrier Sue gets, the more Fred admires her.
    The more that you eat, the less that you want.
    The angrier that Sue gets, the more that Fred admires her.
    I think that the more you eat, the less you want.
    I’m not shocked by the idea that the more you eat, the less you want.
    It is obvious that the more you eat, the less you want.
    It is not entirely clear if the more you eat, the less you want.
    I want to explain exactly why the more you eat, the less you want.
    I demand that the more John eats, the more he pays
    I demand that the more John eats, the more he pay
*   I demand that the more John eat, the more he pays
*   I demand that the more John eat, the more he pay
    I demand that John pay more, the more he eats.
*   I demand that John pays more, the more he eat.
    You get angrier, the more we eat, don’t you.
*   You get angrier, the more we eat, don’t we.
*   The harder it has rained, how much faster a flow that appears in the river?
    The harder it has rained, how much faster a flow appears in the river?
*   The harder it rains, how much faster that do you run?
    The harder it rains, how much faster do you run?
    The harder it rains, how much faster a flow do you see in the river?
*   The harder it rains, how much faster a flow that do you see in the river?
    When/As it rains harder, how much faster a flow appears in the river?
*   When/As it rains harder, how much faster a flow that appears in the river?
	How much harder has it rained, the faster a flow you see in the river?
	How much harder has it rained, when you see a faster flow in the river?
*	The more John eats, the tighter keep your mouth shut about it.
?	The more John eats, the tighter everyone keep your mouth shut about it, OK?
*	The more everyone eat, the more John keeps his big mouth shut about it, OK?
	If John eats more, keep your mouth shut tighter, OK?
	When John eats more, keep your mouth shut tighter, OK?
	As John eats more, keep your mouth shut tighter, OK?
	Keep your mouth shut tighter, the more John eats, OK?
	Everyone keep your mouth shut tighter, the more John eats, OK?
?	I can well imagine the more he eats, the fatter him getting.
??	I can well imagine the more him eating, the fatter him getting.
	Bill can well imagine getting fat.
*	Bill can well imagine the more he eats, the fatter getting.
	Fred can well imagine Joe getting fatter, the more he eats.
*	It is important the more you eat, the more careful to be.
*	It is important for the more you eat, the more careful to be.
*	It is important the more you to eat, the more careful to be.
*	It is important the more you eat, the more careful you to be.
*	It is important the more you eat, the more careful for you to be.
*	It is important for the more you to eat, the more careful to be.
*	It is important for the more you to eat, the more careful for you to be.
*	It is important the more you to eat, the more careful for you to be.
*	It is important for the more you eat, the more careful you to be.
*	It is important for the more you to eat, the more careful for you to be.
	It is important for you to be more careful, the more you eat.
	It is important to be more careful, the more you eat.
*	I can well imagine quickly Mary answering the question.
?*	I can well imagine with a hatchet Mary destroying the Jeep.
?*	I can well imagine if he eats more, him getting fat.
	Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
?	I really think that, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
?	I’m not shocked by the idea that, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
?	It is becoming perfectly clear to me that, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
*	It is not entirely obvious if, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
*	It is not entirely obvious whether, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
?	I want to explain exactly why, Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
	Mary listens to the Grateful Dead and she gets depressed.
	If Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
	When Mary listens to the Grateful Dead, she gets depressed.
	Mary gets depressed if she listens to the Grateful Dead.
	Mary gets depressed when she listens to the Grateful Dead.
	The angrier Mary got, the more she looked at pictures.
	The more she looked at pictures, the angrier Mary got.
*	The more pictures Mary looked at, she got angrier and angrier.
	Mary gets depressed and she listens to the Grateful Dead.
	The higher the stakes are, the lower his expectations are.
	The higher the stakes, the lower his expectations.
	The higher the stakes, the lower his expectations are.
	His expectations are lower, the higher the stakes.
	His expectations are lower, the higher the stakes are.
*	His expectations lower, the higher the stakes.
*	His expectations lower, the higher the stakes are.
	The more obnoxious Fred is, the less attention you should pay to him.
*	The more obnoxious Fred, the less attention you should pay to him.
	The more Fred is obnoxious, the less attention you should pay to him.
	The more Fred is obnoxious, the less you should pay attention to him.
*	The more obnoxious Fred, the less you should pay attention to him.
	His expectations are always lower than mine are.
	His expectations are always lower than mine.
	John was lots more obnoxious than Fred was.
	John was lots more obnoxious than Fred.
	You should always lock your door, no matter how fancy the hotel might be.
	You should always lock your door, no matter how fancy the hotel.
	I don’t plan to lock the door, no matter how fancy this hotel is.
*	I don’t plan to lock the door, no matter how fancy this hotel.
	I’m going out, whatever the weather.
	I’m going out, wherever that hurricane might be.
*	I’m going out, wherever that hurricane.
	The more counterexamples Mary says that Bill has helped Fred to discover the less I believe her.
*	The more food Mary knows a man that eats the poorer she gets.
?	The more great books he makes the claim that he has read the more suspicious I become of him.
*	The fatter he goes to a doctor when he gets the more he eats.
*	The fatter that that he gets bothers him, the more he eats.
?	The more books I ask whether he’ll read the angrier he gets.
*	The more books I ask to whom he will give, the more he reads.
*	The more people I ask what he will give to the more he reads.
	The more carefully he words the letter the safer he’ll be.
*	The more carefully he knows a man that worded the letter the safer he’ll be.
	The more geniuses John meets, the angrier he gets.
*	The more John meets geniuses, the angrier he gets.
	The more people you say will buy tickets, the happier I’ll be.
*	The more people you say that will buy tickets, the happier I’ll be.
	The more people you say that right after the show opens will buy tickets, the happier I'll be.
	The more I talk to Joe, the less about linguistics I am inclined to think Sally has taught him to appreciate.
*	The more he eats, the poorer he knows a woman that gets.
?	The more he eats, the poorer he makes the claim that he gets.
*	The more he eats, the fatter he goes to a doctor when he gets.
*	The more he eats, the fatter that that he gets really bothers me.
?	The more books he buys, the more books I wonder whether he’ll read.
*	The more he reads, the more books I wonder to whom he will give.
*	The more he reads, the more people I wonder what he will give to.
	The sooner you call, the more carefully I will word the letter.
*	The sooner you call, the more carefully I know a man that will word the letter
	The richer John gets, the more geniuses John meets.
*	The richer he gets, the more John meets geniuses.
	The more articles he reads, the fewer people he thinks will go into linguistics.
*	The more articles he reads, the fewer people he thinks that will go into linguistics.
	The more articles he reads, the fewer people he thinks that under the current circumstances will go into linguistics.
	The more articles he reads, the fewer people he thinks under the current circumstances will go into linguistics.
	The more people that arrive, the louder that it gets.
	The more people that arrive, the louder it gets.
	The more people you give beer to, the more people that get sick.
	The more people that you give beer to, the more people that get sick.
	The more people arrive, the louder that it gets.
	The more people arrive, the louder it gets.
	The more people that you give beer to, the more people get sick.
	The more people you give beer to, the more people get sick.
*	The more pictures of John that he buys the more arrogant he becomes.
	The more pictures of himself that John buys the more arrogant he becomes.
	The more timid he feels, the more people he interviews without asking questions of.
	The man that arrived on the 10:53 was my brother.
*	The man arrived on the 10:53 was my brother.
*   The more people everyone who likes pays attention to, the happier we all are.
*   The later it gets, the more people everyone who likes pays attention to.
	Whenever Bill smokes, Susan hates him all the more.
	Whenever Bill smokes, Susan hates him much more.
	Whenever Bill smokes, Susan hates him far more.
	Whenever Bill smokes, Susan hates him a lot more.
	Once Janet left, Fred became all the crazier.
	Once Janet left, Fred became much crazier.
	Once Janet left, Fred became far crazier.
	Once Janet left, Fred became a lot crazier.
	Fred became all the crazier, the more often Janet left.
	When Bill smokes, all the more does Susan hate him.
*	When Bill smokes, much more does Susan hate him.
*	When Bill smokes, all the more Susan hates him.
?	The more Bill smokes, the more does Susan hate him.
?	The more often Janet leaves, the angrier does Fred become.
*	The more does Bill smoke, the more Susan hates him.
	So much did you eat that everyone gasped.
	So fast did you run that everyone gasped.
	So intelligent a dog did you buy that everyone gasped.
	I know how much you ate.
	I know how fast you ran.
	I know how intelligent a dog you bought.
	He ate so much that he got sick.
	So much did he eat that he got sick.
	The more you eat, the more you want.
*	You eat the more, the more you want.
*	The more you eat, you want the more.
*	I wonder you ate how much.
	I wonder to how many people Bill talks.
	The longer he has to wait, the angrier John gets.
	If he has to wait, John gets angry.
*	He gets angry, the longer John has to wait.
*	He gets angry if John has to wait.
	The more pictures of him that appear in the news, the more embarrassed John becomes.
	The more that pictures of him appear in the news, the more embarrassed John becomes.
	The more pictures of himself that appear in the news, the more embarrassed John becomes.
	The more that pictures of himself appear in the news, the more embarrassed John becomes.
	The more pictures of him appear in the news, the more likely John is to get arrested.
*	The more pictures of himself appear in the news, the more likely John is to get arrested.
	The more that pictures of him appear in the news, the more likely John is to get arrested.
*	The more that pictures of himself appear in the news, the more likely John is to get arrested.
	The more that John gets upset by them, the more that stories about him seem to show up in the news.
*	The more that John gets upset by them, the more that stories about himself seem to show up in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of him appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of him that appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of himself appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of himself that appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of him appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of himself appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of him that appear in the news.
	John is more embarrassed, the more pictures of himself that appear in the news.
	Stories about him seem to show up more on the evening news, the more that John gets upset by them.
*	Stories about himself seem to show up more on the evening news, the more that John gets upset by them.
	If you give him enough opportunity, every senator will succumb to corruption.
	You give him enough opportunity and every senator will succumb to corruption.
*	We gave him enough opportunity and, sure enough, every senator succumbed to corruption.
	If you give any senator enough opportunity, he will succumb to corruption.
*	If you give every senator enough opportunity, he will succumb to corruption.
	You give any senator enough opportunity and he will succumb to corruption.
*	You give every senator enough opportunity and he will succumb to corruption.
*	We gave any senator enough opportunity and, sure enough, he succumbed to corruption.
*	We gave every senator enough opportunity and, sure enough, he succumbed to corruption.
	The more lobbyists he talks to, the more corrupt every senator seems to become.
	The more lobbyists wine and dine him, the more every senator is susceptible to corruption.
	The more time that any senator spends with lobbyists, the more likely he is to succumb to corruption.
*	The more time that every senator spends with lobbyists, the more likely he succumbs to corruption.
	The more time that any senator spends with lobbyists, the more likely he is to succumb to corruption.
*	The more time that every senator spends with lobbyists, the more likely he succumbs to corruption.
	Every senator becomes more corrupt, the more lobbyists he talks to.
	Any senator becomes more corrupt, the more lobbyists he talks to.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, the more lobbyists any senator talks to.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, the more lobbyists every senator talks to.
	Every/Any senator seems to become more corrupt, if/as he talks to more lobbyists.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, if any senator talks to more lobbyists.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, if every senator talks to more lobbyists.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, as every senator talks to more lobbyists.
*	He seems to become more corrupt, as any senator talks to more lobbyists.
	The sooner you solve this problem, the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters.
	This is the sort of problem which the sooner you solve the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters.
	The folks up at corporate headquarters are the sort of people who the sooner you solve this problem, the more easily you'll satisfy.
	This problem, the sooner you solve the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters.
?	The folks up at corporate headquarters, the sooner you solve this problem, the more easily you'll satisfy.
	Who did you give pictures of to friends of?
	It is this problem that the sooner you solve the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters.
?*	It is the folks up at corporate headquarters (not the ones here at the regional office) who the sooner you solve this problem, the more easily you’ll satisfy.
*	Which problem does the sooner you solve, the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters?
*	Which problem the sooner you solve, will the more easily you satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters?
*	Which problem does the sooner that you solve, the more easily you’ll satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters?
*	Which problem the sooner that you solve, will the more easily you satisfy the folks up at corporate headquarters?
*	The harder it rains, the faster who runs?
*	The harder it rains, the faster who runs?
*	The louder who talks, the angrier you get?
	The harder it rains, how much faster a flow do you see in the river?
	The harder that it rains, how much faster a flow do you see in the river?
	They failed to tell me which problem the sooner I solve, the quicker the folks up at corporate headquarters.
??	I finally worked up enough courage to ask which people up at corporate headquarters the sooner I solve this problem, the quicker I’ll get free of.
	Which problem do you think that the sooner you solve, the quicker you’ll be able to tell the folks up at corporate headquarters to buzz off?
??	Which folks up at corporate headquarters do you think that the sooner you solve this problem, the quicker you’ll be able to tell t to buzz off?
??	This is a problem that you’ll be able to tell the folks up at corporate headquarters to buzz off if you solve.
?	This is a problem that you solve t and you’ll immediately be able to tell the folks up at corporate headquarters to buzz off.
?	Those are the folks that you just solve this problem and you’ll be able to put on ice.
	This is a problem that you’ll be able to tell the folks up at corporate headquarters to buzz off if you solve it.
??	This is a problem that you solve it and you’ll be able to tell the folks up at corporate headquarters to buzz off.
??	Those are the folks that you just solve this problem and you’ll be able to put them on ice.
??	They failed to tell me which problem I’ll beat the competition more easily, the sooner I solve.
??	This is the problem that you’ll beat the competition more easily, the sooner you solve.















<BALTIN AND COLLINS, eds, 2001>
	John saw the man in the room.
	Which room did John see the man in?
	Who did John think that Bill claimed that Mary suspected that everybody liked?
	John could not visit Sally.
	What John could do is not visit Sally.
	John couldn’t visit Sally.
*	Who does John visit Sally because he likes?
	Why did John leave?
	I hit the ball.
	You hit the ball.
*	He hit the ball.
*	She hit the ball.
	They hit the ball.
*	Am not I going?
	I am not going.
	Aren’t I going?
*	I aren’t going.
	Louise is not happy, is she?
	Louise is unhappy, isn’t she?
	Louise likes not being happy, doesn’t she?
	Not many books survived the fire, did they?
	No books survived the fire, did they?
	He hasn’t often paid taxes, has he?
?	Often he hasn’t paid taxes, has he?
	He can’t pay taxes, can he?
?	He mustn’t pay taxes, must he?
	She does not see him.
	She kept not seeing him.
	She could not have been working.
*	Marianne not left.
*	Marianne left not.
	Marianne did not leave.
	He could not] have been working.
	He could not have been working.
	He cannot have been working.
	He can just not have been working.
	He can simply not have been working.
	You must not simply not work.
	He may not just not have been working.
	He can’t have been working.
	He cannot have been working.
	He can not have been working.
	Can’t he have been working?
	Can he not have been working?
*	Can he not have been working?
	John wrote books
*	John write books
*	John wrote books
	John did not write books
*	John seems that is nice
	“I am so happy”, thought John
	down the hill rolled John
*	John kisses often Mary
	John often kisses Mary
	Who do you think Mary said John likes?
?*	Who did you ask whether Mary knows why John likes
	Who do you think that Mary said that John likes
?	Which problem do you wonder whether Mary solved
*	How do you wonder whether Mary solved the problem
	How do you think that Mary solved the problem
*	How do you wonder whether John said that Mary solved the problem
*	How do you wonder whether John said Mary solved the problem
??	Which problem do you wonder whether John said (that) Mary solved
	How did you think that Mary solved the problem
??	Which problem do you wonder whether John said Mary solved
??	Which problem do you wonder whether John said that Mary solved
	Mary hired someone.
	I heard that Mary hired someone.
	I resigned because Mary hired someone.
	Mary wondered which picture of himself Bill saw
	Which picture of himself does Mary think that John said that Susan likes
*	Mary thinks that John said that Susan likes pictures of himself
	Mary thinks that John said that pictures of himself, Susan likes
	If you don’t believe me, you will the weatherman
	I rolled up a newspaper, and Lynn did a magazine
	Kathy likes astronomy, but she doesn’t meteorology
	The DA proved Jones guilty and the Assistant DA will prove Smith
?	John gave Bill a lot of money, and Mary will give Susan a lot of
	Mary will believe Susan, and you will Bob
	You will believe Bob
	You might not believe me but you will Bob
*	You will Bob believe
	How did you solve the problem?
	How did you solve the problem <how>?
	I wonder who could solve the problem in this way.
*	How do you wonder who could solve this problem
	No candidate can predict how many people will vote for him.
	Every politician is worried when the press starts attacking him.
	Which politician appointed the journalist who supported him?
*	The fact that no candidate was elected shows that he was inadequate.
	John sells books, Mary buys records and Bill V newspapers.
	The question of whether John met Mary worries the people who support
	They have left.
	Have they left?
	They could have left.
*	Have they could left?
	Could they have left?
	He has often seen Mary.
	He I often sees Mary.
*	He sees often Mary.
*	Sees he I often Mary?
	It seems that it is likely that John will win.
	It seems that John is likely to win.
	John seems to be likely to win.
*	John seems that it is likely to win.
*	John seems will win.
?	Which problem do you wonder how to solve?
*	How do you wonder which problem to solve?
	How intelligent do you consider John?
??	How many people do you wonder whether I consider intelligent?
*	How intelligent do you wonder whether I consider John?
?	Which problem do you wonder how to solve?
*	What the hell do you wonder how to say?
	He has left
	His book is nice
	Bill saw him
	Bill works with him
	John believes him to be a nice guy
	John considers him a nice guy
	For him to do that would be a mistake
	With him sick, the team is in trouble
*	A man to be in the garden is unlikely
*	A man to come is unlikely
*	John to call would be unlikely
*	This conclusion to be arrived at is surprising
	John believes that he/*him is sick
*	John tries him to win
*	John wonders where him to go
	Who do you think that Bill likes?
	Who do you think that Bill believes to be innocent?
*	Who do you think that believes John to be innocent?
*	Who would you prefer for to win the race?
	Someone stole my car.
	My car was stolen.
*	John eats not chocolate.
*	The children eat all chocolate.
	John has often kissed Mary.
	John has not kissed Mary.
	The kids have all eaten the chocolate.
	Has John seen Mary?
	In general, he understands what’s going on.
	It’s probable that in general he understands what’s going on.
*	It’s probable in general that he understands what’s going on.
*	In general that he understands what’s going on is surprising.
	I said that never in my life had I seen a place like Bangor.
	I explained how to fix the sink.
	I explained how we should fix the sink.
	I explained that we should fix the sink.
*	I explained to fix the sink.
	Mi welais i Megan.
	Mickey looked up the reference.
	Mickey looked the reference up.
*	Mickey looked up it.
	Mickey looked it up.
	Mickey looked up them.
	Mickey looked up him and her.
	Mickey teamed up with the women.
*	Mickey teamed with the women up.
	Mickey pointed out that Gary had left.
*	Mickey pointed that Gary had left out.
	Mickey slips up all the time.
*	Mickey slips all the time up.
	What does John think Mary bought?
*	John thinks what Mary bought.
	John wonders what Mary bought.
*	What does John wonder Mary bought?
??	Who is he reading a book that criticizes?
??	What do you remember where we bought?
	Who bought what?
	Who is reading a book that criticizes who?
	Who remembers where we bought what?
??	What do you remember where we bought?
	Who remembers where we bought what?
*	I wonder who what bought
*	I wonder what who bought?
	Who is reading a book that criticizes who?
	Who remembers where we bought what?
	There aren’t many linguistics students here.
	I haven’t met many linguistics students.
	What does every student buy?
	I need Sally to be there.
*	The boat sank to collect the insurance.
	The boat was sunk to collect the insurance.
	John wants to win.
	The bed was unmade.
*	Headway was unmade.
	John was unknown.
*	John was unknown to be the murderer.
	We knew John to be the murderer.
	He taught the children.
	He fed the children.
	The children were untaught.
	The children were unfed.
	I believed these students all to like John.
	They tried to all like John.
	I believed these students to all like John.
?*	Did he try ever to talk to the student?
	Did you believe him ever to have made an effort to talk to the student?
	Did he try to ever be attentive to the needs of students?
	Did you believe him to ever have made an effort to talk to the student?
	work out an analysis that is typical of this view of understood subjects.
	They were believed all to be quite diligent.
	Was he believed ever to fail students?
	There is tending to be more and more discussion of these issues.
	John seemed to be a great linguist.
	John proved to be a great linguist.
	There tended to be a lot of discussion.
	There promises to be a storm tonight.
	John tried to be a good boy.
	John strived to be successful.
	John wanted to improve his lot in life.
	John expected to win.
	This book is too dense to be read in one sitting.
*	There is too likely to be a riot to be a serious discussion of the issues.
	There is too likely to be a riot for there to be a serious discussion of the issues.
	John tried.
	John is eager.
	John remembered.
	John is refused
	John forgot.
	John is willing.
*	Bill seems to be obnoxious, but I don’t think that Sam seems.
*	Bill seems to be obnoxious, but I don’t think that Sam happens.
*	Bill seems to be obnoxious, but I don’t think that Sam turns out.
*	Bill seems to be obnoxious, but I don’t think that Sam appears.
*	Bill seems to be obnoxious, but I don’t think that Sam tends.
*	They tried all to like John.
	They seemed all to like John.
	John believes Sally to be polite
	I believe John with all my heart to be a fine person.
*	I believe John with all my heart is a fine person.
*	John is wanted to win.
	We want John to win.
*	John would be liked to win.
	We would like John to win.
*	John would be hated to win.
	We would hate John to win.
*	John would be preferred to be the candidate.
	We would prefer John to be the candidate.
	I would want for John to win.
	I would like for John to win.
	I would hate for John to win.
	I would prefer for John to be the candidate.
	John destroyed the house.
	The electrode emitted ions into the medium.
	Ions struck the electrode.
	The medium contains ions.
*	The house destroyed John.
	Ions left the electrode.
*	The electrode was left by ions.
	The electrode was struck by ions.
	The ball lies in the box.
	The ball rolled from the bush to the tree.
	The ball lies in the box.
	The box contains the ball.
	The ball rolled from the bush to the tree.
	The tree dropped fruit to the ground.
	Fruit hit the ground from the tree.
	The stone knocked against the pole into the road.
	The stone knocked the pole into the road.
	The box contained the ball
*	The box gradually contained the ball
*	The box at once contained the ball
*	The box contained the ball to the ground
*	The box contained the ball from the tree
	The tree gradually dropped its fruit to the ground.
	The tree dropped its fruit to the ground.
	The tree gradually dropped its fruit to the ground.
	Fruit hit the roof.
	Fruit hit the roof from the tree.
	Fruit at once hit the roof from the tree.
*	Fruit hit the roof *against the ground.
*	Fruit at once hit the roof against the ground.
	Fruit dropped from the tree.
*	Fruit dropped from the tree from the clouds
*	Fruit fell against the house.
*	Fruit fell against the house against the ground.
	The tree changed into an oak.
	The tree changed from a maple into an oak.
*	The maple changed into an oak from a cedar.
	The maple changed into an oak from a cedar.
	The maple changed into an oak.
	The oak developed out of a maple.
	The train reached the station.
	The branches knocked against the wall.
	The child became a man.
	The party lasted till midnight.
	The dog went crazy.
	It struck John that it was so.
	It came to John that it was so.
	The snake saw into the nest.
	Hard work resulted in high grades.
	The farm passed to John.
	The chair abuts the wall.
*	The wall is abutted by the chair.
	John is touching the wall.
	The wall is being touched by John.
	A bear occupies the cave.
	A bear inhabits the cave.
	Water fills the tub.
	The electric main joins the house circuit in the basement.
	The house circuit is joined by the electric main in the basement.
	The fence straddles the sidewalk/the sidewalk is straddled by the fence.
	The man with a book.
?	The man is with a book.
	Gas escaped the tube.
*	The tube was escaped by gas.
	The terrorist escaped the prison cell.
	The prison cell was escaped by the terrorist.
	The rolling stone avoided the river.
	The river was avoided by the rolling stone.
	The agents caught the terrorist.
	The sponge soaked up the water.
	The tub filled with water.
	John received a book/learned a lesson.
	The parcel reached John.
*	John bereached the parcel.
	John received the parcel.
	The farm finally got to John after much litigation.
*	The farm finally reached John after much litigation.
	Water filled the cup high.
	Water filled the cup.
*	Water emptied the cup.
*	The cup filled the water high.
*	The cup filled of water.
	The cup filled with water.
	The cup emptied of water.
*	The cup emptied with water.
	the barge piled high with logs.
*	the road blocked with a stone.
	the bottle drained empty of liquid.
*	the branch dropped bare of its apple.
*	the logs piled the barge high.
	a stone blocked the road.
*	the bottle drained the liquid free.
	the branch dropped its apple free.
	Some branches broke off of the tree.
*	The tree broke off some branches.
	The tree dropped some branches.
	The tree lost some branches.
	Water bubbled out of the kettle.
	Water bubbled up out of the kettle.
*	The kettle bubbled water up.
	The kettle bubbled water.
*	The cup filled water.
*	The stone knocked the pole into the road.
	The tub leaked water.
*	The tub leaked water empty.
	The tub leaked empty of water.
*	The stone knocked against the pole into the road.
	Hail stones broke the window.
	The force of the wind broke the window.
*	The window broke from hail stones.
	The window broke from the force of the wind.
?	What hail stones did to the window was break it.
	What the force of the wind did to the window was break it.
	The agents caught the terrorist.
	The terrorist escaped the prison cell
	John hit the stone against the wall.
	John hit the wall with the stone.
	John tapped some wine from a barrel.
	John tapped a barrel of some wine.
	John laid the book on the table.
	John included his name in the list.
	John loaded the bricks onto the truck.
	John loaded the truck with bricks.
	John fed rice to the baby.
	John fed the baby rice.
	John fed the baby up with rice.
*	John fed the baby rice up.
	The ball lies completely in the box.
	The box completely contains the ball.
	The train got to the station fully.
	The train reached the station fully.
	Press the stamp against the pad completely.
	Press the pad with the stamp completely.
	Spray the paint onto the wall completely.
	Spray all the paint onto the wall completely.
*	Spray the paint onto the whole wall completely.
*	Spray the wall with all the paint.
	Spray the whole wall with the paint.
	What John did to the wall was paint it.
	What John did to the whole wall was paint it.
	What John did to the wall was hit it.
*	What John did to the whole wall was hit it.
*	What the water did to the bottle was fill it.
*	What the stone did to the wall was hit it.
*	What the water did to the whole bottle was fill it.
*	What the stone did to the whole wall was hit it.
	John took Bill to be a fool.
*	John concluded Bill to be a fool.
	Give the bottle to the baby full.
*	Give the bottle to the baby awake.
	Give the baby the bottle full.
*	Give the baby the bottle awake.
	Rub the cloth on the baby torn.
*	Rub the cloth on the baby asleep.
	Rub the baby with the cloth torn.
*	Rub the baby with the cloth asleep.
	Dry the baby with the cloth asleep.
*	Dry the baby with the cloth torn.
*	The cup knocked the stone apart.
	The stone knocked the cup apart.
	The box contains the ball.
	The ball lies in the box.
	The ball rolled from the bush to the tree.
	The tree dropped fruit to the ground.
	Fruit hit the ground from the tree.
	The cup smashed apart against the stone.
	The stone smashed the cup apart.
	The tank leaked the fluid free.
	The tank filled with petrol out of the pump.
	The cup emptied of water onto the ground.
*	The tree broke off some branches.
*	The cup filled water.
*	The stone knocked against the pole into the road.
	shows the derivation of a lexical causative, involving uniform extension of
	John lay the ball in the box.
	John included her name in the list.
	John rolled the ball from the tree to the bush.
	John hit the wall with the stone.
	John tapped the bottle of some water.
	John owns the book.
	John gave Bill the book.
	John got the book from Bill.
*	John gave Bill of the book.
	We have someone in the living room.
	John is very fond of Mary.
	Yes, too much so.
	Mary laughed at John.
	The ship sank beneath the waves.
	Mary considers John a fool and Bill a wimp.
	John regards professors as strange and politicians as creepy.
	Sue put the books on the table and the records on the chair.
	Harriet gave a mug to John and a scarf to Vivien.
	I expect John to win and Harry to lose.
	We persuaded Mary to leave and Sue to stay.
	You eat the fish raw and the beef cooked.
	I convinced John that it was late and Bill that it was early.
	They told Sue who to talk to and Virginia when to leave.
	Smith loaned, and his widow later donated, a valuable collection of manuscripts to the library.
	Sue moved, and Mary also transferred, her business to a different location.
	I succeeded in convincing, even though John had failed to persuade, Mary not to leave.
	We didn’t particularly like, but nevertheless ate, the fish raw.
	Most people probably consider, even though the courts didn’t actually find, Klaus von Bulow guilty of murder.
	Flo desperately wants, though she doesn’t really expect, the Miami Dolphins to be in the Superbowl.
	John learned French perfectly.
	Bill recited his lines poorly.
	Mary plays the violin beautifully.
*	John perfectly learned French.
*	Bill poorly recited his lines.
*	Mary beautifully plays the violin.
	John learned French immediately.
	Bill recited his lines slowly.
	Mary will play the violin soon.
	John immediately learned French.
	Bill slowly recited his lines.
	Mary will soon play the violin.
	John immediately learned French perfectly.
	John learned French perfectly (almost) immediately.
*	John perfectly learned French immediately.
*	John learned French immediately perfectly.
	Clearly, John probably will immediately learn French perfectly.
*	Clearly, John immediately will probably learn French perfectly.
*	Immediately, John probably will clearly learn French perfectly.
*	Clearly, John perfectly will immediately learn French probably.
*	John perfectly rolled the ball down the hill.
	John rolled the ball perfectly down the hill.
	John rolled the ball down the hill perfectly.
*	John perfectly shot the ball.
	John shot the ball perfectly.
*	John intimately spoke to Mary.
	John spoke intimately to Mary.
	John spoke to Mary intimately.
*	It torrentially rained.
*	It rained torrentially.
	John spoke French intimately to Mary.
	John spoke French to Mary intimately.
	Mary jumped the horse perfectly over the last fence.
	Mary jumped the horse over the last fence perfectly.
	John spoke French intimately to Mary.
*	John spoke intimately French to Mary.
*	John spoke to Mary French.
*	Mary persuaded to leave John.
*	The lions ate raw the meat.
*	Sue gave to Bill a book.
*	Mary persuaded that he should rest Bill.
	The men will all leave.
	We consider the men all fools.
	We consider the men all totally crazy.
*	I saw the men all.
*	The men were arrested all.
*	The men arrived all.
	The teacher ordered the two boys both to pay close attention.
	They returned the books all to their owners.
	We painted the chairs all red.
	The trainer fed the steaks all to the lions.
*	Bill proud of himself John doesn’t consider.
	John went home.
*	Home was gone by John.
	Mary left the room angry.
*	The room was left angry by Mary.
*	The room was left angry.
	John resembles Bill.
*	Bill is resembled by John.
	The package weighed 10 lb.
*	10 lb was weighed by the package.
	This book cost $10.
*	$10 was cost by this book.
	The book cost John $10.
*	John was cost $10 by the book.
*	John is impressed by Bill as pompous.
*	John is impressed as pompous.
*	The boys were made a good mother.
*	The boys were made a good mother by Aunt Mary.
*	The kids were failed by Max as a father.
*	The kids were failed as a father.
*	The men were struck by the idea as nonsense.
*	The men were promised by Frank to leave.
*	The men were promised to leave.
*	He impresses his friends all as pompous.
*	Aunt Mary made the boys all a good mother.
*	Max failed the kids all as a father.
*	The idea struck the men all as nonsense.
*	Frank promised the men all to leave.
*	We proclaimed to the public John to be a hero.
	We proclaimed John to the public to be a hero.
*	We proclaimed sincerely John to be a hero.
	We proclaimed John sincerely to be a hero.
*	We proclaimed sincerely to the public John to be a hero.
	We proclaimed John sincerely to the public to be a hero.
*	They represented to the dean Mary as a genuine linguist.
	They represented Mary to the dean as a genuine linguist.
*	They represented seriously Mary as a genuine linguist.
	They represented Mary seriously as a genuine linguist.
*	They represented seriously to the dean Mary as a genuine linguist.
	They represented Mary seriously to the dean as a genuine linguist.
*	We proved to the authorities Smith to be the thief.
	We proved Smith to the authorities to be the thief.
*	We proved conclusively Smith to be the thief.
	We proved Smith conclusively to be the thief.
*	We proved conclusively to the authorities Smith to be the thief.
	We proved Smith conclusively to the authorities to be the thief.
	The gardener watered the tulips flat.
	The grocer ground the coffee beans to a fine powder.
	They painted their house a hideous shade of green.
	The joggers ran their Nikes threadbare.
	The kids laughed themselves into a frenzy.
	He sneezed his handkerchief completely soggy.
	They fed the meat to the lions raw.
*	The lions ate at the meat raw.
	We love them.
*	We love they.
*	We love their.
*	Us love them.
*	Us love they.
*	Us love their.
	Our love they.
	Our love them.
	Our love their.
*	he belief that Mary kissed Bill is mistaken.
*	him belief that Mary kissed Bill is mistaken.
	his belief that Mary kissed Bill is mistaken.
	Mary loves him.
	Mary is fond of him.
*	Mary is fond him.
	Mary criticized him.
*	Mary’s criticism him was cruel.
	Mary’s criticism of him was cruel.
	a.That John loves Mary is doubtful.
*	John to love Mary would be doubtful.
	For John to love Mary would be doubtful.
	a.To go abroad would be nice.
	John’s plan to go abroad is nice.
	It is nice to go abroad.
	Mary believed John to have loved her.
	Mary considered John/ to have loved her.
	Mary reported John to have loved her.
*	Mary considered to have loved her.
	Mary tried to go abroad.
	Mary intended to go abroad.
	Mary managed to go abroad.
	Mary desired to go abroad.
*	Mary tried John to go abroad.
*	Mary managed John to go abroad.
*	Mary intended John to go abroad.
*	Mary desired John to go abroad.
	Mary believed him to have loved her.
	Mary considered him to have loved her.
	Mary reported him to have loved her.
*	Mary believed he to have loved her.
*	Mary considered he to have loved her.
*	Mary reported he to have loved her.
*	Mary believed his to have loved her.
*	Mary considered his to have loved her.
*	Mary reported his to have loved her.
	It is certain that John has loved Mary.
	It is likely that John has loved Mary.
	There are strangers in that garden.
*	There is strangers in that garden.
	There *is/are arriving three men at that station.
	I consider there to be a man in that garden.
*	I consider there a man in that garden.
	They alleged there to have been many strangers in that garden.
*	They alleged many strangers to have been in that garden.
	John wagered there to have been a stranger in that haunted house.
*	John wagered a stranger to have been in that haunted house.
	John tried to kiss Mary.
	John persuaded Mary to kiss him.
	John told Mary to kiss him.
	It is illegal to park here.
	I remembered him having kissed Mary.
	I reported him having kissed Mary.
	I remembered having kissed Mary.
	I reported having kissed Mary.
	I enjoy taking a bath.
	I detest taking a bath.
*	I enjoy him taking a bath.
*	I detest him taking a bath.
	I saw him kissing Mary.
	I noticed him kissing Mary.
*	I saw kissing Mary.
*	I noticed kissing Mary.
*	There was known to everyone.
	John’s refusing the offer is shocking.
	the enemy’s destroying the city was horrific.
	John’s refusal of the offer was shocking
	the enemy’s destruction of the city was horrific
	John wanted to leave the room happy and leave the room happy he did.
*	John wanted to leave the room happy and leave the room he did happy.
	I only eat fish raw fresh.
	I often send Mary home drunk, and she gets there just fine.
*	I raw eat fish drunk.
*	I only eat fish drunk raw.
	I don’t think Fred will, either.
	I can’t believe Holly won’t eat rutabagas.
	I can’t believe Fred won’t, either.
	José likes rutabagas, and Holly does too.
	José ate rutabagas, and Holly has too.
	José is eating rutabagas, and Holly is too.
	John wants to read Fred’s story, and I also want to.
	John is leaving but Mary’s not.
	I consider Bill intelligent and I consider Sally not.
*	Sally started running down the street, but only after José started.
*	Sally made Bill laugh, and then José made.
*	Mary came to read Fred’s story, and I also came to.
	John wants to go on vacation, but he doesn’t know when to.
*	We wanted to invite someone, but we couldn’t decide who to.
*	Mary was told to bring something to the party, so she asked Sue what to.
*	We might go on vacation if we can ever figure out when to.
*	Ron wanted to wear a tuxedo to the party, but Caspar couldn’t decide whether to.
	You shouldn’t play with rifles because it’s dangerous to.
*	You shouldn’t play with rifles because to is dangerous.
*	John is being discussed and Sally is being too.
*	I remember John being discussed, but you recall Sally being.
	Sally might have eaten rutabagas, but Holly shouldn’t.
	Mary will read Fred’s story, and Joe will read Holly’s.
	José asks that we go to the meeting, and Sally will tell us when.
*	It’s we go to the meeting, that Sally will tell us when.
	It’s to Mary that Joe said Holly can talk.
	Mary claimed that eat rutabagas, Holly wouldn’t.
	Mary claimed that eaten rutabagas, Holly hasn’t.
	Mary claimed that eating rutabagas, Holly shouldn’t.
	Mary claimed that eating rutabagas, Holly's not.
	Mary claimed that eat rutabagas, Holly wants to.
*	Mary claimed that would eat rutabagas, Holly.
*	Mary claimed that hasn't eaten rutabagas, Holly.
*	Mary claimed that eating rutabagas, Holly started.
*	Mary claimed that eat rutabagas, Holly made me.
*	Mary claimed that have eaten rutabagas, Holly should.
?	Mary claimed that discussed widely, Holly is being.
?	Mary claimed that discussed widely, I remember Holly being.
*	Mary claimed that intelligent, I consider Holly not.
*	Lilly recounted a story to remember because Holly had also recounted a story to.
*?	I reviewed Joe’s attempt to find Holly while you reviewed José’s attempt to.
*?	Mary questioned Joe’s desire to eat rutabagas, but only after I had questioned Sally’s desire to.
*?	Sally explained the attempt to arrest Holly, but only after I haddenied the decision to.
	John didn’t hit a home run, but I know a woman who did.
	That Betsy won the batting crown is not surprising, but that Peter didn't know she did is surprising.
*	Mary came to be introduced by the barkeep and I also came to be.
*	You shouldn’t have played with rifles because to have is dangerous.
??	Ron wanted to be wearing a tuxedo to the party, but Caspar didn’t know whether to be.
*	Lilly recounted a story to be remembered because Holly had recounted a story to be.
	Lilly decided that eating rutabagas, she should be.
*	Lilly decided eating rutabagas, to be.
	Read Fred’s story, I also want to.
*	You shouldn’t play with rifles because play with rifles to is dangerous.
??	Ron wanted to wear a tuxedo to the party, but wear a tuxedo to the party Caspar couldn't decide whether to.
*	Lulamae Barnes recounted a story to remember because remember Holly had recounted a story to.
	Mag Wildwood came to introduce the barkeep but I came (precisely) not to.
	You should unload rifles because not to s is dangerous.
	If Ron knows whether to wear a tuxedo, and Caspar knows whether not to, do they know different things?
	Lulamae recounted a story to remember because Holly had recounted as story not to.
	If I can, I will work on it.
*	I will, if I can work on it.
	Did Harry leave?
	Does Joe sing?
*	A proof that God exist does.
*	A proof that God does exists.
*	I visited every town in every country I had to.
	Every man who said he would buy some salmon did.
	I visited every town I had to.
	I visited every town I had to visit.
	a.Every town in every country I had to I visited.
	Every man who said he would buy some salmon did.
	Every man who said he would buy some salmon did buy some salmon.
	Lilly should buy salmon and Mary should too.
	Lilly should buy salmon and Mary should buy salmon too.
	Joe likes his bar, and Sally does too.
	Joe’s idiosyncracies bother his patrons, and Sally’s idiosyncracies do too.
	Joe likes his bar, and Sally’s patrons do too.
	Joe’s idiosyncracies bother his patrons, and Sally does too.
	Every picture of itself arrived.
	My uncle doesn’t have a spouse but your aunt does and he is lying on the floor.
*	My uncle didn’t buy anything for Christmas, but my aunt did it for him and it was bright red.
	I know which book Max read, and which book Oscar didn’t.
	This is the book of which Bill approves, and this is the one of which he doesn't.
*	I know which book José didn’t read for class, and which book Lilly did it for him.
*	This is the book which Bob reviewed, and this is the one which Fred won't do it.
	I know which book Mag read, and which book Bob said that you hadn't.
?*	I know which book Mag read, and which book Bob asked why you hadn't.
?*	I know which book Mag read, and which book Bob read my report that you hadn't.
?*	I know which book Mag read, and which book Bob discussed after I had.
	Dulles suspected everyone who Angleton did.
*	Dulles suspected everyone who Angleton did it.
*	Dulles suspected everyone who Angleton did so.
	Dulles suspected everyone who Angleton did.
	I know which book Max read, and which book Oscar didn’t.
	Dulles suspected everyone who Angleton did.
	While Bob read Fred, he didn’t Dickens.
	Sally suspected Joe, but he didn’t Holly.
	Although Holly doesn’t, Doc eats rutabagas.
*	Although Mag doesn’t eggplants, Sally eats rutabagas.
?*	Although I don’t know which book Sam did, I do know which book Sally read.
?*	Near everyone Angleton did, Dulles stood.
*	Sally will stand near Mag, but he won’t Holly.
*	While Holly didn’t discuss a report about every boy, she did every girl.
?	I know which woman Fred will stand near, but I don’t know which woman you will.
	Sally will stand near every woman that you will.
	I know which woman Holly will discuss a report about, but I don't know which woman you will.
*	Sam stood near yesterday every one of the women we’d been discussing.
*	Truman visited yesterday you.
*	Truman told the story Bob.
	While Truman didn’t visit me, he did you.
	While Truman didn’t tell me a story, he did Rusty.
	While José won’t talk about Mag, he might about Holly.
	Although Doc might tell it to you, he won’t to me.
	I’m sure I would like him to eat fruit more than I would cookies.
	I think you need to show yourself more than you do anyone else.
?	While I wouldn’t like him to eat cookies, I would fruit.
?	While I think you need to examine yourself, you don’t anyone else.
	While Truman doesn’t want to visit every city, he does Barcelona.
*	While Rusty might leave in order to please Mag, he won’t his father.
*	While Doc might claim that Bob had read his book, he won't the paper.
*	While Perry might switch the TV off, he won’t on.
*	I’ll turn the radio down, but I won’t up.
	Fred likes eggplants, although he likes rutabagas too.
	Although he likes rutabagas too, Fred likes eggplants.
	Fred gave flowers to his sweetie because Frank had.
	China is a country that Joe wants to visit, and he will too, if he gets enough money.
	Jerry wouldn’t read a book by Babel, but Meryl has done so and it was pretty good.
*	I know which book Max read, and which book Oscar hasn’t done so.
*	This is the book of which Bill approves, and this is the one of which he can't do so.
	Joe might wish he had, but this isn’t a country he has visited.
	While I might want to, this is the kind of thing that Harris has already suggested.
	We like our friends and they do too.
	We like our friends and they like our friends too.
	We like our friends and they like their friends, too.
	Rusty talked about himself only after Holly did.
*	Rusty talked about himself only after Mary did talk about himself.
	Rusty talked about himself only after Mary did talk about him.
	I could find no solution, but Holly might.
	Fred talked about everything before Rusty did.
	Fred talked about everything before Rusty did talk about something.
	Joe will go to the store, even though Fred already has.
	Today there is little or no official harassment of lesbians and gays by the national government, although autonomous governments might.
	The candidate was dogged by charges of infidelity and avoiding the draft, or at least trying to.
*	David is a great artist, and when he does, his eyes crinkle at you.
*	The candidate was dogged by charges of infidelity, or at least trying to.
	This information could have been released by Gorbachev, but he chose not to.
	A lot of this material can be presented in a fairly informal and accessible fashion, and often I do.
?	John fired Max, although it was Bill who should have been.
	While Bob read Fred, he didn’t Dickens.
	Wendy is eager to sail around the world and Bruce is eager to climb Kilimanjaro, but neither of them can because money is too tight.
*	John likes not Mary.
	John does not like Mary.
	John often meets Mary.
*	John meets often Mary.
	John tries to often meet Mary.
*	John tries to meet often Mary.
	John tries not to meet Mary.
*	John tries to meet not Mary.
	Is Mary running the marathon?
*	Runs Mary the marathon?
	Mary is often running the marathon.
*	Mary runs often the marathon.
	Mary is not running the marathon.
*	Mary runs not the marathon.
	I didn’t, as Bill had thought, go to the store.
	I did, as Bill had thought, go to the store.
*	I did not, as Bill had thought, go to the store.
	The writers could so believe the boy.
*	The writers so believed the boy.
	The writers did so believe the boy.
*	The writers didn’t so believe the boy.
	Rome destroyed Carthage
	Rome’s destruction of Carthage was horrific.
	John bought the picture of himself that Bill saw.
	The perception of the problem is quite thorough.
	The perception/knowledge of the problem is quite thorough.
*	The problem’s perception is quite thorough.
*	The problem’s knowledge is quite thorough.
*	The problem perceives easily.
*	The problem knows easily.
*	The ship sank to collect the insurance.
	The sinking of the ship was very devious.
	The sinking of the ship to collect the insurance was very devious.
	The ship’s sinking was very devious.
*	The ship’s sinking to collect the insurance was very devious.
	The testing of such drugs on oneself is too risky.
*	This drug’s testing on oneself is too risky.
	The ship was sunk to collect the insurance.
	This drug must first be tested on oneself.
	The president’s moral destruction is complete.
	The moral destruction of the president was certainly not helpful.
	The probable hostile German reaction is unfortunate.
	Mary wants to wear nice blue German dress.
	Tomatoes were introduced in Europe after 1492.
	We rich have impeccable taste.
*	Rich we have impeccable taste.
*	I read three his books.
*	I read every his book
	I read his every book.
	Every boy named a planet.
	I showed every boy a planet.
	Few boys read any of the books.
	I showed few boys any of the books.
*	That few boys came upset any of the teachers.
	I was not reading a book when you came in.
	A boy did not laugh.
	Most boys did not laugh.
	Every boy named Mercury and Venus.
	Every boy named every planet.
	Each student speaks two languages.
	Two students speak each language.
	Some tourists visited all the museums.
	Fond of some boy every girl is.
*	Guinevere has a single bone that is in every corner of the house.
	A critic thinks that every book is readable.
	What books does a critic think are readable?
	Who does he admire?
	He admires every man.
*	What does who admire?
	Who admires what?
	Someone from every city hates it.
	Some professor admires every student.
	Some professor admires every student and hates the dean.
*	You filed every paper without inspecting.
	Everyone reported that Max and some lady disappeared.
	Most guests will be offended if we don’t invite some philosopher.
	All students believe anything that many teachers say.
	Who reported that Max and which lady disappeared?
	Who will be offended if we don’t invite which philosopher?
	Who believes anything that who says?
	Exactly two boys kissed some girl.
	Mary dates exactly two of the men who know a producer I like.
	Every student has to come up with three arguments that show that some condition proposed by Bill is wrong.
	If we invite some philosopher, Max will be offended.
	Three relatives of mine inherited a house.
	If three relatives of mine die, I will inherit a house.
	Everyone attended some seminar.
	Exactly half of the students attended some seminar.
	More than three students attended every seminar.
	Every student attended more than three seminars.
*	Every man surrounded the fort.
	Every man lifted the table.
*	Every man lifted the table together.
	The men surrounded the fort.
	A hundred men surrounded the fort.
	All the men surrounded the fort.
	The men lifted the table together.
	A hundred men lifted the table together.
	All the men lifted the table together.
	Every man lifted a table.
	Each man lifted a table.
	Someone attended every seminar.
	Everyone attended some seminar.
	More than two students attended every seminar.
	Everyone attended more than two seminars.
	You married no one.
	I will force you to marry no one.
*	We voted for me
	We elected me
	Everyone had been worrying himself stiff.
	Everyone who had been worrying himself stiff said that he was relieved.
	There were five tourists in the room apart from myself.
	Physicists like yourself are a godsend.
	Max boasted that the queen invited Lucie and himself for a drink.
	Which pictures of him did Earl see?
	Which pictures of Earl did he see?
	Bill seems to himself to be handsome.
	Bill seems to him to be handsome.
	John will see which picture of himself?
	Old pictures of themselves usually strike the children as amusing.
	Each other’s houses seem to the women to be overdecorated.
	Each other’s houses appear to the women to be overdecorated.
*	Old pictures of themselves convinced the children to pretend to be adults.
*	Each other’s houses proved to the women that they had bad taste.
	These stories about himself worry John more than anything else.
*	These stories about himself describe John better than any official biography.
	Images of themselves seem to have frightened the children.
	Which picture that John took at the party did he decide to display in his house?
	Which report that John revised did he submit?
*	Which report that John was incompetent did he submit?
	Mary has always preferred lemons to limes.
	Lemons are always preferred to limes.
	Mary always prefers lemons to limes.
	Mary always has preferred lemons to limes.
	The dog that the rat bit chased the cat.
*	The cat that the dog that the rat bit chased died.
	Jean never reads this newspaper.
*	Jean reads never this newspaper.














<ROSS 1967>
	A gun which I had cleaned went off.
	A gun went off which I had cleaned.
	I gave a gun which I had cleaned to my brother.
	I gave a gun to my brother which I had cleaned.
	He let the cats which were meowing out.
	He let the cats out which were meowing.
	What did Bill buy?
*	What did Bill buy potatoes and?
*	What did that Bill wore surprise everyone?
*	What dl,d John fall asleep and Bill wear?
	Who did Mary see walking toward the railroad station?
	Whom did Mary see walking toward the railroad station?
	Do you know the boy who Mary saw?
	Do you know the boy whom Mary saw?
	Mary saw the boy walking toward the railroad station.
	The government prescribes the height of the lettering on the covers of the reports.
*	Here is the snowball which I chased the boy who threw at our teacher.
	It is easy to sae how the A-over-A principle
*	Where's the bikini which Tom mentioned the fact that Sue had worn?
*	A proof that the claim had been. made was giver that John had lied.
*	Who did he expect who I was acquainted with to show up?
	Who did he expect to show up who I was acquainted with?
	Whose book did you find?
	He will put the chair between some table and some sofa
*	What table will he put the chair between some table and?
*	What table will he put the chair between and some sofa?
	I know who is mad at John.
	I know a boy who is mad at John.
	I know a boy mad at John.
	John is taller than Dill
	John is taller than Bill is
	I want to go.
	Shaving myself is difficult for me.
	The shock touched off the explosion.
	The shock touched the explosion off.'
	I called almost all of the men from Boston up.
*	I ran a man who was old down.
	I ran an old man down.
*	I'm going to call somebody who is
*	I polished the vase which was from India up.
?	I polished the vase from India up.
	He attributed the fire to a short circuit.
*	He attributed to a short circuit the fire.
	He attributed to a short circuit the fire which
	He threw the letter into the wastebasket.
*	He threw into the wastebasket the letter.
	He threw into the wastebasket the letter
	They dismissed the proposal as too costly.
*	They dismissed as to costly the proposal.
	They dismissed as too costly the proposal for the State to build a sidewalk from Dartmouth to Smith.
	He attributed to a short circuit which was caused by an overloaded transducer the fire which destroyed most of my factory.
	I found to be delicious some fruit which I picked up on the way home.
	I found delicious some fruit which I
?*	The mayor regarded as being absurd the proposal to build a sidewalk from Dartmouth to Smith.
*	I consider to be a fool the senator wh
*	Did that John showed up please you?
	Did the fact that John showed up please you?
?*	That that John showed up pleased her was obvious.
?	That the fact that John showed up pleased
?	*For whether she died to remain unclear would spoil the play.
?*	I want that Bill left to remain a secret.
	I want the fact that Bill left to remain a secret.
	I want it to remain a secret that Bill left.
*	What what I ate cost almost broke me.
	What the thing which I ate cost almost broke me.
	What the thing cost which I ate almost broke me.
*	I went out with a girl who that John showed up pleased.
?	I went out with a girl who the fact that John showed up pleased.
	I went out with a girl who it pleased that John showed up.
	I loaned a man who was watching the race my binoculars.
*	I loaned my binoculars a man who was watching the race.
	She asked a man who was near the window whether it looked like rain.
*	She asked whether it looked like rain a man who was near the window.
*	We called my father, who had just turned 60, up.
?*	We elected my father, who had just turned 60, president
?	All those speeches made my father, who had just turned 60, mad.
*	They gave my father, who had just turned 60, it
	He figured it out.
*	He figured out it.
*	He figured out that.
	He figured Ann out.
?*	He figured out Ann.
	He figured something out.
?	He figured out something.
	He figured the answer out.
	He figured out the answer.
*	I sent him it.
	I sent him that.
?	I sent him Andy.
	I sent him something.
?*	We elected the man who he had brought with him president
?	We made the reports which he had brought with him available.
	They gave the reports which he had
*	He kept company some girls who had been injured in the wreck.
?*	He kept some girls who had been injured in the wreck company
?	He kept some girls company who had been injured in the wreck.
*	I insist on seeing through all the students who had started out the term in my class
?*	I insist in seeing all the students who started out the term in my class through.
	I insist on seeing all the student' through who started out the term in my class.
*	The doctor brought to the passengers who had passed cut from the fumes.
?	The doctor brought the passengers to who had passed out from the fumes.
*	He tries to put on everyone who he doesn't like.
?*	He tries to put everyone who he doesn't like on.
?	He tries to put everyone on who he doesn't like.
*	I watched the Indians who the man who had been my advisor in my freshman year had advised me to study when I got to Utah talk.
	Tom drives as that man does.
	Tom drives like that man.
*	I know a man who Tom drives as drives.
*	I know a man who Tom drives as does.
	I know a man who Tom drives like.
	Tom drives the way that that man drives.
	Toms drives the way that that man does.ee
	John is taller than that man is.
	is taller than that man.e
*	I know a man who John is taller than is.
	I know a man who John is taller than.
	John is as tall as that man is.
	John is as tall as that man.
*	I know a man who John is as tall as is.
	I know a man who John is as tall as.
	Mary has never kissed a man who is taller than John is.
	Mary has never kissed a man who is taller than John.
	Mary has never kissed a Man taller than John.
*	Mary has never kissed a man taller than John is.
?*	Mary has never kissed as tall a man as John is.
	Mary has never kissed as tall a man
	The brave are not afraid to die.
	Drowning cats are hard to rescue.
	Drowning cats is against the law.
*	Drowning cats, which is against the law, are hard to rescue.
	I know a taller man than John.
	When did Bill-promise-to-call me?
	The shooting of the prisoners shocked me.
	He told Peter that I know a taller man than John, but Peter didn't believe it.
	I divulged when Bill promised to call me, but I did
	I'll talk to John on Friday about the report that the shooting of the prisoners shocked me, and to his wife on Saturday.
	I read a statement which was about that man.
	I read a statement about that man.
*	The man who I read a statement which was about is sick
	The man who I read a statement about is sick.
	I read that Bill had seen me.
*	I read that Bill had seen myself.
	Evidence that he was drunk will be presented.
	Evidence will be presented that he was drunk.
	That the defendant had been rude was stoutly denied by his lawyer.
	What I said was that she was lying.
	Bill told me something awful: that ice won't sink.
	Muriel said nothing else than that she had
	This is a hat which I'm going to see to it that my wife buys.
	This is a hat which I'm going to see that my wife buys.
	Phineas knows a girl who is jealous of Maxime.
	Phineas knows a girl who is behind Maxime.
	Phineas knows a girl who is working with Maxime.
*	Who does Phineas know a girl who is jealous of? .
*	Who does Phineas know a girl who is behind?
*	Who does Phineas know a girl who is working with?
*	Who does Phineas know a girl jealous of?
*	Who does Phineas know a girl behind?
*	Who does Phineas know a girl working with?
	I believed the claim that Otto was wearing this hat.
	I believed that Otto was wearing this hat.
*	The hat which I believed the claim that Otto was wearing is red.
	The hat which I believed that Otto was wearing is red.
	Rutherford understands himself.
*	Rutherford is understood. by himself.
*   Himself is understood by Rutherford.
	The man who ordered ice cream said the pudding would be tasty.
	The pudding which the man who ordered
	The man who ordered it said the pudding would be tasty.
*	The pudding which the man who ordered it said would be tasty was a horror show.
	The sheriff denied that gangsters had bribed him.
	That gangsters had bribed him was denied by the sheriff.
*	The money which I am discussing the claim that the company squandered amounts to $400,000.
**	The money which I am discussing Sarah's claim that the company squandered amounts to $400,000.
	The money which I have hopes that the company will squander amounts to $400,000.
	The money which I will have a chance to squander amounts to $400,000.
	The money which I will make a proposal for us to squander amounts to $400,000.
	The money which I will make a proposal that we squander amounts to $400,000.
	I snoozed.
	Sam progressed.
	Bill gave me $40.
	I feel that Arch will show up.
	I took a snooze
	Sam made progress.
	Bill made a gift to me of $40.
	Max gave the car a shove.
	I have a feeling that Arch will show up.
	Bob proved that this set is recursive.
	Bob proved this set is recursive.
	The proof that this set is recursive is difficult.
*	The proof this set is recursive is difficult.
	The proof that this set is recursive is difficult.
*	The proof this set is recursive is difficult.
?	I am making the claim the company squandered the money.
	I have hopes the company will squander the
	I have a feeling the company will squander the money.
*	I made a proposal we squander the money.
	Dick's claim that semantics is generative is preposterous.
	We are discussing their claim that flying saucers are real.
*	Myron is making Suzie's claim that dead is better than red.
	Myron is making the claim that dead is better than red.
?	Myron is making his claim that dead is better than red.
*	I have Tom's feeling that the company will squander the money.
*	Myra took Betty's snooze.
*	Bill made Sarah's gal to me of $40.
*	Max gave the car Levi's shove.
	The man who was arrested by Officer Bob went mad.
	Jack is claiming that you won't need it.
	Jack is claiming you won't need it.
	Jack is making the claim you won't need
*	The claim you won't need it is being made;
	a I read a statement which was about that man.
	I read a statement about that man.
*	The man who I read a statement which was
	The man who I read a statement about is sick.
	You're going to hurt yourself one of these days.
	I spoke to Bill about himself.
*	He said that himself was hungry.
	I know a man who hates me.
*	I know a man who hates myself.
	I read him two statements about himself.
*	I read him Judy's statement about himself.
	I know two men who are behind me.
	I know two men behind me.
*	I know two men behind myself.
	You are too flip with people who are jealous
	I screamed at some children who were watching me.
	I screamed at some children watching me.
?	Which cavern is Billy looking for a road into?
*	What sofa will he put the chair between some table and?
*	What table will he put the chair between and
*	.The lute which Henry plays and sings madrigals is warped.
*	The madrigals which Henry plays the lute and sings sound lousy.
*	The nurse who polished her trombone and the plumber computed my tax was a blond.
*	Which trombone did the nurse polish and?
*	The plumber who the nurse polished her trombone and computed my tax was a hefty fellow.
*	Whose tax did the nurse polish her trombone and the plumber compute?
	Irma washed the dishes, and Sally dried, and Floyd loafed.
	John left, and he didn't even say goodbye.
	I went to the store and bought some whisky.
	I went to the store and Nike bought some whisky.
	Here's the whisky which I went to the store and bought.
	Here's the whisky which I went to the store and Mike bought.
	Tony has a Fiat and yearns for a tall nurse.
*	The tall nurse who Tony has a Fiat and yearns for is cruel to him.
	I went to the movies and didn't pick up the shirts.
*	The shirts which I went to the movies and didn't pick up will cost us a lot of money.
	I went to the store and have bought some excellent whisky.
*	The excellent whisky which I went to the store and have bought was very costly.
	I went to the store to buy some whisky.
*	Tony has a Fiat to yearn for a tall nurse.
*	I went to the movies not to pick the shirts up.
*	I went to the movies to not pick the shirts up.
*	I went to the store to have bought some whisky.
	She's gone and ruined her dress now.
	I've got to try and find that screw.
	Aunt Hattie wants you to be nice and kiss your granny.
	The screw which I've got to try and find holds the frammis to the myolator.
	Which granny does Aunt Hattie want me to be nice and kiss?
	The boy works in a skyscraper and the girl works in a quonset hut.
	The boy works in a skyscraper and the girl in a quonset hut.
*	Which boy works in a skyscraper and the girl in a quonset hut?
*	The skyscraper which the boy works in and
*	The girl who the by works in a skyscraper and in a quonset but has a dimple on her nose.
*	Which quonset hut does the boy work in a skyscraper and the girl in?
	The luscious chick who Billy went to the movies with will wed me ere the morn.
*	The luscious chick who Billy and went to the movies will wed me ere the morn.
*	The Ferrari which Pietro bought from me and Sofia adores him cost him a bundle.
	The Ferrari which Pietro, who Sofia adores, bought from me cost him a bundle.
	Sally might be pregnant, and everyone believes Sheila definitely is pregnant.
	Sally might be, and everyone believes Sheila definitely is, pregnant.
	Tom picked these grapes, and I washed these grapes, and Suzie will prepare these grapes.
	Tom picked, and I washed, and Suzie will prepare, these grapes.
	Tom picked these grapes, and I washed some turnips, and Suzie will prepare these grapes.
*	Tom picked, and I washed some turnips, and Suzie will prepare, these grapes.
	Students who fail the final exam or who do not do the reading will be executed.
	Students who fail the final exam will be executed or students who do not do the
	reading will be executed.
	John has been captured by the cops and I'm afraid he'll talk.
	I heated up the coffee and Sally wiped the
	That Peter showed up is a miracle and it is doubtful that he'll ever come again.
*	I claimed it that Bob was a nut.
	Although Bob may not be a nut, many people have claimed it and I think so too.
*	Although Bob may not be a nut, many people have claimed and I think so too.
	When did you get back and what did you bring me?
	Make yourself comfortable.
	Did Merv show up and did you play chess?
*	Sally's sick and what did you bring me?
*	Make yourself comfortable and I got sick.
*	What are you eating or did you play chess ?
*	Which boy and the girl embraced?
*	I'm hungry and did you play chess?
	Who ate what?
	What exploded when?
	Who gave what to whom?
	Where did you go and who ate what?
	What exploded when'md who was hurt?
	How long did this fit of generosity last
*	I saw you there and who ate what?
*	What exploded when and I warned you it would?
	If you make yourself comfortable, I'll wash the dishes.
	Please make yourself comfortable and I'll wash the dishes.
	You please make yourself comfortable and I'll wash the dishes.
	Harry will be in the Marines next year and Herman was drafted last night.
	Sasha is gobbling down blintzes faster than I can reheat them.
	I want to peruse that contract before filing
	Fred tore the curtain in roiling it up.
??	The blintzes which Sasha is gobbling down faster than I can reheat are extremely tasty, if I do say so.
?	I suspect that the contract which I wanted to peruse before filing away may have some loopholes.
	The curtain which Fred tore in rolling up was the kind gift of my maternal Aunt Priscilla.
	I want to peruse that contract before damaging it while filing it .away.
?	The contract which I want to peruse before damaging while filing away is written on Peruvian papyrus.
?	I want to peruse that contract after copying it by treating it in milk while pressing it between two pieces of marble in flattening it out.
?	*The contract which I want to peruse after copying by treating in milk while pressing between two pieces of marble in flattening out is a beautiful piece of art.
	Sasha is gobbling down blintzes faster than I can reheat the fishballs.
	I want to peruse that contract before filing away the deed.
	Fred tore the curtain in rolling up the
*	I think Anita may have poisoned the fishballs which Sasha is gobbling down blintzes faster than I can reheat.
*	The deed which I want to peruse that contract before filing away is probably a forgery.
?	*The wallpaper which Fred tore the curtain in rolling up had a pleasing geometrical pattern.
	The blintzes which Sasha is gobbling down faster than I can reheat the fishballs are extremely tasty, if I do say so.
	I suspect that the contract which I want to peruse before filing away the deed may some loopholes.
	The curtain which Fred tore in rolling the wallpaper up was the kind gift of my maternal Aunt Priscilla.
	The blintzes which Sasha is gobbling down faster than I can reheat them are extremely tasty, if I do say so.
?	I suspect that the contract which I wanted to peruse before filing it away may have some loopholes.
?	The curtain which Fred tore in rolling it up was the kind gift of my maternal Aunt Priscilla.
	The government prescribes the height of the lettering on the covers of the reports.
	Reports which the government prescribes the height of the lettering on the covers of are invariably boring.
	Reports the covers of which the government prescribes the height of the lettering on almost always put me to sleep.
	Reports the lettering on the covers of which the government prescribes the height of are a shocking waste of public funds.
	Reports the height of the lettering on the covers of which the government prescribes should be abolished.
*	Reports of which the government prescribes the height of the Lettering on the covers are invariably boring.
*	Reports on the covers of which the government prescribes the height of the lettering almost alway put me to sleep.
*	Reports of the lettering on the covers of which the government prescribes the height are shocking waste of public funds.
	He has books by several Greek authors.
	Which Greek authors does he have books by?
?*	By which Greek authors does he have books?
*	The boy who I watched Bill and was vain.
*	The boy Bill and who I watched was vain.
	They will give me a hat which I know that I won't like.
*	They will give me a hat that I won't like which I know.
	The boy whose guardian's employee we elected president ratted on us.
*	The boy whose guardian's we elected employer president ratted on us.
*	The boy whose we elected guardian's guardian's employer president ratted on us.
	I'm going to ask Bill to make the old geezer take up these points later.
	These points I'm going to ask Bill to make the old geezer take up later.
	The boy's guardians' employer we elected president.
*	The boy's guardian's we elected employer president.
*	The boy's we elected guardian's employer president.
	We elected president the boy's guardian's employer.
*	We elected employer president the boy's guardian's.
*	We elected guardian's employer president the boy.
	Which boy's guardian's employer did we elect president?.
*	Which boy's guardian's did we elect employer president?
*	Which boy's did we elect guardian's employer president?
	How sane is Peter?
*	How have you picked up TNT carelessly?
	How carelessly have you picked up TNT?
	Sheila married that tall a man.
	How tall a man did Sheila marry?
*	How tall did Sheila marry a man?
*	How did Sheila marry tall a man?
	On which bed does Tom sleep?
	The bed on which Tom slept was hard.
	Which bed did Tom sleep on?
	The bed which Tom slep on was hard.
	My sister arrived at a time when no buses were running, and my brother arrived at a time when no buses were running too.
	Jack disappeared in a mysterious manner and Marian disappeared in a mysterious manner too.
	I live at the place where Route 150 crosses Scrak River and my dad lives at the place where Route 150 crosses Scrak River too.
*	My sister arrived at a time when no buses were running and my brother arrived at one too.
*	Jack disappeared in a mysterious manner and Marion disappeared in one too.
*	I live at the place where Route 150 crosses Scrak River and my dad lives at it too.
*	What time did you arrive at?
*	The manner which Jack disappeared in was creepy.
*	The place which I live at is the place where Route 150 crosses Scrak River.
	The only relatives who I'd like to do away with are my aunts.
	Who is she trying to make up to now?
	That meeting I'd like to sit in on.
*	The only relatives with whom I'd like to do away are my aunts.
*	To whom is she trying to make up now?
*	On that meeting I'd like to sit in.
?	The abuse with which she puts up is phenomenal.
	For whose rights do you expect me to speak up?
	One plan which I got wind of was calculated to keep us in suspense.
	Did you notice which difficulties she made.
	Who are you trying to get hold of?
*	One plan of which I got wind was calculated to keep us in suspense.
?*	Did you notice of which difficulties she made light?
*	Of whom are you trying to get hold?
	The only offer of which I plan to take advantage will give me an eleven-month paid vacation.
?	In the countries of which I've been keeping track, the existing political systems are fantastically corrupt.
	The scenes to which the censors took objection had to do with the mixed marriage of a woman and a giant panda.
	Advantage will be taken of his offer.
	His offer will be taken advantage of.
?	In this experiment, track must be kept of
	In this experiment, fourteen variables must be kept track of simultaneously.
	Objection was taken to the length of our skirts.
?	The length of our skirts was taken objection to.
*	Wind was gotten of a plot to.negotiate an honorable end to the war in Vietnam.
	A plan to negotiate an honorable end to the war in Vietnam was gotten wind of.
*	Light was made of her indiscretions.
	Her indiscretions were made light of.
*	Hold has been gotten of some rare old manuscripts
	Some rare old manuscripts have been gotten hold of.
	Use was made of Sikolsky's pigeon-holing lemma.
?	The lemma of which I will make use is due to Sikolsky.
	Tabs were kept on all persons entering the station.
??	The persons on whom we kept tabs all proved to be innocent.
*	Faith was had in all kinds of people.
?	The only representative in whom I have faith is still in the Bahamas.
	Mike talked to my friends about politics yesterday.
	My friends Mike talked to about politics yesterday.
	To my friends Mike talked about politics yesterday.
	Mike talked about politics yesterday to my friends.
*	Mike talked to about politics yesterday my friends.
?	They got wind, eventually, of the counterplot to fluoridate the bagels.
?	Carrie did away, systematically, with her nephews from Chattanooga.
??	She made light, not too surprisingly, of the difficulties we might have at the border.
?	I got hold, fortunately, of Lady Chatterley's ex.
	I gave to the officer in charge the blackjack. which I had found in the cookie jar.
	I am confident of, and my boss depends on, a successful outing at the track.
*	The University's students are intelligent and faculty is committed to freedom.
	The boy's uncle and aunt were kissing.
*	The boy whose uncle and Tom's aunt's grandmother were kissing uas furious.
	Who are you gawking at?
	Which hat do you believe (that) she never wore?
	The reporters expected that the principal would fire some teacher.
	That the principal would fire some teacher was expected by the reporters.
	It was expected by the reporters that the principal would fire some teacher.
	The teacher who the reporters expected that the principal would fire is a crusty old battleax.
*	The teacher who that the principal would fire was expected by the reporters is a crusty old battleax.
	The teacher who it was expected by the reporters that the principal woLad fire is a crusty old battleax.
*	The hat which that I brought seemed strange to the nurse was a fedora.
?	The nurse who that I brought this hat
	I disliked the boy's playing the piano loudly.
	The boy whose loud playing of the piano I disliked was a student.
*	The boy whose playing the piano loudly I disliked was a student.
?	The piano which I disliked the boy's loud playing of was badly out of tune.
	The piano which I disliked the boy's playing loudly was badly out of tune.
	The boy's loud playing of the piano drove everyone crazy.
	The boy's playing the piano loudly drove everyone crazy
?	That piano, which the boy's loud playing of drove everyone crazy, was badly out of tune.
	That piano, the boy's loud playing of which drove everyone crazy, was badly out of tune.
*	That piano, the boy's playing which loudly drove everyone crazy, was badly out of tune.
*	That piano, which the boy's playing loudly drove everyone crazy, was badly out of tune.
*	Did that he played the piano surprise you?
*	Would for him to have played the piano have surprised you?
*	Is whether he played the piano known?
	Did his having played the piano surprise you?
	Mike quipped that she never wore this hat.
*	Mike quipped she never wore this hat.
*	Which hat did Mike quip that she never wore?
*	Which girl did Mike quip never wore this hat?
*	I dislike it for him.to tickle myself.
*	I dislike his tickling myself.
	For Anna to tickle him drives Frank crazy.
	Anna's tickling him drove Frank crazy.
	We donated wire for the convicts to build cages with.
	They are investigating all people owning parakeets.
*	The cages which we donated wire for the convicts to build with are strong.
*	What kind cf parakeets are they investigating all people owning?
	It appears to be true that Harry likes girls.
	This is the dog that chased the cat that caught the rat that ate the cheese.
	Ivan figured it out that the bridge would hold.
*	Her efficient looking of the answer up pleased the boss.
	Her efficient looking up of the answer pleased the boss.
	She did away with her father.
*	She did with her father away.
*	That it was obvious is not true that Bob was lying.
	It is not true that that Bob was lying was obvious.
	A proof was given that the claim that John had lied had been made.
*	A proof that the claim had been made was given that John had lied.
*	That Sam didn't pick those packages up is possible which are to be mailed tomorrow.
?*	That Sam didn't pick those packages which are to be mailed tomorrow up is possible.
*	It is possible that Sam didn't pick those packages which are to be mailed tomorrow up.
	That Sam didn't pick those packages up which are to be mailed tomorrow is possible.
	It is possible that Sam didn't pick those packages up which are to be mailed tomorrow.
	Which packages is it possible that Sam didn't pick up which are to be mailed tomorrow?
	Sam didn't pick those packages up which are to be mailed tomorrow until it had stopped raining.
	Sam picked those packages up which are to be mailed tomorrow rest might, but he didn't want to do so until it had stopped raining.
?*	Sam didn't pick those packages up until it had stopped raining which are to be mailed tomorrow.
	Which packages which are to be mailed tomorrow is it possible that Sam didn't pick up until it had stopped raining?
*	Which packages is it possible that Sam didn't pick up which are to be mailed tomorrow until it had stopped raining?
*	Which packages didn't Sam pick up which are to be mailed tomorrow until'it had stopped raining?
	A girl came in who had worn this coat.
*	The coat which a girl came in who had worn was torn.
	That that for Herschel to throw a fit would confuse the guards was obvious is not true.
	It is not true that that for Herschel to throw a fit would confuse the guards was obvious.
	It is not true that it was obvious that for Herschel to throw a fit would confuse the guards.
	That that it would confuse the guards for Herschel to throw a fit was obvious is not true.
	It is not true that that it would confuse the guards for Herschel to throw a fit was obvious.
	That it was obvious that it would confuse the guards for Herschel to throw a fit is not true.
	It is not true that it was obvious that it would confuse the guards for Herschel to throw a fit.
	A review of this article came out yesterday.
	A review came out yesterday of this article.
	A review seems to have come out yesterday of this article.
	Why don't you pick some review up of this article?
	Ann is going to send a picture of Chairman Mao to her teacher, as soon as she gets home.
	Ann is going to send a picture to her teacher of Chairman Mao, as soon as she gets home.
*	Which picture is Ann going to send to her teacher of Chairman Mao as soon as she gets home?
*	Who is Ann going to send a picture to her teacher of, as soon as she gets home?
	That a review came out yesterday of this article is catastrophic.
*	That a review came out yesterday is catastrophic of this article.
	I'll give some to my good friend from Akron.
*	I'll give to my good friend from Akron some.
	I promised that he would be there around midnight.
	Around midnight I promised that he would be there.
	I promised that he would be there tomorrow.
	Tomorrow I promised chat he would be there.
	I promised that tomorrow he would be there.
	I promised that around midnight he would be there.
	Beans I don't like.
	Proud of him I've never been.
	Beans I don't think you'll be able to convince me Harry has ever tasted in his life.
	It was tomorrow that I promised that he would be there.
	It is beans that I don't like.
?*	It is proud of him that I have never been.
	It is beans that I don't think you'll be able to convince me Harry has ever tasted in his life.
	Do you think that he sometimes went there alone?
*	I won't have some money.
	I won't ask you to believe that he tried to force me to give her some money.
	That he sometimes went there alone is certain.
	Do you believe that somebody was looking for something?
	Do you believe the claim that somebody was looking for something?
	I never met that man who somebody tried to kill.
	I won't have any money.
	I won't ask you to believe that he tried to force me to give her any money.
*	I will ask you to believe that he tried to force me to give her any money.
	Do you think that he ever went there alone?
	That he ever went there alone is odd
*	I never met that man who anybody tried to kill.
	Tom told somebody that he wasn't sick.
	That Sam sometimes didn't sleep must have pleased somebody.
	Buffy couldn't do 100 pushups and somebody laughed.
*	Tom told anybody that he wasn't sick.
*	That Sam sometimes didn't sleep must have pleased anybody.
*	Buffy couldn't do 100 pushups and anybody laughed.
	I believe that the sun was out.
	I believed that the sun was out.
	I believed that the sun is out.
*	That the sun is out was obvious.
	That I believed that the sun was out is obvious.
	That I believed that the sun is out is obvious.
	That Jack sometimes slept is impossible.
	That Jack ever slept is impossible.
*	That Jack ever slept is possible.
*	I talked to Winston about Winston
*	I talked to Winston about him
	I talked to Winston about himself
*	That the sun is out was obvious.
	That the sun was out was obvious.
	John scratched his arm and so did Mary
	John scratched his arm and Mary did too
	Mary scratched her arm too.
	Mary scratched John's arm too.
	John scratched his arm and the boy who knew Mary scratched her arm.
	John scratched his arm and the boy who Mary knew did so too.
	That the fuzz wanted him worried John but it didn't worry Mary.
	That the fuzz wanted him worried John, but that the fuzz wanted her didn't worry Mary.
	That the fuzz wanted him worried John, but that the fuzz wanted John didn't worry Mary.
	That the police wanted him worried Johns but it didn't worry the boy who Mary knew.
*	John is prouder of having gone than nobody expected me to believe he would be.
*	John is prouder of having gone than John didn't expect me to believe he would be.
*	John is prouder of having gone than John expected nobody to believe he would be.
*	John is prouder of having gone than John expected me not to believe he would be.
*	John is prouder of having gone than than John expected me to believe not all.
*	John is prouder of having gone than John expected me to believe that he wasn't.
	John is prouder of having gone than people who don't know him would expect me to believe he would be.
	John is prouder of having gone than Sally expected Joan to believe that the man who didn't shave would be.
	John is prouder of having gone than I expected you to believe he would be of not having fallen asleep.
	Tom knows it and Dick knows it and Harry knows it.
	Tom washed the car, and Dick waxed the car.
	Tom ordered bacon, and Dick ordered lettuce, and Harry ordered tomatoes.
	Tom, Dick, and Harry know it.
	Tom washed, and Dick waxed, and Harry polished the car.
	Tom, Dick, and Harry ate, drank, and sang,
	Tom ordered bacon, and Dick lettuce, and Harry tomatoes.
	Tom ordered bacon, and Dick ordered lettuce, and I think that Harry ordered tomatoes.
*	Tom ordered bacon, and Dick lettuce, and I think that Harry tomatoes.
	Joe is taller than Mary is.
	Joe is taller than Mary.
	Joe is taller than I think Mary is.
*	Joe is taller than I think Mary.
	Mike will sing if you will sing.
	Mike will sing if you will.
	Jim will go if he feels good.
	If Jim feels good, he will go.
	I gave the book to Harvey because he asked me to.
	It never occurred to Harvey that I might want to leave because he is insensitive to other people's desires.
*	It never occurred to Harvey because he is insensitive to other people's desires that, I might want to leave
	. I figured it out that she was lying.
	I explained it to Bill that she was lying.
	I took it for granted that she was lying.
	I regret it exceedingly that she was lying.
	He'll bring me a hotdog if he sees one.
*	He'll bring me one if he sees a hotdog.
	If he sees a hotdog, he'll bring me one.
	If he sees one; he'll bring me a hotdog.
*	Seven more soldiers came in after ten ones had left.
*	Seven more ones came in after ten soldiers
*	After ten soldiers had left, seven more ones came in.
*	After ten ones had left, seven more soldiers
	Seven more soldiers came in after ten had left.
*	Seven more came in after ten soldiers had left.
	After ten had left, seven more soldiers came in.
	Harry believes that Sally is innocent, although no one else believes it.
*	Harry believes it, although no one else believes that Sally is innocent.
	Although no one else believes that Sally is innocent, Harry believes it.
	Although no one else believes it, Harry believes that Sally is innocent.
	Webster touched a sword after Henry had done it
*	Webster did it after Henry had touched a sword.
	After Henry had touched a sword, Webster did it
	After Henry had done it, Webster touched a sword.
	If so, I've lost $500
*	If it, I've lost $500
	Harry thinks that Sally is innocent, although no one else thinks so.
*	Harry thinks so, although no one else thinks Sally is innocent.
	Although no one else thinks that Sally is innocent, Harry thinks so.
	Although no one else thinks so, Harry thinks that Sally is innocent.
	Webster touched a sword after Henry had done so.
*	Webster did so after Henry had touched
	After Henry had touched a sword, Webster did so.
	After Henry had done so, Webster touched
	I'll work on it if I can work on it
	I'll work on it if no one else has worked on it
	I'll work on it if no one else has worked on it
	I'll work on it if Sam will be working on it
	I'll work on it if I can
	I'll work on it if you do
	I'll work on it if no one else had
	I'll work on it if Same will be too
	I'll work on it if I can.
*	I will if I can work on it.
	If I can work on it, I will.
	If I can, I will work on it.
	The boy who Mary loves hates her.
	The man who ordered a hot dog got one.
	Tom says that it's going to rain but I don't believe it.
	He said he would leave and now he's done it.
	I think that Mort's a swell guy, and Lenny thinks so too.
	Why can't the man who usually cuts the grass do so today?
	Mickey and Roger have signed, and Whitey will tomorrow.
	These shoes won't fit into the trunk they're next to.
	Ronald scoffs at the belief that he would run if nominated.
	Romeo conceded that he and Juliet were going steady.
	I lost a Japanese slide-rule, and the fact that Peter now has one I regard with suspicion.
	The earth is flat, but will all those who don't believe it please raise their hands?
	Pilots who can fly barrel rolls say that for me to try to do it in a glider would be hazardous.
	The passengers who had known that the train was not on fire said that those who had thought so had barricaded themselves in the bathrooms.
	Playing with matches is; lots of fun, but doing, so and emptying gasoline from one can to another at the same time is a sport best reserved for pyromaniacs.
	Swimming is fun, and I believe that people who can't should be taught to.
	How brave he is!
	How surprisingly well he dances!
*	Whether he left!
*	Why he knows tne answer!
*	Which boy is tall!
	How brave everybody must think you expect me to believe he is!
*	How brave I know a boy who is!
*	How brave they must believe the claim that you are!
	How brave they must believe that you are!
*	How brave he is tall and!
*	How brave Mike is cowardly and Sam is!
*	How brave that Tom is must be believed!
	How he is brave!
	Bill left when everyone will believe that the police have forced me to confess that I shot Sandra.
*	Bill left when I am looking at a girl who vomited.
	Bill left when I believe (*the claim) ( ?that) the bomb had just exploded.
	When I am awake and Susan is asleep, Bill will leave.
*	When I am awake at that time and Susan is asleep, Bill will leave.
	, a. *Bill left when that no one else was awake
	Bill left when it is certain that no one else was awake.
	Here's a knife for you to cut up the onions with.
*	I brought a razor to shave himself with.
*	I brought a razor to shave myself with.
	I brought a razor with which to shave myself.
*	I brought a razor with which to shave himself.
*	I brought John a razor to shave himself with
*	I brought John a razor to shave myself with
	I brought John a razor with which to shave himself
*	I brought John a razor with which to shave myself
*	Here's a knife which for you to cut up the onions with
*	Here's a knife with which for you to cut up the onions.
	Here's a plate for you to make Bob try to begin to force his sister to leave the cookies on.
?	Here's a knife for you to say that you cut up the onions with.
*	Here's a knife for you to say was on the table.
*	Here's a pole for you to kiss the girl who tied the string around.
*	Here's a razor for you to chop up these nuts with this cleaver and.
*	Here's a razor for that you will be shaved with to be announced
??	Here's a razor for it to be announced that you will be slaved with.
?	I loaned Maggie a Swiss Army knife with whose corkscrew to open the padlock.
*	I loaned Maggie a Swiss Army knife whose to open the padlock with corkscrew.
	Fluffy is sick, which few people realize.
	Fluffy is sick, which I'm not sure you know Sarah expects me to believe Joan realizes.
	(b.27) a. *Fluffy is sick, which I slapped a boy who wouldn't acknowledge.
	Fluffy is sick, which I believe that few people realize.
*	Fluffy is sick, which I fell asleep and Tom suddenly realized.
*	Fluffy is sick, which that no one here realizes is certain
	Fluffy is sick, which it is certain that no one here realizes.
	Fluffy is sick, which nobody knows
*	Fluffy is sick, as nobody knows
	Fluffy is sick, which not everybody knows
	Fluffy is sick, as not everybody knows
	Fluffy is sick, which surprises me knows
*	Fluffy is sick, as surprises me
	It was this hat that Tom said Al thought you wanted me to make Jack put on.
	What Tom said Al thought you wanted me to make Jack put on was this hat.
	This hat Tom said Al thought you wanted me to make Jack put on.
*	It is this hat that I know the boy who is wearing.
	It is this hat that I believe that he was wearing.
*	What I know the boy who was wearing is this hat.
	What I believe that he was wearing is this hat.
*	This hat I know the boy who was wearing.
	This hat I believe that he was wearing.
*	What the gloves and were on the table was this hat.
*	This hat the gloves and were on the table.
*	It is this hat that that he was wearing is certain.
	It is this hat that it is certain that he was wearing.
*	What that he was wearing is certain is this hat.
	What it is certain that he was wearing is this hat.
*	This hat that he was wearing is certain.
	This hat it is certain that he was wearing.
*	It was John's that I stole bike.
*	The one whose I stole bike was John's.
*	John's I stole bike.
	Maxwell isn't the doctor that his father was.
	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that his father was.
	Maxwell is the man who won the Nobel Prize for horoscopy.
*	Maxwell isn't half the doctor.
	Maxwell is quite the doctor.
	Maxwell is quite a doctor.
	Maxwell isn't much of a doctor.
	Maxwell is more of a doctor than his son is.
*	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that was here.
*	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that polished off the vodka.
*	Half the doctor that Maxwell's father was sat down
	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that feared Marge would realize Tom had confessed that he knew Bill expected him to be.
*	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that I know an African chief who is.
	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that people around here believe that his father was.
*	Maxxwell isn't half the doctor that his sister is a psychologist and his father was.
*	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that that he would be if he studied is certain.
	Maxwell isn't half the doctor that I'm certain that he would be if he studied.
	He's the happiest that I've ever seen him.
	The hardest that it ever snowed was last January 12th.
	He's the happiest that any of my friends could estimate anybody would expect you to believe that I've ever seen him.
	The hardest that I think I remember him ever telling me that he had heard of it snowing around here was last January 12th.
*	He's the happiest that we ever talked to the boy who had seen him.
	He's the happiest that I believe that he's ever been
*	The hardest that I ever knew a man who said that it had snowed was last January 12th.
	The hardest that I believe that it ever snowed was last January 12th.
*	He's the happiest that I've ever seen him drunk and.
*	The hardest that all the power lines were down and it snowed was last January 12th.
*	He is the happiest that that he has ever been is believed.
	He is the happiest that it is believed that he has ever been.
*	The hardest that that it has snowed here is believed was last January 12th.
	The hardest that it is believed that it has ever snowed here was last January 12th.
*	A friend of mine and a girl who was from his home town met in Vienna who was working in Europe.
*	A friend of mine who was working in Europe and a girl met in Vienna who was from his home town.
*	It and that he loved another was painfully evident that she loved him.
*	That she loved him and it was painfully evident that he loved another.
	Mary and an old friend who comes from Miami kissed.
*	Mary and kissed an old friend who comes from Miami.
	I gave a picture of a covered bridge and a hundred hikers from Hoboken to my sister.
*	I gave a picture of a covered bridge and to my sister a hundred hikers from Hoboken.
	Joan plays a wonderful old guitar from Spain and sings folksongs.
*	Joan plays and sings folksongs a wonderful old guitar from Spain.
	Sally might be pregnant, and I know a girl who definitely is pregnant.
?*	Sally might be, and I know a girl who definitely is pregnant.
	Sally might be pregnant, and I believe the laim that Sheila definitely is pregnant
	Sally might be pregnant, and I believe that Sheila definitely is pregnant
?	Sally might be, and I believe that Sheila definitely is, pregnant.
	The younger woman might have been tall and blond, and the older one definitely was blond.
**	The younger woman might have been tall and, and the older one definitely was, blond.
	Sally is tall, and may be blond, and Sheila is short, and definitely is, blond.
?*	Sally is tall, and may be, and Sheila is short, and definitely is, blond.
	Hank plays the guitar and finds arrangements for all the old folksongs which are still sung in these hills, and Ernie writes down all the old folksongs which are still sung in these hills.
??	Hank plays the guitar and finds arrangements for, and Ernie writes down, all the old folksongs which are still sung in these hills.
	They said that Tom had gone home, and he had gone home
	They said that Tom would pay up and he did pay up
	They said that Tom would pay up and he will pay up
	They said that Tom was working, and he is working.
?	They said that Tom had gone home, and gone home he has.
	They said that Tom would pay up, and pay up he did.
	They said that Tom would pay up, and pay up he will.
	They said that Tom was working, and working he is.
	They said Tom would pay up, and pay up I'm sure everybody will tell you that his lawyers expect me to believe he did.
	They said nobody would pay up, but I know a boy who did pay up.
*	They said nobody would pay up, but pay up I know a boy who did.
	They said that Tom would pay up, and pay up I believe that he did.
	They said that Tom wouldn't pay up, but he did go to the bank, and he did pay up.
	They said that Tom wouldn't pay up, but pay up he did go to the bank and he did.
*	They said that Tom would pay up, and pay up that he did is well-known.
	They said that Tom would pay up, and pay up it is well-known that he did.
	Although Dick is handsome, I'm still going marry Herman.
	Handsome though Dick is, I'm still going to marry Herman.
	Handsome though everyone expects me to try to force Bill to make Mom agree that Dick is, I'm still going to Marry Herman.
*	Handsome though I know several boys who are, I'm still going to marry Herman.
	Handsome though I believe that Dick is, I'm still going to marry Herman.
*	Handsome though Dick is fair, Nordic, strong and, I'm still going to marry Herman.
*	Handsome though that Dick will be is likely, I'm still going to marry Herman.
	Handsome though it is likely that Dick will be, I'm still going to marry Herman.
	The more contented we pretended to be, the more we grew angry at the doctors.
?	The more contented the nurses began to try to persuade us to pretend to be, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
*	The more contented I laughed at the nurse who thought that we were becoming, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
??	The more contented the nurses began to believe that we were going to pretend to be, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
*	The more contented we pretended to be better fed and, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
*	The more contented for us to pretend to be became possible, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
?	The more contented it became possible for us to pretend to be, the more angry we grew at the doctors.
	I have some papers to grade.
?*	I have some papers to announce that I've got to grade.
	I have some papers to try to finish grading.
	I have to grade some papers.
	I have to try to finish grading some papers.
	I have getting into college to consider.
*	I have some papers to grade these exams and.
*	I have some voice exercises to play the guitar and sing.
*	I have John's to grade paper.
	Wilt is taller than I imagine anybody would ever guess that people had begun expecting Red to announce that he was.
	The sofa was longer than the desk was.
	The sofa was longer than the desk was long.
*	Willy is taller than I know a boy who is.
	Wilt is taller than I believe that Bill is.
*	Willy is taller than Bill is strong and.
*	Dean drank more booze than Frank ate Wheaties and Sammy drank.
*	Willy is taller than that Bill is is generally believed.
	Wilt is taller than it is generally believed that Bill is.
	Willy is taller than Bill by 7 millimeters.
	The raise which Scrooge generously gave Tom's father increased his yearly salary by five cents.
	The hare outran the tortoise by so much that he forgot the latter was even in the race any more.
	Who knew Mickey would overthrow home plate by that much?
	Willy is taller than Bill by that much.
	John is taller than Bill by that much.
	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as Joe is taller than the Dan.
	The objects of the preposition can also be compared, as is the case
	Willy is taller than Bill by more than Joe is taller than Dan.
	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as everybody seems to expect me to admit to having publicly proclaimed that I believed
*	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as I know a boy who thinks that Bill is taller than Dan.
	Willy is taller than Bill by as much a Peter believes that Billy is taller than Dan.
*	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as I watch all the games and I know Billy is taller than Dan.
*	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as that Bill is taller than Dan is believed.
	Willy is taller than Bill by as much as it is believed that Joe is taller than Dan.
?	The rock was too heavy for me to pick it up.
	The rock was too heavy for me to pick up.
	This rock is too heavy for me to begin to decide about helping Bob to try to pick it up.
??	This rock is too heavy for me to begin to decide about helping Bob to try to pick up.
*	This rock is too heavy for us to try to claim that we picked up.
	Sodium is a little too peppy for me to want to try mixing it and water in a teacup.
*	Sodium is a little too peppy for me to want to try mixing and water in a teacup.
*	That piece of ice is too big for for him to be able to pick up with a teaspoon to be likely.
??	That piece of ice is too big for it to be likely for him to be able to pick up with a teaspoon.
	Bob is too thin for me to be able to squeeze into his jacket.
*	Bob is too thin for me to be able to squeeze into jacket.
	This rock is light enough for Marcia to pick it up.
	This rock is light enough for Marcia to pick up.
	The socks are ready for you to put them on.
	The socks are ready for you to put on.
	The socks are ready for you to go about beginning to put them on.
?	The socks are ready for you to go about beginning to put on.
	The socks are ready for you to announce that you will put them on.
*	The socks are ready for you to announce that you will put on.
	The socks are ready for you to try them and the garters on.
*	The socks are ready for you to try and the garters on.
	John is ready for you to inspect his bunk.
*	John is ready for you to inspect bunk.
*	The socks are ready for for you to put on to be planned.
*	The socks are ready for it to be planned for you to put on.
	It is difficult to play sonatas on this violin.
	It is easy to play sonatas on this violin.
	It is tough to play sonatas on this violin.
	Sonatas are difficult to play on this violin.
	Sonatas are easy to play on this violin.
	Sonatas are tough to play on this violin.
	This violin is easy to play sonatas on.
	This violin is tough to play sonatas on.
	This violin is difficult to play sonatas on.
	. I made John easy to get along with.
	I made it easy to get along with John.
	John tries to be easy to get along with.
*	John tried Bill to play checkers.
*	John tried for Bill to play checkers.
*	My mother is easy to please my father and.
*	Bill would be easy for for you to chat with in Moscow to become expensive.
*	.Bill would be easy for it to become expensive for you to chat with in Moscow.
	My father, he's Armenian, and my mother, she's Greek.
*	That my father, he's lived here all his life is well known to those cops.
*	If my father, he comes home late, my mother always grills him.
*	It started to rain after Jackie and me, we had finally gotten to our seats.
?*	I acknowledged that my father, he was tight as a hoot-owl.
	I said that my father, he was tight as a hoot-owl.
?	If my father, he comes late, my mother, she always grills him.
*	That beans he likes is now obvious.
*	I'm going to write to the Game Warden if more than one deer my neighbor brings back.
*	I don't know the boy who the flowers Mary gave to.
*	I don't know the boy the flowers who Mary gave to.
?	The CIA claims that informers they never use.
*	That informers they never use is claimed by the CIA
	My father, I hardly ever see him and my mother when they're not glaring at each other,
	This guitar, I've sung folksongs and accompanied myself on it all my life.
	Poor Bill, it had started to rain and he had no umbrella.
	My father, that he's lived here all his life is well-known to the cops.
	My wife, somebody stole her handbag last night.
	The cops spoke to the janitor about that robbery yesterday.
	They spoke to the janitor about that robbery yesterday, the cops.
	The cops spoke to him about that robbery yesterday, the janitor.
	The cops spoke to the janitor about it yesterday, that robbery.
	That they spoke to the janitor about that robbery yesterday, the cops, is terrible.
	That the cops spoke to the janitor about it yesterday, that robbery, is terrible.
?*	That they spoke to the janitor about that robbery yesterday is terrible, the cops.
?*	That the cops spoke to the janitor about it yesterday is terrible, that robbery.
*	They let him go yesterday, he.
*	They let him go yesterday, him.
*	I like beer, I.
?*	I like beer, me.
*	We'll go together, us.
*	We'll go together, we.
*	They can't stand each other, they.
*	They can't stand each other, them.
	We'll do it together, you and I.
	We'll do it together, you and me.
	They can't stand each other, he and she.
	They can't stand each other, him and her.
*	He, they let him go yesterday.
	Him, they let him go yesterday.
*	I, I like beer.
	Me, I like beer.
*	We, we'll go together.
	Us, we'll go together.
*	They, they can't stand each other.
	Them, they can't stand each other.
*	I saw Mary and downtown yesterday your friend from Boston.
	I saw Mary and him downtown yesterday, your friend from Boston.
*	I noticed car in the driveway last night your friend from Boston.
	I noticed his car in the driveway last night, your friend from Boston.
*	I spoke to about the war yesterday that guy who's always following us.
	I spoke to him about the war yesterday, that guy who's always following us.
	I just_ saw that girl who Long John's claim hat whe was a Venusian made all the headlines.
	All the students who the papers which they submitted were lousy I'm not going to allow to register next term.
	Didn't that guy who the Game Warden and him had seen a flying saucer crack up?
	Palmer is a guy who for for him to stay in school would be stupid.
	King Kong is a movie which you'll laugh yourself sick if you see it.
	Enrico, who is the smartest of us all, got the answer in seven seconds.
	Enrico, and he is the smartest of us all, got the answer in seven seconds.
*	Any student, who wears socks, is a swinger.
*	No student, who wears socks, is a swinger.
*	Every student, who wears socks, is a swinger.
*	Any student, and he wears socks, is a swinger.
*	No student, and he wears socks, is a swinger.
*	Every student, and he wears socks, is a swinger.
	Is even Clarence, who is wearing mauve socks, a swinger?
	Seven pine trees are behind that barn.
	There are seven pine trees behind that barn.
	That barn has seven pine trees behind it.
	There will be a hole in Jack's pocket.
*	There will be the hole in Jack's pocket.
	Jack will have a hole in his pocket.
*	Jack will have the hole in his pocket.
*	That barn has seven pine trees behind itself.
*	That barn has seven pine trees behind the
	Jack's pocket will have a hole in it.
??	There is a hole in John's quilt's upper right-hand corner.
??	John's quilt's upper right-hand corner has a hole.
	John's quilt has a hole in its upper right-hand corner.
??	John has a hole in his quilt's upper right-hand corner.
	John has a hole in the upper right-hand corner of his quilt.
	There are seven holes in the door and window.
*	The door has seven holes in it and the window.
*	The window has seven holes in the door and it.
	There is a blemish on the end of Jerry's sister's nose.
*	Jerry has a blemish on the end of his sister's nose.
	Jerry's sister has a blemish on the end of her nose.
	There is a hole in the rug which Toby bought in Boston.
	There was an error in the proof Johns presented.
	There was a snake behind the car Fred was sitting in.
?	Toby has a hole in the rug which he bought in Boston.
?	Toby has a hole in the rug which Mike bought in Boston.
	John had an error in the proof he presented.
*	John had an error in the proof Sarah presented.
	Fred had a snake behind the car Joe was sitting in.
	Fred had a snake behind the car he was sitting in.
	There was a yellow collar on the dog which the car injured.
	There's a hole in the tarpaulin which that stone is holding down.
	There was a snake behind the car the time bomb was sitting in.
*	The car had a yellow collar on the dog which it injured.
*	That stone has a hole in the tarpaulin which it is holding down.
*	The time bomb had a snake behind the car which it was sitting in.
	There were several hundred people yelling for me to put down gently.
	The hot potato which there were several hundred people yelling for me to put down gently turned out to have been filled with TNT.
*	The hot potato had several hundred people yelling for me to put it down gently.
	Bartlett and Toni danced.
	Bartlett danced with Toni.
*	Bartlett and danced Toni.
*	And Toni danced Bartlett.
	Since it is not this particular construction that is
	It bothers me for her to wear that old fedora,
*	The only girl for whom it bothers me to wear that old fedora is Annabelle.
*	The only girl who it bothers me to wear that old fedora is Annabelle.
	I would prefer it for there to be no talking.
	I would prefer there to be no talking.
	He gave my binoculars to that girl.
	He gave that girl my binoculars.
	Which girl did he give my binoculars to?
*	Which girl did he give my binoculars?
	My binoculars were given to that girl by him.
	That girl was given my binoculars by him.
	Bill confirmed that Roger has eaten the cake.
	Bill alleged that Roger had eaten the cake.
	Bill alleged that Roger has eaten the cake.
??	What did Bill confirm that Roger had eaten?
	What did Bill allege that Roger had eaten?
?*	Bill didn't confirm that Roger had eaten anything.
	Bill didn't allege that Roger had eaten anything.
*	Waldo didn't report the possibility that anyone had left
	Waldo didn't report that anyone had left
	Nobody who hates to eat anything should work in a delicatessen.
	Anybody who ever swears at me better watch his step.
	Everybody around here who ever buys anything on credit talks in his sleep.
	I want all the students who have ever tried to pat Fido to show me their scars.
*	Only the travelers who anybody has ever robbed don't carry machetes.
	The only travelers who anybody has ever robbed don't carry machetes.
*	I can't remember the name of somebody who had misgivings.
*	I can't remember the name of somebody who had any misgivings.
	I can't remember the name of anybody who had any misgivings.
	Everybody who has ever, worked in any office which contained any typewriter which had ever been used to type any letters which had to be signed by any administrator who ever worked in any department like mine will know what I mean.
	No student who ever goes to Europe ever has enough money.
*	Every student who ever goes to Europe ever has enough money.
	I ate the ice cream and some cake.
?	I didn't eat the ice cream and some cake.
*	I didn't eat the ice cream and any cake.
	I realized that it had rained and some crops had been destroyed.
	I didn't realize that it had rained and some crops had been destroyed.
*	I didn't realize that it had rained and any crops had been destroyed.
	I didn't eat any ice cream or any cake.
*	I didn't eat any ice cream and any cake.
?*	I didn't eat the cake or any ice cream
*	I didn't eat any ice cream or Mary's cake
*	I didn't eat any ice cream or the cake
?	I didn't eat Mary's cake or any ice cream.
	John and Mary met in Vienna.
	John met Mary in Vienna.
*	Few writers and any playwrights meet in Vienna.
	Few writers meet any playwrights in Vienna
*	My brother and few Americans meet in Vienna.
	My brother meets few Americans in Vienna
	No writer, and no playwright, speaks clearly.
	No writer, nor any playwright, speaks clearly.
*	No writer, and no playwright, meets in Vienna
*	No writer, nor any playwright, meets in Vienna
*	Bill understands Mary and himself.
?*	Bill understands himself and Mary.
*	Bill and Mary washed himself.
*	Andy pinched Sarah and tickled herself.
*	The gun and a description of itself lay on the bureau.
	Bill believes that Anna and he are similar.
	Bill believes Anna and him to be similar.
*	Bill believes Anna and himself to be similar.
*	I deny that that Bob has any money is certain.
	I deny that it is certain that Bob has any money.
??	I deny that that Bob has some money is certain.
	Tom will not force you to marry any student.
	Tom will force you to marry no student.
*	The writers of any of the reports didn't know the answer.
	The writers of none of the reports
	Tom will force you to marry no student, and neither will I.
	The writers of none of the reports knew the answer, and neither did the writers of any of the chronicles.
	It is not certain that you'll marry any student.
	It is not certain that you'll marry any particular student.
	It is certain that you'll marry no student.
	That you will marry any particular student is not certain.
	That you will marry any student is not certain.
	The man who I gave John a picture of was bald.
??	The man who I gave John this picture of was bald.
*	The man who I gave John Ed's picture of was bald.
	I gave Jack a picture of myself.
?	I gave Jack this picture of myself.
*	I gave Jack Ed's picture of myself.
	I didn't give Jack a picture of anybody.
*	I didn't give Jack this picture of anybody.
*	I didn't give Jack Ed's picture of anybody.
	I hope I'm not treading on anyone's toes.
	Abernathy admitted that the poison pen letter had been written by my sister and him
	Abernathy admitted that the poison pen letter had been written by my sister and himself
*	That the sun is out was obvious
	That the sun was out was obvious
	That anybody ever left at all is not known.
	That anybody ever left at all is not certain.
	That anybody ever left at all is impossible.
	That anybody ever left at all is surprises me.
	That anybody ever left at all is odd.
	Tonight, what Bob cooked yesterday still tastes good.
	Tonight, what Bob cooked yesterday still tastes good, so tonight, what Bob cooked yesterday will be eaten up.
	Tonight, what Bob cooked yesterday still tastes good, so tonight it will be eaten up.
















<Rappaport Hovavv and Levin, 2007>
	Martha gave an apple to Myrna.
	Martha gave Myrna an apple.
	Leigh threw the ball to Lane.
	Leigh threw Lane the ball.
	The noise gave Terry a headache.
*	The noise gave a headache to Terry.
	Jill threw the ball from home plate to third base.
	Jill kicked the ball from home plate to third base.
	I sent the bicycle from my house at the beach to my house in the mountains.
	I shipped the bicycle from my house at the beach to my house in the mountains.
	Fred threw the ball under the porch.
	Fred threw the ball behind the tree.
	Fred threw the ball over the fence.
	Fred kicked the ball under the porch.
	Fred kicked the ball behind the tree.
	Fred kicked the ball over the fence.
	Felicia threw the ball off the bench.
	Felicia threw the ball out the window.
	Felicia kicked the ball out the window.
	Felicia kicked the ball off the bench.
*	Felicia sent the box off the shelf.
*	Felicia sent the box out of the storeroom.
*	Felicia shipped the box off the shelf.
*	Felicia shipped the box out of the storeroom.
*	Jake sent the box at Carson.
*	Jake sent the box towards Carson.
*	Jake shipped the box at Carson.
*	Jake shipped the box towards Carson.
	Anne is curious as to why her father sent her a telegram to America to return home at once.
*	Where did you give the ball?
	Where did you throw the ball? To third base.
	Where did you send the bicycle? To Rome.
	I gave the package to Maria.
*	I gave the package to London.
	I sent the package to Maria.
	I sent the package to London.
	I threw the ball to Maria.
	I threw the ball to the other side of the field.
*	Susan gave the ball halfway to Bill.
*	Susan gave the ball all the way to Bill.
	Jake threw the ball all the way to Bill.
	Jake threw the ball halfway to Bill.
	Jake kicked the ball all the way to Bill.
	Jake kicked the ball halfway to Bill.
	I sent the package halfway around the world.
	I sent the package all the way around the world.
	I sent the package to the Antarctic.
	I shipped the package halfway around the world.
	I shipped the package all the way around the world.
	I shipped the package halfway to the Antarctic.
*	Fred gave the ball under Molly.
*	Fred gave the ball behind Molly.
*	Fred gave the ball over Molly.
*	Fred offered the ball under Molly.
*	Fred offered the ball behind Molly.
*	Fred offered the ball over Molly.
*	Sam gave the ball off the shelf.
*	Sam gave the ball out of the basket.
*	Sam offered the ball off the shelf.
*	Sam offered the ball out of the basket.
*	Jill gave the ball at Bob.
*	Jill gave the ball towards Bob.
*	Jill offered the ball at Bob.
*	Jill offered the ball towards Bob.
	Give a fresh coat of paint to the front door.
	One of the Jewish children is a spunky girl, who gave a black eye to the kid with the German roots before the start of the war.
	Cultural commissioner Megan Whilden said that the five ‘Artscape’ pieces would ‘give a festive air to Park Square, they’re fun and interesting.’
	The door has a fresh coat of paint.
	The spunky girl has a black eye.
	Park Square has a festive air.
	I promise a good time to all who come.
	All who come will have a good time.
	The worker will have a job.
	He died from exhaustion.
	The water melted into/to ice.
	A hefty sum of money came to him from his grandfather.
	The close brush with the law put the fear of god in him.
	She fell in love.
	She fell into a sulk.
	She fell into a funk.
*	Where did you give the ball?
	To whom did you give the ball?
	To whom did you throw the ball?
	Where did you throw the ball?
	To whom did you send the package?
	Where did you send the package?
	Smith threw the ball to the first baseman.
	Smith threw the first baseman the ball.
*	Smith threw the first base the ball.
	Smith envied Jones his good fortune.
*	Smith envied his good fortune to Jones.
	No one can forgive you that comment.
*	No one can forgive that comment to you.
	The recession cost my grandfather a raise.
	Mary taught John linguistics.
	Mary taught linguistics to John.
	We launched the rocket to the moon, but it blew up before it got there.
	I threw the ball to Julian, but it fell short of him.
	Lewis sent a bicycle to Sam, but it never arrived.
	Lewis shipped a bicycle to Sam, but it never arrived.
#	Mark went to the store, but didn’t get there.
#	The cup fell to the floor, but landed on the stool.
#	I pulled the box to the door, but stopped before I got there.
#	I dragged the box to the door, but stopped before I got there.
	Max offered the victims help, but they refused his offer.
	Sarah promised Catherine her old car, but then gave it to her son instead.
	Max offered help to the victims, but they refused his offer.
	Sarah promised her old car to Catherine, but then gave it to her son instead.
	I taught them English for an entire year, but they don’t seem to have learned
	I read him the figures, but when I looked up, he was gone.
	I throw you a lifeline and you giggle.
	I kicked him the ball, but the wind blew it astray.
	I threw Mary the ball, but she was looking at the birds flying overhead and didn't even notice.
	I threw the ball to Mary, but she was looking at the birds flying overhead and didn't even notice.
	Lewis shipped Sam a bicycle, but it never arrived.
	Lewis sent Sam a bicycle, but it never arrived.
	Lewis sent a bicycle to Sam, but it never arrived.
	Lewis shipped a bicycle to Sam, but it never arrived.
	The police read the detainees’ rights to them, but not a single one was paying attention.
	I wrote a letter to Blair, but I tore it up before I sent it.
	The police read the detainees their rights, but not a single one was paying attention.
	I wrote Blair a letter, but I tore it up before I sent it.
    Ann copied the manuscript, but she didn’t finish it.
	Alex read the newspaper for an hour.
	Alex read the newspaper in an hour.
*	I lent the book partway to Tony.
*	I lent the book halfway to Tony.
*	I lent the book all the way to Tony.
*	I lent the book most of the way to Tony.
*	I lent Tony the book partway.
*	I lent Tony the book halfway.
*	I lent Tony the book all the way.
*	I lent Tony the book most of the way.
*	Robin arrived partway at the station.
*	Robin arrived halfway at the station.
*	Robin arrived all the way at the station.
*	Robin arrived most of the way at the station.
*	The old dog died partway.
*	The old dog died halfway.
*	The old dog died all the way.
	Sandy taught the children the alphabet, but only got as far as the letter ‘r’.
	Maxine read the children Goodnight Moon, but they fell asleep before she got to the end.
	Interviewing Richard Nixon gave Norman Mailer a book.
	Nixon’s behavior gave Mailer an idea for a book.
#	Nixon’s behavior gave an idea for a book to Mailer.
	Nixon’s behavior gave an idea for a book to every journalist living in New York City in the 1970s.
	We gave a fresh coat of paint to the house.
	The five ‘Artscape’ pieces gave a festive air to Park Square.
	You could give a headache to a Tylenol.
	Gordie Gillespie still can give a piece of his mind to the umps.
	I sent the salesman to the devil.
*	I sent the devil the salesman.
	Nixon’s behavior gave Mailer an idea for a book.
#	Nixon’s behavior gave an idea for a book to Mailer.
	Nixon’s behavior gave an idea for a book to every journalist living in New
	We gave a fresh coat of paint to the house.
	The music lent a festive air to the party.
	It is very difficult to get an idea for a book simply from an interview.
	It is unreadable, guaranteed to give a headache to anyone who looks hard at the small print.
	‘Doing my taxes’ gives a headache to 22 percent of Americans surveyed for Bristol-Myers Squibb, which makes Excedrin pain-relief medicine.
	Nevarez says that he has done more than simply give a fresh coat of paint to the site.
	I think it’s time you give your lovely illness to someone else!
















<Levin 1993>
	Sharon sprayed the plants with water.
	The farmer loaded apples into the cart.
	The farmer loaded the cart with apples.
*	Monica covered a blanket over the baby.
	Monica covered the baby with a blanket.
	Gina filled the pitcher with lemonade.
	Carla poured lemonade into the pitcher.
*	Carla poured the pitcher with lemonade.
	The farmer dumped apples into the cart.
*	The farmer dumped the cart with apples.
	The window broke.
	The little boy broke the window.
	A rabbit appeared out of the magician's hat.
*	The magician appeared a rabbit out of his hat.
	Martha carved a toy out of wood for the baby.
	Martha carved the baby a toy out of wood.
	Martha carved some wood into a toy for the baby.
*	Martha carved the baby some wood into a toy.
	Margaret cut the bread.
	Janet broke the vase.
	Terry touched the cat.
	Carla hit the door.
	The bread cuts easily.
	Crystal vases break easily.
*	Cats touch easily.
*	Door frames hit easily.
	Margaret cut at the bread.
*	Janet broke at the vase.
*	Terry touched at the cat.
	Carla hit at the door.
	Margaret cut Bill's arm.
	Margaret cut Bill on the arm.
	Janet broke Bill's finger.
*	Janet broke Bill on the finger.
	Terry touched Bill's shoulder.
	Terry touched Bill on the shoulder.
	Carla hit Bill's back.
	Carla hit Bill on the back.
	Jean moved the table.
*	Jean moved at the table.
	The window broke.
	The little boy broke the window.
	Margaret cut the string.
*	The string cut.
	Terry touched the cat.
*	The cat touched.
	Carla hit the door.
*	The door hit.
	a The butcher cuts the meat.
	The meat cuts easily.
	Janet broke the crystal.
	Crystal breaks at the slightest touch.
	Kelly adores French fabrics.
*	French fabrics adore easily.
	Joan knew the answer.
*	The answer knows easily.
	Bill pounded the metal.
*	This metal won't pound.
	Bill pounded the metal fiat.
	This metal won't pound flat.
	Janet broke the cup.
	The cup broke.
	They gave the bicycle to me.
*	The bicycle gave to me.
*	The bread cut.
	A dove appeared from the magician's sleeve.
*	The magician appeared a dove from his sleeve.
	Sylvia jumped the horse over the fence.
	The horse jumped over the fence.
	The scientist ran the rats through the maze.
	The rats ran through the maze.
	The visitor rang the bell.
	The bell rang.
	They stood the statue on the pedestal.
	The statue stood on the pedestal.
	The army lodged the soldiers in the schoolhouse.
	I burped the baby.
	The baby burped.
	Heat radiates from the sun.
	The sun radiates heat.
	Mike ate the cake.
	Mike ate.
	The departing passenger waved at the crowd.
*	Jennifer craned.
	I flossed my teeth.
	I flossed.
	Celia braided her hair.
*	Celia braided.
*	Tessa sprained.
	Jill dressed hurriedly.
	I flossed.
*	I flossed myself.
*	Celia brushed.
	Tessa cut herself.
*	Tessa cut.
	We loaded ourselves onto the bus.
	We loaded onto the bus.
	We pulled ourselves free.
	We pulled free.
	Anne met Cathy.
	Anne and Cathy met.
*	Brenda bantered Molly.
	Brenda and Molly bantered.
	The drunk hugged the lamppost.
*	The drunk and the lamppost hugged.
	Italy touches France.
	Italy and France touch.
*	Ellen chitchatted Helen.
	Ellen and Helen chitchatted.
	The sign warned us against skating on the pond.
	The sign warned against skating on the pond.
	That movie always shocks people.
	That movie always shocks.
	for discussion of the same phenomenon in Russian.
	That dog bites people.
	That dog bites.
	I cut the bread with this knife.
	This knife cut the bread.
	This knife doesn't cut.
	This pen doesn't write.
	These shears clip well.
	This machine records well.
	This oven cooks well.
	This lotion softens, soothes, moisturizes, and protects.
	This polish cleans, protects, and shines.
*	This key won't open.
	This key won't open the Jock.
*	This hammer won't break.
	This hammer won't break the window.
	They pushed their way through the crowd.
	They pushed through the crowd.
	Bake for 30 minutes.
*	Like the ice cream.
*	Like after tasting.
	Paula hit the fence.
	Paula hit at the fence.
	Margaret cut the bread.
	Margaret cut at the bread.
	Faustina sprayed the lilies.
	Faustina. sprayed at the lilies.
*	Janet broke at the bread.
	Terry touched the cat.
	I pushed the table.
	I pushed at the table.
	I pushed on the table.
	I pushed against the table.
	The mouse nibbled the cheese.
	The mouse nibbled at the cheese.
	The mouse nibbled on the cheese.
*	Monica moved at the cat.
	Martha climbed up the mountain.
	Martha climbed the mountain.
	They skated along the canals.
	They skated the canals.
	The spaceship revolves around the earth.
*	The spaceship revolves the earth.
	Martha slowly descended the stairs.
*	Sharon came the room.
	Jill met Sarah.
	Jill embraced Sarah.
	Bill sold Tom a car.
	Bill sent a package to Tom.
	Bill sent a package London.
	Bill sent Tom a package.
*	Bill sent London a package.
	Martha carved a toy for the baby.
	Martha carved the baby a toy.
	The architect selected a house for the couple.
*	The architect selected the couple a house.
	Jack sprayed paint on the wall.
	Jack sprayed the wall with paint.
*	June covered the blanket over the baby.
	June covered the baby with a blanket.
*	Tamara poured the bowl with water.
	Henry cleared dishes from the table.
	Henry cleared the table of dishes.
	The thief stole the painting from the museum.
*	The thief stole the museum of the painting.
	The doctor cured Pat of pneumonia.
	Helen wiped the wall
*	Helen wiped the wall of fingerprints.
	Bees are swarming in the garden.
	The garden is swarming with bees.
*	People are seething in the square.
	The square is seething with people.
*	The pasture is herding with cattle.
	Clouds cleared from the sky.
	The sky cleared
	Martha carved the piece of wood into a toy.
	David constructed a house out of.
	David constructed a house from bricks.
*	David constructed the bricks into a house.
	I kneaded the dough into a loaf.
*	I kneaded a loaf from the dough.
	The witch turned him into a frog.
*	The witch turned him from a prince.
	That acorn will grow into an oak tree.
	An oak tree will grow from that acorn.
	He turned into a frog.
	The witch turned him from a prince into a frog.
	Martha carved the piece of wood into a toy.
*	Martha carved the piece of wood from a branch into a toy.
	I kneaded the dough into a loaf.
*	I kneaded the dough from a lump into a loaf.
	He turned into a frog.
	He turned from a prince into a frog.
	That acorn will grow into an oak tree.
*	That acorn will grow from a seed into an oak tree.
	The car collided with the fence.
	I separated the yolk from the white.
	I separated the yolk and the white.
	I mixed the sugar into the butter.
	I mixed the sugar and the butter.
	I confused Maria with Anna.
	I confused Maria and Anna.
	Linda taped the label to the cover.
*	Linda taped the label and the cover.
	Harriet alternated folk songs with pop songs.
*	Harriet alternated folk songs and pop songs together.
	I broke the twig and the branch apart.
*	I unscrewed the handle and the box apart.
	Brenda agreed with Molly.
	Brenda and Molly agreed.
	The oil separated from the vinegar.
	The oil and vinegar separated.
*	Bill married with Kathy.
	Bill and Kathy married.
	The twig broke off of the branch.
	The twig broke off the branch.
*	The twig and the branch broke.
	The eggs and the cream mixed together.
*	Plays and ballets alternate together.
	The twig and the branch broke apart.
*	The yolk and the white separated apart.
	The judge presented the winner with a prize.
	The judge offered a prize to the winner.
*	The judge offered the winner with a prize.
*	The judge saddled a prize to the winner.
	The judge saddled the winner with a prize.
	The jeweller inscribed the name on the ring.
	The jeweller inscribed the ring with the name.
	The jeweller copied the name on the ring.
*	The jeweller copied the ring with the name.
*	The jeweller decorated the name on the ring.
	The jeweller decorated the ring with the name.
	Brian hit the fence with the stick.
	Don swatted the mosquito with the newspaper.
	Brian threw the stick against the fence.
*	Brian threw the fence with the stick.
	Alison pierced the cloth with a needle.
	Paula hit the fence with the stick.
	Mira blamed the accident on Terry.
	Mira blamed Terry for the accident.
*	Mira condemned the accident on Terry.
	Mira condemned Terry for the accident.
	Ida hunted the woods for deer.
	Ida hunted for deer in the woods.
	Ida hunted deer in the woods.
	Melissa searched the papers for a clue.
	Melissa searched for a clue in the papers.
*	Melissa searched a clue in the papers.
	I stalked the woods for game.
*	I stalked for game in the woods.
	I stalked game in the woods.
	We investigated the area for bombs.
*	We investigated for bombs in the area.
*	We investigated bombs in the area.
*	We rummaged the desk for papers.
	We rummaged through the desk for papers.
*	We rummaged papers through the desk.
*	I ferreted the woods for game.
*	I ferreted for game in the woods.
	Selina touched the horse on the back.
	Selina touched the horse's back.
	The horse kicked Penny in the shin.
	The horse kicked Penny's shin.
	Alison poked Daisy in the ribs.
	Alison poked Daisy's ribs.
*	The horse broke Penny in the shin.
	The horse broke Penny's shin.
*	The glass cut Rachel in the toe.
	The glass cut Rachel's toe.
	They praised the volunteers' dedication.
	They praised the volunteers for their dedication.
	I admired him for his courage.
	The inspector analyzed the building's soundness.
	The inspector analyzed the building for its soundness.
	I sensed his eagerness.
*	I sensed him for his eagerness.
	I admired his honesty.
	I admired the honesty in him.
	They praised the volunteers' dedication.
*	They praised the dedication in the volunteers.
	I admired him for his honesty.
	I admired the honesty in him.
*	I sensed him for his eagerness.
	I sensed the eagerness in him.
	They praised the volunteers for their dedication.
*	They praise the dedication in the volunteers.
	Mark terrified me with his singlemindedness.
	Mark's singlemindedness terrified me.
	The clown amused the children with his antics.
	The clown's antics amused the children.
	Meat fell in price.
	The price of meat fell.
	The president appointed Smith press secretary.
	The president appointed Smith as press secretary.
*	Angela characterized Shelly a lifesaver.
	Angela characterized Shelly as a lifesaver.
*	The captain named the ship as Seafarer.
	The world saw the beginning of a new era in 1492.
	1492 saw the beginning of a new era.
	I dried the clothes in the sun.
	The sun dried the clothes.
	David broke the window with a hammer.
	The hammer broke the window.
	Doug ate the ice cream with a spoon.
*	The spoon ate the ice cream.
	The crane loaded the truck.
*	The pitchfork loaded the truck.
	He established his innocence with the letter.
	The letter established his innocence.
	His innocence was established by the letter.
	I filled the pail with water.
	Water filled the pail.
	We sleep five people in each room.
	Each room sleeps five people.
	I incorporated the new results into the paper.
	The paper incorporates the new results.
	That whole wheat flour bakes wonderful bread.
	David constructed a house from those new bricks.
*	Those new bricks constructed a house.
	I bought you a ticket for $5.
	I bought a ticket for $5.
	$5 will buy a ticket.
	$5 will buy you a ticket.
	The contractor will build a house for $ 100,000.
	The contractor will build you a house for $ 100,000.
	$ 100,000 will build you a house.
	$ 100,000 will build a house.
	The middle class will benefit from the new tax laws.
	The new tax laws will benefit the middle class.
	The middle class will gain from the new tax laws.
*	The new tax Jaws will gain the middle class.
	The butcher cuts the meat.
	This meat cuts itself.
	The butler polished the silver.
	This silver polishes itself.
	The audience watched the movie.
*	This movie just watches itself.
	This window just opens itself.
	The heat melted the ice cream.
*	This ice cream just melts itself.
	This book just sells itself.
*	This book just buys itself.
	I presented a solution to the problem yesterday.
	A solution to the problem presented itself yesterday.
	The cook sliced the mushrooms.
	The mushrooms were sliced by the cook.
	Columbus believed the earth to be round.
	The earth was believed to be round.
	Columbus believed that the earth was round.
	It was believed that the earth was round.
	The police kept tabs on the suspect.
	Tabs were kept on the suspect.
	The lax supervision was taken advantage of.
	This bed was slept in by George Washington.
*	Tuesday was slept on by George Washington.
*	The horizon was appeared on by a pirate ship.
	The pillow remained stuffed with feathers.
	A flowering plant is on the windowsill.
	There is a flowering plant on the windowsill.
	A problem developed.
	There developed a problem.
	A ship appeared on the horizon.
	There appeared a ship on the horizon.
	There appeared a ship on the horizon.
*	There appeared the ship on the horizon.
	A little boy darted into the room.
	There darted into the room a little boy.
	A little boy ran in the yard.
*	There ran a little boy in the yard.
?	There ran in the yard a little boy.
?	In the yard there ran a little boy.
	An ancient treasure trove was found in this cave.
	There was found in this cave an ancient treasure trove.
	Suddenly an ugly old man entered the hall.
	Suddenly there entered the hall an ugly old man.
	A lot of snow melted on the streets of Chicago.
*	There melted a lot of snow on the streets of Chicago.
	A flowering plant is on the windowsill.
	On the windowsill is a flowering plant.
	An old woman lives in the woods.
	In the woods lives an old woman.
	A cat jumped onto the table.
	Onto the table jumped a cat.
	A cat jumped on the table.
*	On the .table jumped a cat.
	A choir sang in the church.
	In the church sang a choir.
	An ancient treasure trove was found in this cave.
	In this cave was found an ancient treasure trove.
	A violent demonstration took place in the main square.
?	In the main square took place a violent demonstration.
	A lot of snow melted on the streets of Chicago.
*	On the streets of Chicago melted a lot of snow.
	Sarah smiled.
	Sarah smiled a charming smile.
	Sarah sang.
	Sarah sang a song.
	Sarah sang a ballad.
	Sarah sang an aria.
	Sarah sang a hymn.
	Sarah sang the anthem.
	Heather grunted.
?	Heather grunted a disinterested grunt.
	Kelly buttered the bread.
*	Kelly buttered the bread with butter.
	Kelly buttered the bread with unsalted butter.
	Linda taped the box with two-sided tape.
?	Linda taped the box with tape.
	The men were able to mine more gold.
	The men were able to mine more gold from the abandoned mine.
*	Lydia pocketed the change in her pocket.
*	The cook boned the fish of bones.
*	The cook boned the fish of its backbone.
	Pauline smiled her thanks.
	Sandra beamed.
	Sandra beamed a cheerful welcome.
*	A cheerful welcome was beamed by Sandra.
	She mumbled.
	She mumbled her adoration.
	They shopped their way around New York.
	He worked his way through the book.
	She talked her way out of the class.
	She stipulated her way out of the problem.
	The boy pushed his way through the crowd.
	The explorers cut their way through the jungle.
*	The children came their way to the party.
*	The flower bloomed its way to a prize.
*	They disappeared their way off the stage.
	The silversmith pounded the metal flat.
*	The silversmith pounded on the metal flat.
	Pauline hammered the metal flat.
	Jasmine pushed the door open.
	The guests drank the teapot dry.
	Amanda burned the stove black.
	Belinda walked the soles off her shoes.
	Philippa cried herself to sleep.
	The river froze solid.
	The door slid shut.
	The metal was hammered flat.
	The door was pushed open.
	Philippa cried herself to sleep.
	Philippa cried her eyes dry.
	Belinda walked the soles off her shoes.
*	The dog smelled the flower bed bare.
*	The teacher hated the pupils angry.
*	Willa arrived breathless.
*	Sharon brought Willa breathless.
	This list includes my name on it.
*	This list includes my name on itself.
	Fanny pulled the blanket over herself.
	Fanny pulled the blanket over her.
	The truck rumbled.
	The truck rumbled into the driveway.
	Audrey tiptoed to the door.
	The couple waltzed to the window.
	The clown wobbled down the hall.
	Leona pushed the cart to the market.
	It is rumored that he left town.
*	They rumor that he left town.
*	The politician perjured his aide.
	Jennifer craned her neck.
*	Jennifer craned his neck.
	Jennifer craned her neck.
?*	Jennifer craned her arm.
	They've got it made.
	You've really lived it up.
	The teacher meant well.
*	The teacher meant.
	The horse wouldn't budge.
	Would the horse budge if you pushed?
*	The horse budged.
*	I put the book to Sally.
*	I put the book from Edna.
*	I put the book from Edna to Sally.
	I put books on the table.
*	I put the table with the books.
*	I put the table with books.
	I put the books on the table.
*	The books put on the table easily.
	I put the books on the table.
*	The books put on the table.
*	I put the books.
*	I put on the table.
	Cheryl stood the books next to the magazines.
	Cheryl stood the books on the shelf.
*	Cheryl stood the books from Edna.
*	Cheryl stood the books from Edna to Sarah.
	Cheryl stood the books on the shelf.
*	Cheryl stood the shelf with books.
*	Cheryl stood the shelf with the books.
	Cheryl stood the tall books on the table.
*	Tall books stand on tables easily.
	Cheryl stood the books on the table.
	The books stood on the table.
*	Cheryl stood on the table.
	I funneled the mixture into the bottle.
*	I funneled the mixture from the bottle.
*	I funneled the mixture to Rina.
*	I funneled the mixture from Edna to Rina.
	I funneled the mixture into the bottle.
*	I funneled the bottle with the mixture.
	I funneled the mixture into the bottle.
*	The mixture funnels easily.
	I funneled the mixture into the bottle.
*	The mixture funnels.
*	I funneled the mixture.
*	I funneled into the bottle.
	I lifted the books.
	I lifted the book onto the table.
	I lifted the book onto the out of the box.
	I lifted the books from the floor to the table.
	I lifted the books onto the table.
*	I lifted the table with the books.
	I lifted the books to him.
	I lifted the books up to him.
*	I lifted him the books.
*	I lifted him up the books.
	I lifted the paperback book onto the table.
*	Paperback books lift on'to the table easily.
	I lifted the book onto the table.
*	The books lifted onto the table.
*	I lifted onto the table.
	Tamara poured water into the bowl.
	Tamara poured water over the flowers.
	Tamara poured water out of the pitcher.
	Tamara poured water out of the pitcher.
	Tamara poured water into the bowl.
*	Tamara poured the bowl with water.
	Tamara poured water into the bowl.
*	Tamara poured at water into the bowl.
	Tamara poured water onto the plants.
*	Water pours easily onto the plants.
	Tamara poured water onto the plants.
	Water poured onto the plants.
	Cora coiled the rope around the post.
	Cora coiled the rope around the post.
*	Cora coiled the post with the rope.
	Cora coiled the rope around the post.
*	Cora coiled at the rope around the post.
	Cora coiled the rope around the post.
	The rope coiled around the post.
	Cora coiled the rope around the post.
	That kind of rope coils easily around the post.
*	Cora coiled around the post.
	Jessica loaded boxes onto the wagon.
	Jessica loaded boxes into the wagon.
	Jessica loaded boxes under the wagon.
	Jessica sprayed paint onto the table.
	Jessica sprayed paint under the table.
	Jessica sprayed paint over the table.
	Jessica sprayed paint on the wall.
	Jessica loaded boxes on the wagon.
	Jessica sprayed paint on the wall.
	Paint sprayed on the wall.
	Jessica sprayed the wall with paint.
*	The wall sprayed with paint.
	Jessica squirted water at me.
	Jessica sprayed water at me.
	Jessica splashed water at me.
*	Jessica loaded boxes at the truck.
*	Jessica stuffed boxes at the truck.
*	Jessica crammed boxes at the truck.
	Leslie staffed the store with employees.
	Leslie staffed the store with employees.
*	Leslie staffed employees in the store.
	Leslie staffed the store with employees.
*	The store staffed with employees.
	Leslie staffed the store with employees.
	The employees staffed the store,
	Leigh swaddled the baby with blankets.
	Leslie staffed the store with employees.
	Lora buttered the toast.
*	Lora buttered unsalted butter on the toast.
	Lora buttered the toast with unsalted butter.
	Lora buttered the toast.
	Lora buttered the toast with unsalted butter.
*	Lora buttered at the toast with unsalted butter.
*	Lora buttered at the toast.
*	The toast buttered with unsalted butter.
*	The toast buttered.
	Lydia pocketed the change.
*	Lydia pocketed the change in her pocket.
*	Lydia pocketed her pocket with the change.
	Lydia pocketed the change.
*	The change pocketed.
	Doug removed the smudges from the tabletop.
	Doug removed the smudges from around the sink.
*	Doug removed the smudges out of the drawer.
*	Doug removed the smudges to nowhere.
	Doug removed the smudges from the tabletop.
*	Doug removed the tabletop of smudges.
	Doug removed the smudges from the tabletop.
*	Doug removed at the smudges from the tabletop.
	Doug removed the smudges from the tabletop.
*	The smudges removed from the tabletop.
	The king banished the general from the army.
	The king banished the general to a mountain fortress.
*	The king banished the general from the palace to a mountain fortress.
	The king banished the general from the army.
*	The king banished the army of the general.
	The king banished the general from the army.
*	The king banished at the general from the army.
	The king banished the general from the army.
*	The general banished from the army.
	Doug cleared dishes from the table.
	Doug cleared the dishes from under the rack.
	Doug cleared dishes from the table.
	Doug cleared the table of dishes.
	The sky cleared.
?	The sky cleared of clouds.
	Clouds cleared from the sky.
	Doug cleared the table of dishes.
	Doug cleared the table.
*	Doug cleared at the table of dishes.
*	Doug cleared at the table.
	The strong winds cleared the skies.
	The strong winds slowly cleared the clouds from the sky.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from the counter.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from inside the cupboard.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from under the cupboard.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from outside the cupboard.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from the counter.
*	Brian wiped the counter of fingerprints.
	Brian wiped the counter.
	Paula trimmed the bush.
	Brian wiped the fingerprints from the counter.
	Brian wiped the counter.
	Brian was wiping the counter.
	Brian was wiping.
	Brian was wiping the wall behind the stove.
	Brian was wiping behind the stove.
	Carla shoveled the snow from the walk.
	Carla shoveled the snow from under the bushes.
	Carla shoveled the snow from among the bushes.
	Carla shoveled the snow from near  the bushes.
	Carla shoveled the snow from the walk.
*	Carla shoveled the walk of snow.
	Carla shoveled the walk.
*	Carla shoveled at the walk.
	Carla shoveled the snow from the walk.
	Carla shoveled the walk.
	Carla was shoveling the walk.
	Carla was shoveling.
	Carla mopped the floor under the furniture.
	Carla mopped under the furniture.
	The thief stole the painting from the museum.
*	The thief stole the museum of the painting.
	The thief stole the painting for Mr. Smith.
*	The thief stole Mr. Smith the painting.
	The thief stole the painting from the museum.
*	The thief stole at the painting from the museum.
	The thief stole the painting from the museum.
*	The painting stole from the museum.
*	The doctor cured pneumonia from Pat.
	The doctor cured Pat of pneumonia.
	The doctor cured Pat of pneumonia.
*	Pat cured of pneumonia.
	The swindler cheated Pat of her fortune.
	The doctor cured Pat of pneumonia.
	The cook boned the fish.
*	The fish boned.
	The cook deboned the fish.
	The cook deboned the fish.
*	The fish deboned.
	The men mined the gold.
	The men mined the gold.
*	The gold mined.
	Nora sent the book.
	Nora sent the book from Paris.
	Nora sent the book to London.
	Nora sent the book from Paris to London.
	Nora sent the book to Peter.
	Nora sent Peter the book.
	Nora sent the book to Peter.
*	Nora sent at the book to Peter.
	Nora sent the book to Peter.
*	The book sent to Peter.
	Nora sent books to children.
*	Books send easily to children.
	Carla slid the books across the table.
	Carla slid the book to Dale.
	Carla slid Dale the book.
	Carla slid the book.
	Carla slid the book to Dale.
*	Carla slid at the book.
*	Carla slid at the book to Dale.
	Carla slid the books across the table.
	The books slid across the table.
	Carla slid those books across the table.
	Those books slide across the table easily.
	Nora brought the book to the meeting.
	Nora brought the book to Pamela.
	Nora brought the book from horne.
	Nora brought the book to Pamela.
	Nora brought Pamela the book.
	Nora brought the book to the meeting.
*	Nora brought at the book to the meeting.
	Nora brought the book to the meeting.
*	The book brought to the meeting.
	Nora brought the book to the meeting.
*	The book brings easily to the meeting.
	Amanda carried the package.
	Amanda carried the package from Boston.
	Amanda carried the package to New York.
	Amanda carried the package from Boston to New York.
	Amanda carried the package to Pamela.
?	Amanda carried Pamela the package.
*	Amanda carried at the package to New York.
*	Amanda carried at the package.
*	The package carried to New York.
*	The package carried.
	Amanda carried packages to New York.
	Amanda carried packages.
*	Packages carry easily to New York.
*	Packages carry easily.
	Amanda drove the package from Boston to New York.
	Amanda drove the package to New York.
	Amanda drove the package from Boston.
	Amanda drove the package.
	Amanda drove the package to Pamela.
?	Amanda drove Pamela the package.
*	Amanda drove at the package to New York.
*	Amanda drove at the package.
*	The package drove to New York.
*	The package drove.
	Amanda drove packages to New York.
	Amanda drove packages.
*	Packages drive easily to New York.
*	Packages drive easily.
	Nora pushed the chair.
	Nora pushed the chair.
	Nora pushed at the chair.
	Nora pushed on the chair.
	Nora pushed against the chair.
	Nora pushed the chair.
*	The chair pushed.
	Nora pushed through the crowd.
	Nora pushed her way through the crowd.
	Nora pushed the chair against the wall.
	They lent a bicycle to me.
	They lent me a bicycle.
	They lent a bicycle to me.
*	They lent me with a bicycle.
	They lent a bicycle to me.
*	A bicycle lent.
*	A bicycle lent to me.
	We contributed our paycheck to her.
	We contributed our paycheck to her.
*	We contributed her our paycheck.
	We contributed our paycheck to her.
*	We contributed her with our paycheck.
	We contributed our paycheck to her.
*	Our paycheck contributed.
*	Our paycheck contributed to her.
*	We offered a job behind her.
	We offered a job to her.
	We offered her a job.
	We offered a job to her.
*	We offered her with a job.
	We offered a job to her.
*	A job offered.
*	A job offered to her.
	Brown presented a plaque to Jones.
	Brown presented a plaque to Jones.
	Brown presented Jones with a plaque.
	the presentation of a plaque
	Brown equipped Jones with a camera.
*	Brown equipped a camera neae Jones.
*	Brown equipped a camera next to Jones.
*	Brown equipped a camera at Jones.
*	Brown equipped a camera to Jones.
	Brown equipped Jones with a camera.
*	Brown equipped a camera to Jones.
*	Brown equipped Jones a camera.
	Carmen bought a dress.
	Carmen bought a dress at Bloomingdale's.
	Carmen bought a dress for Mary.
	Carmen bought Mary a dress.
*	Carmen bought a dress to Mary.
	Carmen bought Mary a dress.
	Carmen bought a dress from Diana.
*	Carmen bought Diana of a dress.
	Carmen bought a dress at Bloomingdale 's for $50.
	$50 won't even buy a dress at Bloomingdale's.
	Carmen obtained the spare part at the hardware store.
	Carmen obtained the spare part.
	Carmen obtained a spare part for Mary.
*	Carmen obtained Mary a spare part.
*	Carmen obtained a spare part to Mary.
*	Carmen obtained Mary a spare part.
	Carmen obtained a spare part from Diana.
*	Carmen obtained Diana of a spare part.
	Carmen purchased a dress at Bloomingdale's for $50.
	$50 won't even purchase a dress at Bloomingdale's.
	Gwen exchanged the dress for a shirt.
*	Gwen exchanged the dress to Mary.
*	Gwen exchanged Mary the dress.
	Gwen exchanged the dress for Mary.
*	Gwen exchanged Mary the dress.
	The children like to berry in the summer.
	She held the rail.
	She held the rail.
*	She held at the rail.
	She held the rail.
*	The rail holds easily.
	She held his arm.
	She held him by the arm.
*	She held the paper from him.
	Michelle kept the papers in the desk.
	Michelle kept the papers behind the desk.
	Michelle kept the papers over the desk.
	Michelle kept the papers under the desk.
	Michelle kept the papers in the desk.
*	Michelle kept the desk with the papers.
	Frances hid the presents from Sally.
	Frances hid the presents behind the books.
	Frances hid the presents in the drawer.
	Frances hid the presents from Sally.
*	Frances hid Sally of the presents.
	Steve tossed the ball.
	Steve tossed the ball into the garden.
	Steve tossed the ball over the fence.
	Steve tossed the ball from the tree to the gate.
	Steve tossed the ball at Anna.
*	Steve tossed Anna with the ball.
	Steve tossed the ball to Anna.
	Steve tossed Anna the ball.
	Steve tossed the ball against the wall.
*	Steve tossed the wall with the ball.
	Steve tossed the ball.
*	Steve tossed at the ball.
	Steve tossed the ball.
*	The ball tossed.
	Steve tossed the softball.
*	Softballs toss easily.
	Steve pelted Anna with acorns.
*	Steve pelted acorns at Anna.
	Steve pelted Anna with acorns.
	Steve pelted Anna.
*	Steve pelted at Anna.
*	Steve pelted at Anna with acorns.
	Steve pelted Anna with acorns.
*	Steve pelted acorns against Anna.
*	Steve pelted acorns to Anna.
*	Steve pelted Anna acorns.
	Steve pelted the squirrels with acorns.
*	Squirrels pelt easily with acorns.
	Paula hit the stick on the fence.
	Paula hit the stick against the fence.
	Paula hit the fence with the stick.
*	Paula hit the stick into the fence.
*	Paula hit the stick through the fence.
	Paula hit the fence with the stick.
	Paula hit the fence.
	Paula hit at the fence with the stick.
	Paula hit at the fence.
	Paula hit Deirdre on the back.
	Paula hit Deirdre's back.
	Paula hit one stick against another.
	Paula hit the sticks together.
	Paula hit one stick against another.
*	Paula hit the sticks.
*	The fence hit with a stick.
*	The fence hit.
	Paula hit the fence.
*	The fence hits easily.
	Paula hit the fence with the stick.
	The stick hit the fence.
*	Paula swatted the dishcloth on the fly.
*	Paula swatted the dishcloth against the fly.
	Paula swatted the fly with the dishcloth.
*	Paula swatted the dishcloth through the fly.
*	Paula swatted the dishcloth into the fly.
	Paula swatted the fly with the dishcloth.
	Paula swatted the fly.
	Paula swatted at the fly.
	Paula swatted Deirdre on the back.
	Paula swatted Deirdre's back.
	Paula swatted the fly.
*	The fly swatted.
	Paula swatted flies.
*	Flies swat easily.
	Paula swatted the fly with a dishcloth.
*	The dishcloth swatted the fly.
*	Paula spanked her right hand against the naughty child.
	Paula spanked the naughty child with her right hand.
*	Paula spanked her right hand into the naughty child.
*	Paula spanked her right hand through the naughty child.
	Paula spanked the naughty child with her right hand.
*	Paula spanked at the naughty child.
	Paula spanked the naughty child on the back.
	Paula spanked the naughty child's back.
	Paula spanked the naughty child.
*	The naughty child spanked.
	Paula spanked the naughty child.
*	Naughty children spank easily.
	Paula spanked the naughty child with her right hand.
*	Paula's right hand spanked the naughty child.
*	The wall thudded with the grocery cart.
	The old cart thudded against the new cart.
*	The old and new carts thudded.
	The old cart thudded against the new cart.
	The old and new carts thudded together.
	Alison poked the needle through the cloth.
	Alison poked the needle into the cloth.
	Alison poked the cloth with a needle.
*	Alison poked the needle against the cloth.
	Alison poked the cloth with a needle.
	Alison poked the cloth.
	Alison poked at the cloth.
	Alison poked Daisy in the ribs.
	Alison poked Daisy's ribs.
	Alison poked the cloth.
	Alison poked the needle through the cloth.
	Alison poked the cloth.
	Alison poked the darning needle through the denim.
	Alison poked the cloth with a needle.
	The needle poked the cloth.
	Carrie touched the cat.
*	Carrie touched the stick against the cat.
	Carrie touched the cat with the stick.
*	Carrie touched the stick into the cat.
*	Carrie touched the stick through.
	Carrie touched the cat with the stick.
	Carrie touched the cat.
*	Carrie touched at the cat.
	Carrie touched him on the shoulder.
	Carrie touched the cat.
*	The cat touched.
	Carrie touched that cat.
*	That cat touches easily.
	Carrie touched the fence with a stick.
*	The stick touched the fence.
	Carol cut the bread with a knife.
	Carol cut the bread.
	Carol cut at the bread.
	Carol cut herself on the thumb.
	Carol cut her thumb.
	Carol cut the bread.
*	The bread cut.
	Carol cut the whole wheat bread.
	Whole wheat bread cuts easily.
	Carol cut the bread with a knife.
	The knife cut the bread.
	This knife cut the bread.
	This knife cuts well.
	Carol carved the stone with a chisel.
	Carol carved the stone.
*	Carol carved at the stone.
*	Carol carved the tree on the branch.
	Carol carved the tree's branch.
	Carol carved the stone.
*	The stone carved.
	Carol carved the marble.
	Marble carves easily.
	Carol carved the marble with a chisel.
	The chisel carved the marble.
	That chisel carved the statue.
	That chisel carves well.
	Herman mixed the eggs with the cream.
	Herman mixed the eggs and the cream.
	The eggs mixed with the cream.
	The eggs and the cream mixed.
	Herman mixed the eggs with the cream.
	Herman mixed the eggs and the cream together.
	The eggs mixed with the cream.
	The eggs and the cream mixed together.
	I mixed the soap into the water.
	I mixed the soap and the water.
	I mixed the eggs with cream.
	I mixed the eggs and cream.
	I mixed the eggs and cream together.
	Harriet alternated folk songs with pop songs.
	Harriet alternated folk songs and pop songs.
	Plays alternate with ballets.
	Plays and ballets alternate.
	Harriet alternated folk songs with pop songs.
*	Harriet alternated folk songs and pop songs together.
	Plays alternate with ballets.
*	Plays and ballets alternate together.
	Harriet interconnected the pieces.
	Harriet alternated folk songs with pop songs.
	Harriet interconnected the pieces.
	Harriet alternated folk songs with pop songs.
	Herman whipped the cream.
	Herman whipped the sugar into the cream.
	Herman whipped the sugar and the cream together.
	Herman whipped the sugar into the cream.
*	Herman whipped the sugar and the cream.
	Herman whipped the sugar into the cream.
	Herman whipped the sugar and the cream together.
	Herman whipped the sugar into the cream.
	Herman whipped the sugar and the cream together.
	Linda taped the picture to the wall.
	Linda taped the picture on the wall.
	Linda taped the picture onto the wall.
	Linda taped the picture onto the wall.
*	Linda taped the wall with the picture.
	Linda taped the label to the cover.
*	Linda taped the label and the cover.
	Linda taped the label to the cover.
	Linda taped the label and the cover together.
	Linda taped the label to the cover.
	Linda taped the label and the cover together.
	Linda taped the label to the cover.
	Linda taped the label and the cover together.
	The child clung to her mother.
	The child clung to her mother.
*	The child and her mother clung.
	The child clung to her mother.
	The child and her mother clung together.
	The child clung to her mother.
*	The war clung the child to her mother.
	I separated the yolk from the white.
	I separated the yolk and the white.
	The yolk separated from the white.
	The yolk and the white separated.
	I separated the yolk from the white.
	The yolk separated from the white.
*	The yolk and the white separated apart.
	I separated the cream from the milk.
	I separated the egg yolk and the egg white.
	I separated the cream from the milk.
	I separated the egg yolks and the egg whites.
	I separated the cream from the milk.
*	I separated the milk of the cream.
	I broke the twig off the branch.
	I broke the twig off of the branch.
*	I broke the twig and the branch.
	The twig broke off of the branch.
	The twig broke off the branch.
*	The twig and the branch broke.
	I broke the twig off the branch.
	I broke the twig off of the branch.
	I broke the twig and the branch apart.
	The twig and the branch broke apart.
	I broke the twig and the branch apart.
	I broke twigs off those branches.
	I broke twigs off of those branches.
	I broke those twigs and branches apart.
	I unscrewed the handle.
	I unscrewed the handle from the box.
*	I unscrewed the handle and the box.
	I unscrewed the handle from the box.
*	I unscrewed the handle and the box apart.
	I unscrewed the handle from the box.
*	The handle unscrewed from the box.
	I unscrewed that new handle.
	I unscrewed that new handle from the box.
	That new handle unscrews easily.
*	That new handle unscrews from the box easily.
	The winter schedule differed from the spring schedule.
	This flyer differs from that flyer.
	This flyer and that flyer differ.
	This flyer differs from that flyer.
*	This flyer and that flyer differ apart.
	This flyer differs from that flyer.
*	I differed this flyer from that flyer.
	Phyllis dyed the dress.
	Smith inscribed his name on the ring.
	Smith inscribed his name over the door.
	Smith inscribed his name under the picture.
	Smith inscribed his name on the ring.
	Smith inscribed the ring with his name.
	Smith was inscribing the rings.
	Smith was inscribing.
	The jeweller printed the name.
	The jeweller printed the name on the ring.
	The jeweller printed the name over the door.
	The jeweller printed the name under the picture.
	The jeweller printed the name onto the cup.
	The jeweller scribbled his name on the contract.
*	The jeweller scribbled the contract with his name.
	Smith was scribbling his notes.
	Smith was scribbling.
	The jeweller decorated the ring.
	The jeweller decorated the ring with the name.
*	The jeweller decorated the name on the ring.
	The jeweller decorated the ring with the name.
	The secretary transcribed the speech.
	The secretary transcribed the speech into the record.
*	The secretary transcribed the record with the speech.
	Martha carved a toy out of the piece of wood.
	Martha carved the piece of wood into a toy.
	Martha carved the piece of wood into a toy.
*	Martha carved the piece of wood from a branch into a toy.
	Martha carves toys.
	Martha carves.
	Martha carved a toy for the baby.
	Martha carved a toy out of a piece of wood for the baby.
	Martha carved a piece of wood for the baby.
	Martha carved a piece of wood into a toy for the baby.
	Martha carved a toy out of the piece of wood.
	Martha carved the piece of wood into a toy.
	Martha carved beautiful toys out of this wood.
	This wood carves beautiful toys.
	The contractor will build a house for $ 100,000.
	The contractor will build you a house for $ 100,000.
	$100,000 will build you a house.
	$100,000 will build a house.
	That acorn will grow into an oak tree.
	An oak tree will grow from that acorn.
	That acorn will grow into an oak tree.
*	That acorn will grow from a seed into an oak tree.
	The gardener grew that acorn into an oak tree.
	The gardener grew an oak tree from that acorn.
	Donna fixed a sandwich.
?	Donna fixed a sandwich from last night's leftovers.
*	Donna fixed last night's leftovers into a sandwich.
	Donna fixed a sandwich for me.
	Donna fixed me a sandwich.
	Donna fixed a sandwich.
*	A sandwich fixed.
	David constructed a house.
	David constructed a house out of bricks.
	David constructed a house from bricks.
*	David constructed the bricks into a house.
	David constructed a house for me.
*	David constructed me a house.
	David constructed the house.
*	The house constructed.
	David constructed a house from those new bricks.
*	Those new bricks constructed a house.
*	David constructed the mansion from bricks into a house.
	I kneaded the dough into a loaf.
	I kneaded the dough.
*	I kneaded a loaf.
*	I kneaded a loaf from the dough.
	I twirled the dough into a pretzel.
*	I kneaded a good loaf from this dough.
*	This dough kneads a good loaf.
	I kneaded the dough into a loaf.
*	I kneaded the dough from a lump into a loaf.
	The witch turned him into a frog.
	The witch turned him from a prince into a frog.
	He turned into a frog.
	He turned from a prince into a frog.
	The witch turned him into a frog.
	The witch turned him from a prince into a frog.
*	The witch turned him from a prince.
	The witch turned him into a frog.
*	He turned from a prince.
	He turned into a frog.
	Sandy sang a song to me.
	Sandy sang me a song.
	Sandy sang a song for me.
	Sandy sang me a song.
	Sandy sang a song.
	Sandy sang.
	Sandy sang a song.
*	The song sang.
	Racial inequality engenders conflict.
	Racial inequality engenders conflict.
*	Conflict engenders.
	The president appointed Smith press secretary.
	The president appointed Smith as press secretary.
	The president appointed Smith press secretary.
*	The president appointed press secretary to Smith.
	Angela characterized Shelly as a lifesaver.
*	Angela characterized Shelly a lifesaver.
	The captain named the ship Seafarer.
*	The captain named the ship as Seafarer.
	The captain named the ship Seafarer.
*	The captain named Seafarer to the ship. ·
	The president declared Smith press secretary.
*	The president declared Smith as press secretary.
	The president declared Smith press secretary.
*	The president declared Smith to press secretary.
*	The press conjectured Smith the appointee.
*	The press conjectured Smith as the appointee.
	The press conjectured that Smith would be the appointee.
	Dina masqueraded as a lawyer.
*	Dina masqueraded a lawyer.
	Miriam tutored her brother.
	Her cousin clerked for Judge Davis.
	I see someone running down the street.
	I saw Jane run down the street.
	I saw the Mona Lisa.
*	The Mona Lisa sees easily.
	I sensed his eagerness.
*	I sensed him for his eagerness.
	I sensed his eagerness.
	I sensed the eagerness in him.
*	We spotted that they were running.
*	We spotted them run.
	I spotted the runaway cat.
*	Runaway cats spot easily.
	We peered at the baby.
	We peered around the room.
	We peered through the screen.
	We peered into the closet.
	That pea soup tasted delicious.
	That pea soup tasted delicious to me.
	The clown amused the children.
	The clown amused the children.
*	The children amused.
*	The children amused at the clown.
	The clown amused the little children.
	Little children amuse easily.
	That joke never fails to amuse little children.
	That joke never fails to amuse.
	The clown's antics amused the children.
	That the clown had a red nose amused the children.
	To win the prize :would thrill me.
	The clown was amusing to the children.
	Tourists admire paintings.
*	Paintings admire easily.
	I admired his honesty.
	I admired him for his honesty.
	I admired his honesty.
	I admired the honesty in him.
	I admired him as a teacher.
*	I admired him a teacher.
	Megan marveled at the beauty of the Grand Canyon.
	Dorothy needs new shoes.
*	Dorothy is needing new shoes.
	Dorothy needs her skills.
	Dorothy needs her for her skills.
	Dorothy needs her skills.
*	Dorothy needs the skills in her.
	Dorothy needs that dress as a costume.
*	Dorothy needs that dress a costume.
	Dana longs for a sunny day.
	Dana is longing for a sunny day.
	They praised the volunteers.
	The director praised the volunteers.
*	Volunteers praise easily.
	They praised the volunteers' dedication.
	They praised the volunteers for their dedication.
*	They praised the dedication in the volunteers.
	They praised them as volunteers.
*	They praised them volunteers.
	The inspector analyzed the building's soundness.
	The inspector analyzed the building for its soundness.
	The inspector analyzed the building's soundness.
*	The inspector analyzed the soundness in the building.
	I hunted for game in the woods.
	I hunted game in the woods.
	I was hunting game.
	I was hunting game in the woods.
	I was hunting in the woods.
	I was hunting.
	I searched for treasure in the cave.
*	I searched treasure in the cave.
	I stalked the woods for game.
*	I stalked for game in the woods.
	I stalked game in the woods.
	We investigated the area for bombs.
*	We investigated for bombs in the area.
*	We investigated bombs in the area.
*	We rummaged the drawer for important documents.
	We rummaged in the drawer for important documents.
*	We rummaged important documents in the drawer.
*	I ferreted the woods for game.
*	I ferreted for game in the woods.
	I ferreted the secret out of him.
	Brenda bantered with Molly.
	Brenda bantered with Molly.
	Brenda and Molly bantered.
*	Brenda bantered Molly.
	Brenda and Molly bantered:
	Brenda bantered with Molly.
	Brenda and Molly bantered about the party.
*	Bill married with Kathy.
	Bill and Kathy married.
	Bill married Kathy.
	Bill and Kathy married.
	Bill married Kathy.
*	Bill married with Kathy.
	Brenda met with Molly.
*	Brenda met.
	Brenda met with Molly.
	Brenda and Molly met.
	Anne met Cathy.
	Anne and Cathy met.
	Anne met with Cathy.
	Anne met Cathy.
	Wanda taught the students.
	Wanda taught French to the students.
	Wanda taught the students French.
	Wanda taught the students that the earth was round.
	Ellen told a story.
	Ellen told a story to Helen.
	Ellen told a story to Helen.
	Ellen told Helen a story.
	Ellen told Helen.
	Ellen told Helen about the situation.
*	Ellen told a story at Helen.
*	Ellen told for Helen to come.
	Susan whispered.
	Susan whispered to Rachel.
	Susan whispered the news.
	Susan whispered a few words.
	Susan whispered the news to Rachel.
*	Susan whispered Rachel the news.
	Susan whispered at Rachel.
	Susan whispered about the party.
	Susan whispered for me to come.
	Susan whispered "Shut up".
	Susan whispered "Shut up" at them.
	They whispered that the winner would be announced tonight.
	Heather cabled the news.
	Heather cabled Sara.
	Heather cabled the news to Sara.
	Heather cabled Sara the news.
*	Heather cabled to Sara.
*	Heather cabled the news at Sara.
	Heather cabled Sara about the situation.
	Heather cabled for Sara to come.
	Ellen talked.
*	Ellen talked for Helen to come.
	Ellen talked with Helen about the problem.
	Ellen talked with Helen.
	Ellen talked with Helen.
	Ellen and Helen talked.
	Ellen talked with Helen.
	Ellen and Helen talked together.
	Ellen and Helen talked.
*	Ellen talked Helen.
	Ellen talked with Helen.
*	Ellen talked Helen.
	Ellen was chitchatting.
	Ellen chitchatted with Helen.
	Ellen chitchatted with Helen about the problem.
*	Ellen chitchatted to Helen.
*	Ellen chitchatted to Helen about the problem.
*	Ellen chitchatted for Helen to come.
	Ellen chitchatted with Helen.
	Ellen and Helen chitchatted.
	Ellen chitchatted with Helen.
*	Ellen and Helen chitchatted together.
	Ellen and Helen chitchatted.
*	Ellen chitchatted Helen.
	Ellen chitchatted with Helen.
*	Ellen chitchatted Helen.
	Ellen said that melons were selling well.
	Ellen said to Helen that melons were selling well.
	Ellen said something.
	Ellen said a few words to Helen.
	Ellen said something to Helen.
*	Ellen said Helen something.
*	Ellen said to Helen.
*	Ellen said about the present conditions.
	Ellen complained to Helen.
	Ellen complained about the situation.
	Ellen complained about the situation to Helen.
	Ellen warned Helen.
*	Ellen warned to Helen.
	Ellen warned against skating on thin ice.
	Ellen warned Helen against skating on thin ice.
	Ellen warned Helen that melons were selling.
	Ellen warned that melons were selling.
*	Ellen warned for Helen to come.
	Ellen warned about the traffic jam.
	Ellen warned Helen about the traffic jam.
	The dog barked.
	The dog barked at the cat.
	Cynthia ate the peach.
	Cynthia ate the peach.
	Cynthia ate.
	Cynthia ate the peach.
	Cynthia ate at the peach.
*	Cynthia ate on the peach.
	Cynthia ate the peach with a fork.
*	The fork ate the peach.
	Cynthia nibbled the carrot.
	Cynthia nibbled the carrot.
	Cynthia nibbled.
	Cynthia nibbled the carrot.
	Cynthia nibbled at the carrot.
	Cynthia nibbled on the carrot.
	Cynthia gobbled the pizza.
	Cynthia gobbled the pizza down.
	Cynthia gobbled the pizza.
*	Cynthia gobbled.
	Cynthia gobbled the pizza.
*	Cynthia gobbled at the pizza.
*	Cynthia gobbled on the pizza.
	Cynthia devoured the pizza.
*	Cynthia devoured.
	Cynthia devoured the pizza.
*	Cynthia devoured at the pizza.
*	Cynthia devoured on the pizza.
	Cynthia breakfasted.
	Cynthia breakfasted on peaches.
	Cynthia breakfasted.
*	Cynthia breakfasted peaches.
*	Cynthia breakfasted peaches.
*	Cynthia breakfasted at peaches.
*	Cynthia gorged.
	Cynthia gorged on peaches.
*	Cynthia gorged.
*	Cynthia gorged peaches.
*	Cynthia gorged peaches.
*	Cynthia gorged at peaches.
	Teresa bottlefed the baby.
	Teresa bottlefed soy milk to the baby.
	Teresa bottlefed the baby soy milk.
?	Teresa bottlefed the baby with soy milk.
?	Teresa bottlefed the baby on soy milk.
*	Teresa bottlefed soy milk.
	Paul hiccuped.
*	Paul hiccuped on Mary.
*	Paul hiccuped at Mary.
	Paul breathed.
	Paul breathed on Mary.
*	Paul breathed at Mary.
	Paul exhaled.
*	Paul exhaled at Mary.
*	Paul exhaled on Mary.
	Paul laughed.
	Paul laughed at Mary.
	She laughed from embarrassment.
	She laughed in embarrassment.
	Linda winked her eye.
*	Linda winked her lip.
*	Linda winked her nose.
	Linda winked her eye.
*	Linda winked his eye.
	Linda winked her eye.
	Linda winked.
	Linda winked at the audience.
	Linda winked in agreement.
	Jennifer craned her neck.
*	Jennifer craned his neck.
	Jennifer craned her neck.
*	Jennifer craned her arm.
	Jennifer craned her neck.
*	Jennifer craned.
	Jennifer wagged her finger at the naughty child.
	The princess curtseyed.
	The princess curtseyed to the queen.
*	The heavy meal snoozed Gloria.
	Gloria snoozed.
	Sharon flinched.
	Sharon flinched at the sight of the accident.
*	The shock flinched Sharon.
	Sharon flinched.
	Sharon shivered.
	Sharon shivered from fear.
	Sharon shivered at the thought of the cold sea.
	Sharon shivered.
*	The fear shivered Sharon.
	The pirates drowned the sailor.
	The sailor drowned.
	The seamonster drowned the sailors.
?	Sailors drown easily.
	My eyes are itching.
	My eyes are itching me.
*	My eyes are itching my brother.
	My eyes are itching from the smoke.
	My heart is pounding.
*	My heart is pounding me.
*	My heart is pounding my brother.
	My heart is pounding from fear.
	Tessa sprained her ankle.
*	Tessa sprained Mary 's ankle.
	Tessa cut herself.
*	Tessa cut.
	Tessa sprained her ankle.
*	Tessa sprained.
	Sharon fainted.
	Sharon fainted from hunger.
	Sharon fainted at the sight of the accident.
*	Hunger fainted Sharon.
	Sharon fainted.
	Marlene dressed.
	The baby dressed.
	Marlene dressed the baby.
	Marlene dressed herself.
	Marlene dressed.
*	Marlene dressed her body.
	Sheila groomed the horse.
*	The horse groomed itself.
*	The horse groomed.
	The hygienist flossed my teeth.
	I flossed my teeth.
	I flossed.
*	I flossed myself.
	I flossed my teeth.
	I flossed.
	Celia brushed the baby's hair.
	Celia brushed her hair.
	Celia brushed her hair.
*	Celia brushed.
*	Celia brushed herself.
*	Celia brushed.
	She always wore purple dresses.
*	She always wore herself.
*	She always wore herself in purple.
*	She always wore.
	She spruced herself up before the job interview.
	She spruced up before the job interview.
	She was always clad in black.
*	Her stepmother always clad her in black.
*	She always clad herself in black.
*	She always clad in black.
	Brutus murdered Julius Caesar.
	Brutus murdered Julius Caesar.
*	Julius Caesar murdered.
	The bandits murdered innocent victims.
*	Innocent victims murder easily.
	Brutus murdered Julius Caesar with a dagger.
	The exterminators killed the insects with DDT.
	The witch poisoned Snow White.
	The witch poisoned Snow White.
*	Snow White poisoned.
	The witch poisoned the children.
*	Children poison easily.
	The jewel sparkled.
	Jewels sparkled on the crown.
	The crown sparkled with jewels.
	A magnificent diamond sparkled on his finger.
	On his finger .sparkled a magnificent diamond.
	A magnificent diamond sparkled on his finger.
	On his finger there sparkled a magnificent diamond.
	The stagehand flashed the lights.
*	The stagehand sparkled the lights.
	The door hinges squeaked.
	Birds sang in the trees.
	The trees sang with birds.
	A grandfather clock ticked in the hallway.
	In the hallway ticked a grandfather clock.
	A grandfather clock ticked in the hallway.
	In the hallway there ticked a grandfather clock.
	I buzzed the bell.
*	I squeaked the door.
	The bell chimed the hour.
	a squeaking door
	The onions reeked.
	The room reeked of onions.
	The room reeked
*	Kelly reeked the onions.
	The onions reeked.
	The well gushed oil.
*	I gushed the fountain.
	I bled him.
	The well gushed oil.
	Oil gushed from the well.
	Water gushed through the streets.
	The streets gushed with water.
	A fragrant stew bubbled over the fire.
	Over the fire bubbled a fragrant stew.
	A fragrant stew bubbled over the fire.
	Over the fire there bubbled a fragrant stew.
	a gushing fountain
	The Romans destroyed the city.
	The Romans destroyed the city.
*	The city destroyed.
	The Romans destroyed the city.
*	Cities destroy easily.
*	The Romans destroyed the city into ruins.
*	The Romans destroyed ruins from the city.
*	The Romans destroyed the city into a ruin.
*	The Romans destroyed the city from a capital into a ruin.
	The builders destroyed the warehouse with explosives.
	The explosives destroyed the warehouse.
	The builders destroyed the warehouse.
*	The builders destroyed at the warehouse.
	Tony broke the window.
	The window broke.
	Tony broke the crystal vase.
	Crystal vases break easily.
	Tony broke the window with a hammer.
	The hammer broke the window.
	Tony broke the cup against the wall.
*	Tony broke the wall with the cup.
	Tony broke the window.
*	Tony broke at the window.
*	Tony broke herself on the ann.
	Tony broke her arm.
	Tony bent the rod with pliers.
	Tony bent the rod.
	The rod bent.
	Tony bent the copper rod.
	Copper rods bend easily.
	Tony bent the rod with pliers.
	The pliers bent the rod.
	Tony bent the rod against the table.
*	Tony bent the table with the rod.
	Tony bent the rod.
*	Tony bent at the rod.
*	Tony bent Mary in the arm.
	Tony bent Mary's arm.
	Jennifer baked the potatoes.
	The potatoes baked.
	Jennifer baked Idaho potatoes.
	Idaho potatoes bake beautifully.
	Jennifer baked the potatoes in the oven.
	This oven bakes potatoes well.
	Jennifer baked the potatoes.
*	Jennifer baked at the potatoes.
	Bill dried the clothes.
	The clothes dried.
	Bill dried the cotton clothes.
	Cotton clothes dry easily.
	Bill dried the clothes with a hairdryer.
	The hairdryer dried the clothes.
	Bill dried the clothes.
*	Bill dried at the clothes.
	A lot of clothes are drying on the line.
*	The line is drying with a lot of clothes.
	Bill is drying a lot of clothes on the line.
*	Bill is drying the line with a lot of clothes.
	A lot of clothes are drying on the line.
*	On the line are drying a lot of clothes.
	A lot of clothes are drying on the line.
*	On the line there are drying a lot of clothes.
	The roses bloomed.
*	The sun bloomed the roses.
	The roses bloomed.
	The temperature soared.
	Oil soared in price.
	The temperature soared.
*	The heat soared the temperature.
	Oil soared in price.
*	There soared oil in price.
	Oil soared in price.
*	In price soared oil.
	soaring temperatures
	Cornelia lodged with the Stevensons.
	Cornelia lodged at Mrs. Parker's.
	Cornelia lodged in the new boarding house.
	An old woman lodged at Mrs. Parker's.
*	There lodged an old woman at Mrs. Parker's.
	An old woman lodged at Mrs. Parker's.
*	At Mrs. Parker's lodged an old woman.
	Squatters lodged in these abandoned buildings.
*	These abandoned buildings lodged with squatters.
	The soldiers lodged in the schoolhouse.
	An old woman lived in the forest.
	Unicorns don't exist.
	Unicorns don't exist on the Earth.
	A solution to this problem exists.
	There exists a solution to this problem.
	An old woman languished in the forest.
	In the forest languished an old woman.
	A crowd of people remained in the square.
*	The square remained with a crowd of people.
	A solution to this problem exists.
*	The famous mathematician existed a solution to the problem.
	The beer foamed.
	A fire raged in the mountains.
	In the mountains there raged a fire.
	A fire raged all through the mountains.
	All through the mountains raged a fire.
	Roses flowered in the garden.
	The garden flowered with roses.
	A fire raged over the fields.
*	The farmers raged a fire over the fields.
	A large flag fluttered.
	A large flag fluttered over the fort.
	Many flags fluttered over the fort.
*	The fort fluttered with many flags.
	A large flag fluttered over the fort.
	Over the fort there fluttered a large flag.
	A large flag fluttered over the fort.
	Over the fmt fluttered a large flag.
	The tree trembled.
	The flag waved.
	The voices echoed in the hall.
	The hall is echoing with voices.
	A loud cry echoed through the hall.
	Through the hall there echoed a loud cry.
	A loud cry echoed through the hall.
	Through the hall echoed a loud cry.
	The music echoed.
*	The magician echoed the music.
*	an echoing voice
	Bees are swarming in the garden.
	The garden is swarming with bees.
	A striped fish swam in the aquarium.
	In the aquarium swam a striped fish.
	A striped fish swam in the aquarium.
	In the aquarium there swam a striped fish.
	Bees are swarming in the garden.
	The garden is swarming with bees.
	The cattle are herding in the pasture.
	The cattle are herding in the pasture.
*	The pasture is herding with cattle.
	The cattle herded.
	I herded the cattle.
	The bag is bulging with groceries.
*	Groceries are bulging in the bag.
	The bag is bulging.
*	I bulged the bag with groceries.
*	I bulged the bag.
	A statue of Jefferson stood on the comer.
	There stood on the comer a statue of Jefferson.
	A statue of Jefferson stood on the comer of the two boulevards.
	On the comer of the two boulevards stood a statue of Jefferson.
	They stood the statue on the pedestal.
	The statue stood on the pedestal.
	the hanging gardens
	The river runs from the lake to the sea.
	The stream winds through the valley.
	The stream twists through the valley.
	The stream crawls through the valley.
	A rushing stream ran through the valley.
	Through the valley ran a rushing stream.
	A rushing stream ran through the valley.
	There ran through the valley a rushing stream.
	Italy borders France.
	Italy touches France.
	Snow caps the mountain.
	A ship appeared.
	A ship appeared on the horizon.
	A ship appeared on the horizon.
	There appeared a ship on the horizon.
	A large ship appeared on the horizon.
	On the horizon appeared a large ship.
	A dove appeared from the magician's sleeve.
*	The magician appeared a dove from his sleeve.
	A solution immediately presented itself.
*	A solution immediately presented.
	A solution immediately presented itself to him.
	A wonderful opportunity presented itself yesterday.
*	There presented itself a wonderful opportunity yesterday.
	A wonderful opportunity presented itself to him yesterday.
*	To him presented itself a wonderful opportunity.
	I presented a solution yesterday.
	A solution presented itself yesterday.
	The crowd vanished.
	A valuable 1 3th-century manuscript recently vanished from the
	A valuable 13th-century manuscript recently vanished from the
	The rabbit vanished into thin air.
*	The magician vanished a rabbit into thin air.
	A serious accident happened yesterday.
	There happened a serious accident yesterday.
	A serious accident happened in front of them.
	In front of them happen.
	The accident happened.
*	The motorist happened the accident.
	Sylvia fidgeted.
	Sylvia fidgeted.
*	The lecture fidgeted Sylvia.
	The dog flopped onto the bed.
	The dog flopped in the comer.
	A dog lay in the comer.
*	There lay a dog in the comer.
	A dog lay in the corner.
*	In the corner lay a dog.
	The convict escaped.
	The convict escaped from the police.
	The convict escaped the police.
	The convict escaped.
*	The collaborators escaped the convict.
	We abandoned the area.
*	We abandoned from the area.
	The ball rolled.
	The ball rolled down the hill.
	The ball rolled over the hill.
	The ball rolled into the gutter.
	Bill rolled the ball down the hill.
	The ball rolled down the hill.
	The ball rolled down the hill.
*	The ball rolled the hill.
	The horse jumped over the stream.
	The horse jumped across the stream.
	The horse jumped into the stream.
	The horse jumped out of the stream.
	The horse jumped over the fence.
	The lions jumped through the hoop.
	The horse jumped over the stream.
	The horse jumped the stream.
	A little white rabbit jumped out of the box.
	There jumped out of the box a little white rabbit.
	A little white rabbit jumped out of the box.
	Out of the box jumped a little white rabbit.
	We walked ourselves into a state of exhaustion.
	Tom ran the soles off his shoes.
	He skated Penny around the rink.
	Penny skated around the rink.
	They skated along the canals.
	They skated the canals.
	They rowed.
	He rowed Penny across the lake.
	Penny rowed across the lake.
	They rowed along the canals of Venice.
	They rowed the canals of Venice.
	They waltzed.
	She waltzed across the floor.
	He waltzed her across the floor.
	Jackie chased after the thief.
	Jackie chased the thief down the street.
	Jackie chased the thief.
*	The thief chased down the street.
*	The thief chased.
	Jackie accompanied Rose.
	Jackie accompanied Rose.
*	Rose accompanied.
	Sasha dawdled in the museum.
	Sasha dawdled over lunch.
	Sasha dawdled over lunch.
*	Phyllis dawdled Sasha over lunch.
	Maggie hurried through the museum.
	Her sister hurried.
	Maggie hurried her sister.
	The package weighed ten pounds.
	The package weighed ten pounds.
*	Ten pounds was weighed by the package.
	The package weighed ten pounds.
*	I weighed the package ten pounds.
	I weighed the package.
	The book costs $10.
	The book costs $10.
*	I costed the book $10.
	Each room sleeps five people.
	We sleep five people in each room.
	Each room sleeps five people.
	The dealer valued the book at $200.
*	The book valued at $200.
*	The book valued $200.
	The phone company billed me $10 for that phone call.
*	The phone company billed $10 to me.
	The phone company billed me $10.
	The phone company billed me $10.
*	The phone company billed $10 as me.
	The meeting began at 4 P.M.
	I began the meeting at 4 P.M.
	Wilma completed the assignment.
	Wilma completed the assignment.
*	The assignment completed.
	My family always summered at the seashore.











<Jong-Bok Kim and Peter Sells, 2008>
	The man kicked a ball.
	A man kicked the ball.
	The ball kicked a man.
	A ball kicked the man.
	The ball, a man kicked.
	The man, a ball kicked.
*	Kicked the man the ball.
*	Man the ball kicked the.
*	The man a ball kicked.
	Kim lives in the house Lee sold to her.
*	Kim lives in the house Lee sold it to her.
*	Kim fond of Lee.
	Kim is fond of Lee.
	In January 2002, a dull star in an obscure constellation suddenly became 600,000 times more luminous than our Sun, temporarily making it the brightest star in our galaxy.
	The man kicked the ball.
	The tall man kicked the ball.
	The handsome, tall man kicked the ball.
	The handsome, tall, nice man kicked the ball.
	Some sentences can go on.
	Some sentences can go on and on.
	Some sentences can go on and on and on.
	Some sentences can go on and on and on and on.
	All native speakers have a grammatical competence which can generate an infinite set of grammatical sentences from a finite set of resources.
*	The professor found some strong evidences of water on Mars.
*	The professor was hoping for a strong evidence.
	Do not end a sentence with a preposition.
	Avoid double negatives.
	Avoid split infinitives.
*	The evidence that John found was more helpful than the one that Smith found.
*	We had hoped to get three new equipments every month, but we only had enough
*	The equipment we bought last year was more expensive than the one we bought this year.
	The student was hoping for a good clue.
	The clue that John got was more helpful than the one that Smith got.
	The student was hoping for a tool.
	The tool that Jones got was more helpful than the one that Smith got.
	much evidence is needed.
	much equipment is needed.
	much information is needed.
	much furniture is needed.
	much advice is needed.
*	much clue is needed.
*	much tool is needed.
*	much armchair is needed.
*	much bags is needed.
*	many evidence was provided.
*	many equipment is available.
*	many information was provided.
*	The room contains many furniture.
*	John offers many advice.
	The paper provides many clues.
	The box contains many tools.
	John offers many suggestions.
	The room contains many armchairs.
	little evidence was provided.
	little equipment is available.
	John offers little advice.
	little information was provided.
*	little clue could be found.
*	the box contains little tool.
*	John offers little suggestion.
*	The room contains little armchair.
*	few evidence was provided.
*	few equipment is available.
*	the room contains few furniture
*	John offers few advice.
*	few information was provided.
	few clues could be found.
	the box contains few tools.
	John offers few suggestions.
	The room contains few armchairs.
	The mayor gave John some good cakes.
	The president was hoping for a good cake.
	The cake that Jones got was more delicious than the one that Smith got.
	The bartender gave John some good beers.
	No one knows how to tell from a good beer to a bad one.
	My pastor says I ate too much cake.
	The students drank too much beer last night.
	We recommend to eat less cake and pastry.
	People now drink less beer.
	In English, the main verb agrees with the head element of the subject.
*	The recent strike by pilots have cost the country a great deal of money from tourism and so on.
*	The average age at which people begin to need eyeglasses vary considerably.
*	The recent strike by pilots have cost the country a great deal of money from tourism and so on.
*	The average age at which people begin to need eyeglasses vary considerably.
*	Despite of his limited educational opportunities, Abraham Lincoln became one of the greatest intellectuals in the world.
*	A pastor was executed, notwithstanding on many applications in favor of him.
	Visiting relatives can be boring.
	I saw that gas can explode.
	He said that that ‘that’ that that man used was wrong.
	Kim and Sandy is looking for a new bicycle.
	I have never put the book.
	The boat floated down the river sank.
	Chris must liking syntax.
	There is eager to be fifty students in this class.
	What is John eager to do?
	What is John easy to do?
	Is the boy who holding the plate can see the girl?
	Which chemical did you mix the hydrogen peroxide and?
	There seem to be a good feeling developing among the students.
	Strings have been pulled many times to get students into that university.
	He washed himself.
*	He washed herself.
*	He washed myself.
*	He washed ourselves.
	He washed me.
	He washed her.
	He washed us.
	Wash yourself.
	Wash yourselves.
*	Wash myself.
*	Wash himself.
*	Wash you!
	Wash me!
	The weather is lovely today.
	I am hoping that the weather is lovely today.
	If the weather is lovely today then we will go out.
	The birds are singing because the weather is lovely today.
	They read the book.
	He treats John very.
	He walked right the wall.
	They have no TV.
	They have no car.
	They have no information.
	They have no friend.
*	They have no went.
*	They have no in.
*	They have no old.
*	They have no and.
	They can sing.
	They can run.
	They can smile.
	They can cry.
*	They can happy.
*	They can down.
*	They can door.
*	They can very.
	They read the big book.
	They read the new book.
	They read the interesting book.
	They read the scientific book
*	They read the sing book.
*	They read the under book.
*	They read the every book.
	He treats John very nicely.
	He treats John very badly.
	He treats John very kindly.
*	He treats John very kind.
*	He treats John very shame.
*	He treats John very under.
	He walked right into the wall.
	He walked right on the wall.
*	He walked right very.
*	He walked right happy.
*	He walked right the wall.
	John sang a song, Mary played the piano.
	John thinks Bill is honest.
	We found out that very lucrative jobs were in jeopardy.
*	My these jobs are in jeopardy.
*	Some my jobs are in jeopardy.
*	The his jobs are in jeopardy.
	I think learning English is not easy at all.
	I doubt you can help me in understanding this.
	I am anxious you to study English grammar hard.
	I think that learning English is not all that easy.
	I doubt if you can help me in understanding this.
	I am anxious for you to study English grammar hard.
*	I think that learning English to be not all that easy.
*	I doubt if you to help me in understanding this.
*	I am anxious for you should study English grammar hard.
	John not leave.
	John drink beer last night.
	John leave for Seoul tomorrow?
	John will study syntax, and Mary, too.
	He left.
	He did not leave.
	Students wanted to write a letter.
	Students intended to surprise the teacher.
	Students objected to the teacher.
	Students sent letters to the teacher.
	It is crucial for John to show an interest.
	It is crucial that John should show an interest.
	I know I should go to the dentist’s, but I just don’t want to.
	I don’t really want to go to the dentist’s, but I know I should.
*	She thought it was likely that everyone to fit into the car.
	She thought it was likely that everyone might fit into the car.
	She thought it was likely that everyone would fit into the car.
	She thought it was easy for everyone to fit into the car.
*	She thought it was easy for everyone would fit into the car.
*	She thought it was easy for everyone would fit into the car.
	The umpire called off the game.
	The two boys looked up the word.
	The umpire called the game off.
	The two boys looked the word up.
	The umpire fell off the deck.
	The two boys looked up the high stairs.
	The two boys looked up the high stairs from the floor.
*	The umpire fell the deck off.
*	The students looked the high stairs up from the floor.
*	The students looked the high stairs up.
	The umpire called it of.
*	The umpire called off it.
*	The umpire fell it off.
	The umpire fell off it.
	A man kicked the ball.
	A tall boy threw the ball.
	The cat chased the long string.
	The happy student played the piano.
	That ball hit a student.
	The piano played a song.
	The piano kicked a student.
	That ball sang a student.
	The tall man kicked the ball.
	The tall, handsome man kicked the ball.
	The tall, kind, handsome man kicked the ball.
	The happy, happy, happy, happy, happy, happy man sang a song.
	The mother of the boy and the girl is arriving soon.
	The mother of the boy and the girl are arriving soon.
	The mother of the boy and the girl is arriving soon.
	The mother of the boy and the girl are arriving soon.
	John saw the man with a telescope.
	I like chocolate cakes and pies.
	We need more intelligent leaders.
	John saw the man with a telescope.
	The student enjoyed his English syntax class last semester.
	The policeman met several young students in the park last night.
	It was the policeman that met several young students in the park last night.
	It was several young students that the policeman met in the park last night.
	It was in the park that the policeman met several young students last night.
	It was last night that the policeman met several young students in the park.
*	It was the policeman met that several young students in the park last night.
*	It was several young students in that the policeman met the park last night.
*	It was in the park last night that the policeman met several young students.
	Where did the policeman meet several young students?
	did the policeman meet in the park?
	John put old books in the box.
	What did you put in your box?
	Where did you put the book?
	What did you do?
	John looked up the inside of the chimney.
	John looked up the meaning of ‘chanson’.
	What did he look up?
	Where did he look?
	Up what did he look?
	What do you think the man who is standing by the door is doing now?
	What do you think he is doing now?
	Have you been to Seoul?
	John might go home, so might Bill.
	John might pass the exam, and as might Bill.
	If John can speak French fluently – which we all know he can – we will have no problems.
	John asked me to put the clothes in the cupboard, and to annoy him I really stuffed them there.
	John asked me to put the clothes in the cupboard, and to annoy him I stuffed them there.
*	John asked me to put the clothes in the cupboard, but I did so =put the clothes in the suitcase.
	The girls played in the water and swam under the bridge.
	The children were neither in their rooms nor on the porch.
	She was poor but quite happy.
	Many people drink beer or wine.
*	Mary waited for the bus and to go home.
*	Lee went to the store and crazy.
	liked ice cream.
*	the whistle tune was beautiful.
*	the easily student finished his homework.
*	the my dog is a terrier.
	The monkey wants to leave the meeting.
*	The monkey eager to leave the meeting.
	The monkeys approved of their leader.
*	The monkeys proud of their leader.
	The men practice medicine.
*	The men doctors of medicine.
	John read the book loudly.
	The teacher met his students in the class.
	John sounded happy.
	John felt proud that his son won the game.
*	John sounded happily.
*	John sounded very.
*	John sounded the student.
*	John sounded in the park.
*	The monkeys seem want to leave the meeting.
	The monkeys seem eager to leave the meeting.
*	John seems know about the bananas.
	John seems certain about the bananas.
	John came from Seoul.
	They put the book in the box.
	They stayed in the hotel.
	The fly fell into the soup.
	The squirrel ran straight.
	The squirrel ran right up the tree.
*	The squirrel is right angry.
*	The squirrel ran straight quickly.
*	The squirrel ran right quickly.
	This handsome man chased a dog.
	A man kicked that ball.
	That tall woman chased a cat.
	His friend kicked a ball.
	Bill claims John believes Mary thinks Tom is honest.
	Jane imagines Bill claims John believes Mary thinks Tom is honest.
	The little boy hit the child with a toy.
	Chocolate cakes and pies are my favorite desserts.
*	The children were in their rooms or happily.
*	Lee went to the store and crazy.
	John suddenly got off the bus.
	John suddenly put off the customers.
*	John suddenly got the bus off.
	John suddenly put the customers off.
	His second book came out earlier this year and became an instant best-seller.
	When you book something such as a hotel room, you arrange to have it.
	Price quotes on selected categories will be sent out upon request.
	No doubt that he was forced to leave his family against his will.
	He intended to will the large amount of money to Frank.
	Jane stood aside to let her pass.
	He has a rail pass that’s right for you.
	It is important for us to spend time with children.
	He was arrested for being drunk.
	I think that person we met last week is insane.
	We believe that he is quite reasonable.
	I forgot to return the book that I borrowed from the teacher.
	I am anxious that you should arrive on time.
*	I am anxious that you to arrive on time.
	I am anxious for you to arrive on time.
*	I am anxious for you should arrive on time.
	I don’t know if I should agree.
	I wonder whether you’d be kind enough to give us information.
	If students study hard, teachers will be happy.
	Whether they say it or not, most teachers expect their students to study hard.
	John bought a book on the table.
	John put a book on the table.
	She turned down the side street.
	She turned down his offer.
	He looked at a book about swimming.
	He talked to a girl about swimming.
	He talked with a girl about swimming.
	I don’t know the people present.
	John called the president a fool.
*	Could you turn off the fire and on the light?
*	A nuclear explosion would wipe out plant life and out animal life.
*	He ran down the road and down the President.
*	I know the truth and that you are innocent.
*	Lee went to the store and crazy.
	John refused the offer proudly.
	I consider John the best candidate.
	I saw him leaving the main building.
	He took John to the school by the park.
	John sang a song and danced to the music.
	John wants to study linguistics in near future.
	They told Angelica to arrive early for the award.
	That Louise had abandoned the project surprised everyone.
	I know you like the back of my hand.
	I forgot how good beer tastes.
	I saw that gas can explode.
	Time flies like an arrow.
	I need to have that report on our web page by tomorrow.
	The monkey scratched a boy on Monday.
	John tagged the monkey in the forest.
	The monkey was tagged in the forest by John.
	The cat devoured the rat.
	The rat devoured the cat.
	My brother wears a green overcoat.
	This car stinks.
	It rains.
	The committee disliked her proposal.
	These books sadden me.
*	These books sadden me.
	Our neighbor takes his children to school in his car.
*	Our neighbor take his children to school in his car.
	The book, including all the chapters in the first section, is very interesting.
*	The book, including all the chapters in the first section, are very interesting.
	The effectiveness of teaching and learning depends on several factors.
*	The effectiveness of teaching and learning *depend on several factors.
	The tornadoes that tear through this county every spring are more than just a nuisance.
*	The tornadoes that tear through this county every spring is more than just a nuisance.
	The lady singing with a boy is a genius, isn’t he?
*	The lady singing with a boy is a genius, isn’t she?
	With their teacher, the kids have arrived safely, haven’t they?
*	With their teacher, the kids have arrived safely, hasn’t he?
	This teacher is a genius.
	The kids have arrived safely.
	It could be more detrimental.
	Is this teacher a genius?
	Have the kids arrived safely?
	Could it be more detrimental?
	The kids in our class have arrived safely.
*	Have in our class the kids arrived safely?
	His girlfriend bought this computer.
	That silly fool broke the teapot.
	Thunder frightens the dog.
	The dog fears thunder.
	His girlfriend bought this computer for him.
	The child broke the teapot by accident.
	This computer was bought for him by his girlfriend.
	The teapot was broken by the child by accident.
	This item belongs to the student.
*	The student is belonged to by this item.
	He remained a good friend to me.
*	A good friend is remained to me.
*	A good friend is remained to me by him.
	I threw the puppy the ball.
	John gave the boys the CDs.
	My mother baked me a birthday cake.
	She was sent a review copy of the book by the publisher.
	She was sent a review copy of the book.
	John gave the CDs to the boys.
	The publisher sent a review copy of the book to her.
	My mother baked a cake for me.
	The CDs were given to the boys by John.
	A review copy of the book was sent to her by the publisher.
	This nice cake was baked for me by my mother.
	This is my ultimate goal.
	Michelle became an architect.
	They elected Graham chairman.
*	Chairman was elected Graham.
*	The best writer was considered Andrew.
	John made Kim a great doll.
	John made Kim a great doctor.
	The situation became terrible.
	This map is what he wants.
	The message was that you should come on time.
	I made Kim angry.
	I consider him immoral.
	I regard Andrew as the best writer.
	They spoil their kids rotten.
	John put books in the box.
	John talked to Bill about the exam.
	She reminded him of the last time they met.
	They would inform Mary of any success they have made.
	John gave a book to the student.
	John bought a book for the student.
	The bus stopped suddenly.
	Shakespeare wrote his plays a long time ago.
	They went to the theater in London.
	He failed chemistry because he can’t understand it.
*	John gave Tom a book a record.
	I saw this film several times last year during the summer.
	My uncle visited today.
*	Today was visited by my uncle.
	The termites destroyed the sand castle.
	Being honest is not an easy task.
	That John passed surprised her.
	To finish this work on time is almost unexpected.
	Under the bed is a safe place to hide.
	I sent a surprise present to John.
	They wondered what she did yesterday.
	They believed that everybody would pass the test.
	Are you going on holiday before or after Easter? I prefer after Easter.
	That John passed surprised her, didn’t it?
	That the march should go ahead and that it should be cancelled have been argued by different people at different times.
*	That the march should go ahead and that it should be cancelled has been argued by different people at different times.
	To finish it on time made quite a statement, didn’t it?
	To delay the march and to go ahead with it have been argued by different people at different times.
*	To delay the march and to go ahead with it has been argued by different people at different times.
	The little cat devoured a mouse last night.
	John left AdvP very early.
	John has been at Stanford for four years.
	John studied hard to pass the exam.
	She disappeared when the main party arrived.
	into a closed set of participant types. Even though we
	John ate his noodle quietly.
	A boy hit the ball.
	A smith hammered the metal.
	A boy hit the ball.
	A smith hammered the metal.
	The students felt comfortable in the class.
	The student heard a strange sound.
	John gave a book to the students.
	John died last night.
	John made a doll for his son.
	John bought a lot of books for his sons.
	John promised Bill to leave tomorrow morning.
	John deprived his sons of game cards.
	Mary received an award from the department.
	John told the rumor to his friend.
	John put his books in the attic.
	The government kept all the money.
	John hit the ball with a bat.
	John wiped the window with a towel.
	agt The cat chased pat the mouse.
	pat The mouse was chased by agt the cat.
	There still remains an issue to be solved.
	There lived a man with his grandson.
	There arrived a tall, red-haired and incredibly well dressed man.
*	There sang a man with a pipe.
*	There dances a man with an umbrella.
	John resembles his mother.
	A is similar to B.
	John runs into the house.
	Mary looked at the sky.
	All of his conversation was reported to me.
	Sandy removed her ballet shoes.
	The school awarded a few of the girls in Miss Kim’s class scholarships.
	She was the nicest teacher in the Senior School.
	They elected him America’s 31st President.
	The next morning we set out for Seoul.
	Doing syntax is not easy.
	This is the place to go to.
	He saw the man with the stick.
	This week will be a difficult one for us.
	We need to finish the project this week.
	They parted the best of friends.
	In the summer we always go to France.
	Benny worked in a shoe factory when he was a student.
	Last year I saw this film several times.
	He baked Tom the bread last night.
	That they have completed the course is amazing.
	Everyone hoped that she would sing.
	The gang robbed her of her necklace.
	They helped us edit the script.
	The teacher made students happy.
	We reminded him of the agreement.
	In the garden stands a statue.
*	In the garden stand a statue.
	Among the guests was sitting my friend Louise.
*	Among the guests were sitting my friend Louise.
	This proved a decisive factor.
	This proved my hypothesis.
	The students all enjoyed that summer.
	The students all worked that summer.
	The scientist made her a robot.
	The students called me a teacher.
	A big green insect flew into the soup.
	John’s mother sent a letter to Mary.
	John smelled the freshly baked bread.
	We placed the cheese in the refrigerator.
	Frank threw himself into the sofa.
	The crocodile devoured the doughnut.
	John came from Seoul.
	John is afraid of Bill.
	The ice melted.
	The vacuum cleaner terrifies the child.
	Scientists found that the birds sang well in the evenings, but performed badly in the mornings.
*	John put his gold.
*	John put under the bathtub.
*	John put his gold safe.
*	John put his gold to be under the bathtub.
	John put his gold under the bathtub.
	This is the box in which John put his gold.
	This is the gold that John put under the bathtub.
*	The king kept put his gold under the bathtub.
	The king kept putting his gold under the bathtub.
	The defendant denied the accusation.
*	The defendant denied.
	The teacher handed the student a book.
*	The teacher handed the student.
	They want to leave the meeting.
*	They eager to leave the meeting.
	The senators know that the president is telling a lie.
*	The senators certain that the president is telling a lie.
	be eager to leave the meeting.
*	The senators to be certain that the president is telling a lie.
*	The senators be certain that the president is telling a lie.
	Tom offered advice to his students in his office.
	Tom offered advice to his students with love.
	John placed Kim behind the garage.
	John kept him behind the garage.
*	John stayed Kim behind the garage.
*	John placed him busy.
	John kept him busy.
*	John stayed him busy.
*	John placed behind the counter.
*	John kept behind the counter.
	John stayed behind the counter.
	John deposited some money in the bank.
	John deposited some money in the bank on Friday.
*	The UN blamed global warming on humans on natural causes.
	Kim and Sandy met in Seoul in the lobby of the Lotte Hotel in March.
	John deposited some money in the checking account and Mary did the same thing.
	John deposited some money in the checking account on Friday and Mary did the same thing.
	John deposited some money in the checking account on Friday and Mary did the same thing on Monday.
*	John deposited some money in the checking account and Mary did the same thing in the savings account.
*	John gave a present to the student and Mary did the same thing to the teacher.
*	John locked Fido in the garage and Mary did so in the room.
*	John ate a carrot and Mary did so a radish.
	Kim camps on the hill.
	Kim jogs on the hill.
	Kim jogs under the hill.
	Kim jogs over the hill.
	Kim depends.
	Kim relies on Sandy.
	Kim depends on Sandy.
*	Kim depends at Sandy.
*	Kim depends for Sandy.
	John met a student in the park.
*	John met in the park a student.
*	The problem disappeared the accusation.
	The problem disappeared.
*	The defendant denied.
	The defendant denied the accusation.
*	The boy gave the book.
	The boy gave the baby the book.
	The bird devours the worm.
	The birds devour the worm.
	Every photo of Max and sketch by his students appeared in the magazine.
	No photo of Max and sketch by his students appeared in the magazine.
*	Sketch by his students appeared in the magazine.
	Every photo of Max and sketch by his students appeared in the magazine.
	No photo of Max and sketch by his students appeared in the magazine.
	The present king of country music is more popular than the last one.
*	The king of Rock and Roll is more popular than the one of country music.
	Which student were you talking about?
	John put the book in the box.
*	John put in the box.
*	In the box put John the book.
#	The book put John in the box.
	The election results surprised everybody.
	That he won the election surprised everybody.
	John disappeared.
*	John disappeared Bill.
	John sneezed.
*	John sneezed the money.
	The president looked weary.
	The teacher became tired of the students.
	The lasagna tasted scrumptious.
	John remained somewhat calm.
	The jury seemed ready to leave.
	John became a success.
	John seemed a fool.
	John remained a student.
	John saw Fred.
	Alice typed the letter.
	Clinton supported the health care bill.
	Raccoons destroyed the garden.
	The school board leader asked the students a question.
	The parents bought the children non-fiction novels.
	John taught new students English Syntax.
	The school board leader asked a question of the students.
	The parents bought non-fiction novels for the children.
	John taught English Syntax to new students.
	John regards Bill as a good friend.
	The sexual revolution makes some people uncomfortable.
	Ad agencies call young people Generation X-ers.
	Historians believe FDR to be our most effective president.
*	John carried to the door.
	John carried her on his back.
	Tom locked Fido in the garage.
	Tom bathed Fido in the garage.
	Tom placed it under the table.
	Tom played it under the table.
	I wonder if you will come back tomorrow.
	You would have a reply if you come back tomorrow.
	Tom hid the manuscript in the cupboard.
	Fred hired Sharon to change the oil.
	They pushed the prisoners into the truck.
	Frank hopes to persuade Harry to make the cook wash the dishes.
	George mailed the attorney his photograph of the accident.
	Tom keeps asking Karen’s sister to buy the car.
	Jane left the book on the table.
	We have not confirmed whether the flight had been booked.
	We saw him beaten by the champion.
	They confined his remarks to the matter under discussion.
*	Oliver ascribed his longevity there.
*	Oliver mentioned Charles the problem.
*	Oliver fined ten pounds to the prisoner.
*	Oliver drove me a lunatic.
*	Oliver addressed the king the letter.
*	Oliver absented his brother from the meeting.
	The students of English from Seoul faced many issues in the process of interpreting, transcribing, and editing the poems.
	The love of my life and father of my children would never do such a thing.
	The museum displayed no painting by Miro or drawing by Klee.
	By law, every dog and cat in the area has to be spayed or neutered.
	Learning to use a language freely and fully is a lengthy and effortful process.
	Kim put the book in the box.
*	Kim put the book.
*	Kim put in the box.
*	Is putting the book in the box.
*	Talked with Bill about the exam.
	They write to her.
	They wrote to her.
	They are kind to her.
	They want to write to her.
*	They want to wrote to her.
	They want to be kind to her.
*	They want to are kind to her.
	The student knows the answers.
	The student knew the answers.
	The students know the answers.
*	The student knowing the answers.
*	The student known the answers.
	He is writing another long book about beavers.
	Broadly speaking, the project was successful.
	He is proud of his son’s passing the bar exam.
	The chicken has eaten.
	The chicken was eaten.
	Seen from this perspective, there is no easy solution.
	The monkeys kept forgetting their lines.
*	The monkeys kept forgot their lines.
*	The monkeys kept forgotten their lines.
	We caught them eating the bananas.
*	We caught them ate the bananas.
*	We caught them eat the bananas.
*	We caught them eaten the bananas.
	John made Mary cook Korean food.
*	John made Mary to cook Korean food.
*	John made Mary cooking Korean food.
	The monkey seems despondent that it is in a cage.
	The monkey seems despondent.
	He seems intelligent to study medicine.
*	He seems intelligent to study medicine.
	Monkeys are eager to leave.
*	Monkeys are eager leaving the compound.
*	The chickens seem fond with the farmer.
	The chickens seem fond of the farmer.
	The foxes seem compatible with the chickens.
*	The foxes seem compatible for the chickens.
	These are similar to the bottles.
*	These are similar with the bottles.
	The teacher is proud of his students.
*	The teacher is proud with his students.
	The contract is subject to approval by my committee.
*	The contract is subject for approval by my committee.
	There exists only one truly amphibian mammal.
	There arose a great storm.
	There exist few solutions which are cost-effective.
	There is a riot in the park.
	There remained just a few problems to be solved.
*	There runs a man in the park.
*	There sings a man loudly.
	They believe that Charles Darwin’s theory of evolution is just a scientific theory.
	They believe Charles Darwin’s theory of evolution is just a scientific theory.
	John demanded that she stop phoning him.
	The rules require that the executives be polite.
	Joe warned the class that the exam would be difficult.
	We told Tom that he should consult an accountant.
	Mary convinced me that the argument was sound.
	Tom intends for Sam to review that book.
	John would prefer for the children to finish the oatmeal.
	For John to either make up such a story or repeat it is outrageous.
	For John either to make up such a story or to repeat it is outrageous.
	For John to tell Bill such a lie and Bill to believe it is outrageous.
	John intends to review the book.
	John would prefer to finish the oatmeal.
	Tom tried to ask a question.
*	Tom tried for Bill to ask a question.
	Tom tends to avoid confrontations.
*	Tom tends for Mary to avoid confrontations.
	Joe hoped to find a solution.
*	Joe hoped for Beth to find a solution.
	John believed it.
	John believed that he is honest.
	John mentioned the issue to me.
	John mentioned to me that the question is an issue.
	She pinched his arm as hard as she could.
*	She pinched that he feels pain.
	We hope that such a vaccine could be available in ten years.
*	We hope the availability of such a vaccine in ten years.
	Cohen proved the independence of the continuum hypothesis.
	Cohen proved that the continuum hypothesis was independent.
	John bothers me.
	That John snores bothers me.
	John loves Bill
*	That John snores loves Bill.
	That John sold the ostrich surprised Bill.
	For John to train his horse would be desirable.
	To train his horse would be desirable.
	That the king or queen be present is a requirement on all Royal weddings.
	Which otter you should adopt first is unclear.
*	That Fred was unpopular nominated Bill.
*	That Tom missed the lecture was enjoyable.
*	For John to remove the mother is undeniable.
*	How much money Gordon spent is true.
	Tom is confident that the elephants respect him.
	Tom is insistent that the witnesses be truthful.
	Tom seems eager for her brother to catch a cold.
	Tom seems eager to catch a cold.
	I am ashamed that I neglected you.
	I am delighted that Mary finished his thesis.
	We are content for the cleaners to return the drapes next week.
	We were thankful that no one had been hurt.
	We were glad it was over.
	Bill alleged that Fred signed the check.
	We believe that the directors were present.
	We convinced him that the operation is safe.
*	Alan is thinking about that his students are eager to learn English.
*	Fred is counting on for Tom to make an announcement.
	The outcome depends on how many candidates participate in the election.
	Fred is thinking about whether he should stay in Seoul.
	The offer made Smith admire the administrators.
	John tried to make Sam let George ask Bill to keep delivering the mail.
	The soldiers must enforce Bill to make the baby be quiet.
	John enjoyed drawing trees for his syntax homework.
	The picture on the wall reminded him of his country.
	Free enterprise is compatible with American values and traditions.
	They were taking a hard look at possible FTA.
	We need to be in frequent contact with the clients.
	The contract is subject to approval by my committee.
	Acknowledge that everyone has limits.
	We are aware of the existing problems.
*	Why don’t you leaving me concentrate on my work?
*	The general commended that all troops was in dress uniform.
*	My morning routine features swim free styles slowly for one hour.
*	You should avoid to travel in the rush hour.
*	You should attempt answering every question.
*	The authorities blamed Greenpeace with the bombing.
*	The authorities charged the students of the cheating.
*	Sharon has been eager finishing the book.
*	We respect Mary’s desire for becoming famous.
*	John referred from the building.
*	John died to heart disease.
*	John paid me against the book.
*	We were glad what to do.
*	She was busy to make lunch.
	The constant rain forced the abandonment of the next day’s competitions.
	The committee will study the feasibility of setting up a national computer network.
	Aloe may have an analgesic effect on inflammation and minor skin irritations.
	The public never had faith in his ability to handle the job.
	He repeated his claim that the people backed his action.
	We made them take the money.
*	We made them are rude.
	We made them be rude.
	Do not use these words in the beginning of a sentence.
	We know the witnesses seem eager to testify against the criminal.
	Jane isn’t sure whether the students keep the books.
*	Book is available in most countries.
*	Student studies English for 4 hours a day.
	Rice is available in most countries.
	Students study English for 4 hours a day.
	His friend learned dancing.
	My bother’s friend learned dancing.
	The president’s bodyguard learned surveillance.
	The King of Rock and Roll’s records led to dancing.
	President Lincoln delivered his Gettysburg Address in 1863.
*	President Lincoln delivered her Gettysburg Address in 1863.
	After reading the pamphlet, Judy threw it into the garbage can.
*	After reading the pamphlet, Judy threw them into the garbage can.
	After the party, I asked myself why I had faxed invitations to everyone in my officebuilding.
	Edward usually remembered to send a copy of his e-mail to himself.
	No John Smiths attended the meeting.
	This John Smith lives in Seoul.
	There are three Davids in my class.
	It’s nothing like the America I remember.
	My brother is an Einstein at maths.
	In the book, he talks about his ups and downs at school.
	If John wants to succeed in corporate life, he has to know the rules of the game.
	The critique of Plato’s Republic was written from a contemporary point of view.
	The characters in Shakespeare’s Twelfth Night live in a world that has been turned upside-down.
*	The characters in Shakespeare’s Twelfth Night lives in a world that has been turned upside-down.
	Students studying English read Conrad’s Heart of Darkness while at university.
*	Students studying English reads Conrad’s Heart of Darkness while at university.
	You is the only person that I can rely on.
*	You are the only person that I can rely on.
	He is the only person that I can rely on.
*	He are the only person that I can rely on.
	The boy swims.
*	The boys swim.
	King prawns cooked in chili salt and pepper was very much better, a simple dish succulently executed.
	Four pounds was quite a bit of money in 1950 and it was not easy to come by.
	Five pounds is a lot of money.
*	Five pounds are a lot of money.
	Two drops deodorize anything in your house.
*	Two drops deodorizes anything in your house.
	Fifteen dollars in a week is much.
*	Fifteen dollars in a week are not much.
	Fifteen years represents a long period of his life.
*	Fifteen years represent a long period of his life.
	Two miles is as far as they can walk.
*	Two miles are as far as they can walk.
	This Government have been more transparent in the way they have dealt with public finances than any previous government.
	This Government has been more transparent in the way they have dealt with public finances than any previous government.
	In preparation for the return fixture this team have trained more efficiently than they had in recent months.
	In preparation for the return fixture this team has trained more efficiently than they had in recent months.
	She doesn’t believe much of that story.
	We listened to as little of his speech as possible.
	How much of the fresco did the flood damage?
	I read some of the book.
*	She doesn’t believe much story.
*	We listened to as little speech as possible.
*	How much fresco did the flood damage?
*	I read some book.
	One of the people was dying of thirst.
	Many of the people were dying of thirst.
*	One people was dying of thirst.
	Many people were dying of thirst.
	Each of the suggestions is acceptable.
	Neither of the cars has air conditioning.
	None of these men wants to be president.
	Most of the fruit is rotten.
	Most of the children are here.
	Some of the soup needs more salt.
	Some of the diners need menus.
	All of the land belongs to the government.
	All of these cars belong to me.
*	Neither of students failed.
*	I drank some of water.
	John is in the room.
	I am fond of him.
	Most of John’s boat has been repainted.
	Some of the record contains evidence of wrongdoing.
	Much of that theory is unfounded.
*	Each of John’s boat has been repainted.
*	Many of the record contained evidence of wrongdoing.
*	One of the story has appeared in your newspaper.
	He is alive.
	He is afraid of foxes.
	It is a wooden desk.
	It is a golden hair.
	It is the main street.
*	It is an alive fish.
*	They are afraid people.
*	This objection is main.
*	This fact is key.
	The boy in the doorway waved to his father.
	The man eager to start the meeting is John’s sister.
	The man holding the bottle disappeared.
	The papers removed from the safe have not been found.
	The money that you gave me disappeared last night.
*	John in the doorway waved to his father.
*	He in the doorway waved to his father.
	and index values of the subject and the main verb.
	Neither of these men is worthy to lead Italy.
	None of his customary excuses suffices Edgar now.
	One of the problems was the robins.
	All of the plant virus web sites have been conveniently collected in one central location.
	Some of the water from melted snow also goes into the ground for plants.
	Most of the milk your baby ingests during breastfeeding is produced during nursing.
	All special rights of voting in the election were abolished.
	One of major factors affecting the value of diamonds was their weight.
	Each of these stones has to be cut and polished.
	Most of her free time was spent attending concerts and plays or visiting museums and art galleries.
	The committee was unanimous in their decision.
*	The committee were unanimous in their decision.
	The committee have all now resigned.
*	The committee has all now resigned.
	The crew have both agreed to change sponsor.
*	The crew has both agreed to change sponsor.
	Her family is all avid skiers.
*	Her family are all avid skiers.
	A variety of styles has been in vogue for the last year.
*	A variety of styles have been in vogue for the last year.
	Both of the workers will wear carnations.
	Both the workers will wear carnations.
	Both workers will wear carnations.
	Both will wear carnations.
	Few of the doctors approve of our remedy.
	Few doctors approve of our remedy.
	Few approve of our remedy.
	An example of these substances be tobacco.
	The effectiveness of teaching and learning depend on several factors.
	One of the most serious problems that some students have be lack of motivation.
	Ten years be a long time to spend in prison.
	Everyone of us be given a prize.
	Some of the fruit be going bad.
	All of his wealth come from real estate investments.
	Do some of your relatives live nearby?
	Fifty pounds seem like a lot of weight to lose in one year.
	News of Persephone and Demeter reach the great gods and goddesses of Olympus.
	Half of the year be dark and wintry.
	Some of the promoters of ostrich meat compare its taste to beef tenderloin.
	The committee hasn’t yet made up its mind.
*	The committee hasn’t yet made up their mind.
	The committee haven’t yet made up their mind.
*	The committee haven’t yet made up its mind.
	That dog is so ferocious, it even tried to bite itself.
*	That dog is so ferocious, it even tried to bite himself.
*	I washed me.
	You washed me.
	He washed me.
	I washed myself.
*	You washed myself.
*	He washed myself.
	I washed you.
	He kicked you.
*	I washed yourself.
	You washed yourself.
*	He washed yourself.
	Harry says that Sally dislikes him.
*	Harry says that Sally dislikes himself.
	Sally wishes that everyone would praise her.
*	Sally wishes that everyone would praise herself.
	Sally believes that she is brilliant.
*	Sally believes that herself is brilliant.
	The power of your mind and the power of your body have a tight connection.
	John tries to fix the computer.
	John seems to fix the computer.
	Mary persuaded John to fix the computer.
	Mary expected John to fix the computer.
*	John to fix the computer.
*	Seems John to fix the computer.
	John tries to be honest.
	John seems to be honest.
	John makes efforts for himself to be honest.
	It seems that John is honest.
	It tends to be warm in September.
	It seems to bother Kim that they resigned.
*	It tries to be warm in September.
*	It hopes to bother Kim that they resigned.
	It is easy to please Kim.
	John is eager to please Kim.
*	There tries to be warm in September.
*	There hopes to bother Kim that they resigned.
*	John is easy to please Kim.
*	It is eager to please Kim.
	Stephen seemed to be intelligent.
	It seems to be easy to fool Ben.
	There is likely to be a letter in the mailbox.
	Tabs are likely to be kept on participants.
*	There seemed to be intelligent.
*	John seems to be easy to fool Ben.
*	John is likely to be a letter in the mailbox.
*	John is likely to be kept on participants.
	Sandy tried to eat oysters.
*	There tried to be riots in Seoul.
*	It tried to bother me that Chris lied.
*	Tabs try to be kept on Bob by the FBI.
*	That he is clever is eager to be obvious.
	The king thanked the man.
#	The king thanked the throne.
#	The castle thanked the deer.
	The color red is his favorite color.
#	The color red understands the important issues of the day.
	The color red seems to be his favorite color.
#	The color red tried to be his favorite color.
	The cat seems to be out of the bag.
#	The cat tries to be out of the bag.
	The dentist is likely to examine Pat.
	Pat is likely to be examined by the dentist.
	The dentist is eager to examine Pat.
	Pat is eager to be examined by the dentist.
	Stephen believed Ben to be careful.
	Stephen persuaded Ben to be careful.
	Stephen believed it to be easy to please Kim.
*	Stephen persuaded it to be easy to please Kim.
	Stephen believed there to be a fountain in the park.
*	Stephen persuaded there to be a fountain in the park.
	Stephen believed the cat to be out of the bag.
*	Stephen persuaded the cat to be out of the bag.
	The dentist was believed to have examined Pat.
	Pat was believed to have been examined by the dentist.
	The dentist was persuaded to examine Pat.
	Pat was persuaded to be examined by the dentist.
	Stephen seems to be irritating.
	Tom believes Stephen to be irritating.
	John tried to please Stephen.
	John persuaded Stephen to be more careful.
	John tried to please Stephen.
	John persuaded Stephen to be more careful.
	Stephen seemed to be intelligent.
*	There seemed to be intelligent.
*	It seemed to be intelligent.
	It seemed to rain.
	There seemed to be a fountain in the park.
	Stephen tried to be intelligent.
*	It tried to be intelligent.
*	There tried to be intelligent.
*	It tried to rain.
*	There tried to be a fountain in the park.
	Someone tried to leave the town.
	There seems to be a fountain in the park.
*	It seems to be a fountain in the park.
*	John seems to be a fountain in the park.
	We believed there to be a fountain in the park.
*	We believed it to be a fountain in the park.
*	We believed John to be a fountain in the park.
*	There tries to leave the country.
*	It tries to leave the country.
	John tries to leave the country.
*	We believed it to try to leave the country.
*	We believed there to try to leave the country.
	We believed John to try to leave the country.
	The cat seems to be out of the bag.
	The cat tries to be out of the bag.
	The dentist is likely to examine Pat.
	Pat is likely to be examined by the dentist.
	The dentist is eager to examine Pat.
	Pat is eager to be examined by the dentist.
	They persuaded me to leave.
	They promised me to leave.
*	They persuaded it to rain.
*	They promised it to rain.
	Under the bed is a fun place to hide.
	Under the bed seems to be a fun place to hide.
*	Under the bed wants to be a fun place to hide.
	Kim may have admitted to let Mary mow the lawn.
	Gregory appears to have wanted to be loyal to the company.
	Jones would prefer for it to be clear to Barry that the city plans to sue him.
	John continues to avoid the conflict.
	The captain ordered the troops to proceed.
	He coaxed his brother to give him the candy.
	Frank hopes to persuade Harry to make the cook wash the dishes.
	John wants it to be clear to Ben that the city plans to honor him.
*	John seems to rain.
*	John is likely to appear that he will win the game.
*	Beth tried for Bill to ask a question.
*	He believed there to be likely that he won the game.
*	It is likely to seem to be arrogant.
*	Sandy appears that Kim is happy.
*	Dana would be unlikely for Pat to be called upon.
*	Robin is nothing in the box.
*	It said that Kim was happy.
*	There preferred for Sandy to get the job.
	There is only one chemical substance involved in nerve transmission.
*	There are only one chemical substance involved in nerve transmission.
*	There is more chemical substances involved in nerve transmission.
	There are more chemical substances involved in nerve transmission.
	There is believed to be a sheep in the park.
*	There is believed to be a sheep in the park.
	There are believed to be sheep in the park.
*	There is believed to be sheep in the park.
	There seems to be no student absent.
*	There seem to be no student absent.
*	There are likely to be no student absent.
	There is likely to be no student absent.
	Pat expected Leslie to be aggressive.
	Pat persuaded Leslie to be aggressive.
	Pat promised Leslie to be aggressive.
	Kevin urged Anne to be loyal to her.
	Kevin urged Anne to be loyal to herself.
	We expect the dentist to examine us.
*	We expect the dentist to examine ourselves.
	We expect them to examine themselves.
	We persuaded the dentist to examine us.
*	We persuaded the dentist to examine ourselves.
	We persuaded them to examine themselves.
*	We persuaded them to examine them.
	John drank water and Bill wine.
	John may drink water, and Bill drink beer.
	Tom will not leave.
*	Tom kicked not a ball.
	Will Tom leave the party now?
*	Left Tom the party already?
	John couldn’t leave the party.
*	John leftn’t the party early.
	If anybody is spoiling the children, John is.
*	If anybody keeps spoiling the children, John keeps.
	You should leave, shouldn’t you?
*	You didn’t leave, left you?
	She would never believe that story.
*	She believed never his story.
	The boys will all be there.
*	Our team played all well.
	The children will have been being entertained.
	He must have been being interrogated by the police at that very moment.
*	The house is been remodelling.
*	Margaret has had already left.
*	He has will seeing his children.
*	He has been must being interrogated by the police at that very moment.
	Mary solved the problem.
	Mary would solve the problem.
	Mary was solving the problem.
	Mary would easily solve the problem.
*	Mary not avoided Bill.
	Mary did not avoid Bill.
	Fred must have been singing songs and probably was drinking beer.
	Fred must both have been singing songs and have been drinking beer.
	Fred must have both been singing songs and been drinking beer.
	Fred must have been both singing songs and drinking beer.
	There might be a unicorn in the garden.
	It will rain tomorrow.
	John will leave the party earlier.
*	There hopes to finish the project.
*	The bus hopes to be here at five.
*	I hope to would study in France.
*	I hope to can study in France.
	I hope to study in France.
*	John stopped can to sign in tune.
*	John stopped canning to sign in tune.
*	John musts leave the party early.
*	John musted leave the party early.
*	John wills leave the party early.
	John can kick the ball.
*	John can kicked the ball.
*	John can kicking the ball.
*	John can to kick the ball.
	John will kick the ball.
*	John will kicked the ball.
*	John will kicking the ball.
*	John will to kick the ball.
*	Kim must bakes a cake.
*	Kim must baked a cake.
*	Kim must will bake a cake.
	It will rain tomorrow.
*   John will rain tomorrow.
	There may exist a man in the park.
*	It may exist a man in the park.
*	We expect there to will rain.
*	It is vital that we will study everyday.
	He is a fool.
	He has a car.
	John is in the school.
	John is running to the car.
	John was found in the office.
	Was the child in the school?
*	Did the child be in the school?
	Was the child running to the car?
	Was the child found?
?	The child never was crazy.
	The child never became crazy.
	The child was never crazy.
*	The child became never crazy.
?	The child was never running to the car.
	The child was never running to the car.
?	The child never was deceived.
	The child was never deceived.
	John is happy about the outcome.
	John was seeing his children.
	The children are seen in the yard.
	John has not sung a song.
	Has John sung a song?
	John hasn’t been singing a song.
	John has sung a song and Mary has too.
	John can have danced.
	John can be dancing.
	He has seen his children.
	He will have been seeing his children.
	He must have been being interrogated by the police at that very moment.
*	Americans have paying income tax ever since 1913.
*	George has went to America.
	is out since the following is finite.
	You are a student.
	You have not enough money.
	Are you a student?
	Have you enough money?
	John does not like this town.
	In no other circumstances does that distinction matter.
	They didn’t leave any food.
	Jane likes these apples even more than Mary does.
*	They expected us to do leave him.
*	They expected us to should leave him.
	I found myself needing sleep.
*	I found myself doing need sleep.
*	I found myself should needing sleep.
*	He does be leaving.
*	He does have been eating.
*	They will do come.
*	John does leave.
	John did leave.
	John did not come.
	Did John find the solution?
	How long did it last?
	John may leave.
	It may rain.
*	John may rain.
	John did not leave.
	It did not rain.
*	John did not rain.
	He might have left.
*	He might do leave.
*	He does can leave here.
*	He does may leave here.
*	Jim does have supported the theory.
*	The proposal did be endorsed by Clinton.
*	I do not have sung.
*	I do not be happy.
	Do be honest!
	Don’t be silly!
*	John believed Kim to do not leave here.
	John believes Kim not to leave here.
*	John believed Kim to leaving here.
*	John did not leaving here.
*	John expect to must leave.
*	John did not may leave.
	Tom wanted to go home, but Peter didn’t want to.
	Lee voted for Bill because his father told him to.
	Kim regrets not having seen the movie.
	Kim regrets never having seen the movie.
	We asked him not to try to call us again.
	We asked him never to try to call us again.
	Duty made them not miss the weekly meetings.
	Duty made them never miss the weekly meetings.
	Not speaking English is a disadvantage.
*	Speaking not English is a disadvantage.
*	Lee likes not Kim.
	Lee is believed not to like Kim.
	Lee is believed to not like Kim.
*	Lee is believed to like not Kim.
	The president could not approve the bill.
	It would be possible for the president not to approve the bill.
	It would not be possible for the president to approve the bill.
	Lee never left.
*	Lee not left.
	Lee will never leave.
	Lee will not leave.
	John could not leave the town.
	John wants not to leave the town.
*	John not left the town.
*	John not could leave the town.
	Mary sang a song, but Lee never did.
*	Mary sang a song, but Lee did never.
	Mary sang a song, but Lee did not.
	The president could not approve the bill, couldn’t he?
*	The president could not approve the bill, could he?
	Are you studying English syntax?
	What are you studying nowadays?
	I shall go downtown.
	Shall I go downtown?
	May she live forever!
	Was I that stupid?
	Don’t you even touch that!
	Had they been here now, we wouldn’t have this problem.
	You better not drink.
	You can do it, but you better not.
*	Better you not drink.
	They’ll be leaving.
	They’d leave soon.
	They wouldn’t leave soon.
	They shouldn’t leave soon.
	They can do it, can’t they?
	They can’t do it, can they?
*	They can’t do it, can’t they?
*	They can’t do it, can he?
	Kim can dance, and Sandy can, too.
	Kim has danced, and Sandy has, too.
	Kim was dancing, and Sandy was, too.
*	Kim considered joining the navy, but I never considered.
*	Kim got arrested by the CIA, and Sandy got, also.
*	Kim wanted to go and Sandy wanted, too.
	Kim is happy and Sandy is too.
	When Kim was in China, I was too.
	Have you anything to share with the group?
	Have you brought anything to share with the group?
	Sandy must have been, too.
	Sandy must have, too.
	Sandy must, too.
	Tom wanted to go home, but Peter didn’t want to.
	Lee voted for Bill because his father told him to.
	Because John persuaded Sally to, he didn’t have to talk to the reporters.
	Mary likes to tour art galleries, but Bill hates to.
*	Mary sang a song, but Lee could never.
	Mary sang a song, but Lee could not.
	John got sent to prison.
	He ought to leave his luggage here.
	They needn’t take this exam.
	You better not leave it here.
	He dared not argue against his parents.
	He used to go there very often.
	The gardener must trim the rose bushes today.
	This should be the beginning of a beautiful friendship.
	I am removing the shovel from the shed.
	The travelers have returned from their vacation.
	Springfield would have built a police station with the federal grant.
	Stringrays could have been cruising near the beach.
	She seem to have given financial assistance to an important French art dealer.
	Ann may spend her vacation in Italy.
*	Ann may spending her vacation in Italy.
*	Ann may spends her vacation in Italy.
*	Ann may spent her vacation in Italy.
	It has rained every day for the last week.
*	It has raining every day for the last week.
*	It has rains every day for the last week.
*	It has rain every day for the last week.
	Tagalog is spoken in the Philippines.
*	Tagalog is speak in the Philippines.
*	Tagalog is speaks in the Philippines.
*	Tagalog is spoke in the Philippines.
	The roof is leaking.
*	The roof is leaked.
*	The roof is leaks.
*	The roof is leak.
*	Americans have musted pay income tax ever since 1913.
*	George is having lived in Toledo for thirty years.
*	The house is been remodeling.
*	Margaret has had already left.
*	A medal was been given to the mayor by the sewer commissioner.
*	Does John have gone to the library?
*	John seems fond of ice cream, and Bill seems, too.
	Sam may have been being interrogated by the FBI.
*	Sam may have been being interrogating by the FBI.
*	Sam may be had been interrogating by the FBI.
	Have social problems made police work difficult?
	The senator should not have forgotten the concerns of her constituents.
	Tokyo has not loosened trade restrictions.
	They love to play golf, but I do not.
	Did the doctor prescribe aspirin?
	George has spent a lot of money, hasn’t he?
	Sandy will read your reports, but Harold will not.
	He can hardly believe that it’s already over.
	I could have little known that more trouble was just around the corner.
	I have never been spoken to so rudely!
	Hardly was there any rain falling.
	Little did I know that more trouble was just around the corner.
	Never have I been spoken to so rudely!
	He had hardly collected the papers on his desk, had he?
*	He had hardly collected the papers on his desk, *hadn’t he?
	He never achieved anything, did he?
*	He never achieved anything, didn't he?
	As a statesman, he scarcely could do anything worth mentioning.
	As a statesman, scarcely could he do anything worth mentioning.
*	As a statesman, scarcely he could do anything worth mentioning.
*	Anyone isn’t sleeping in my bed.
*	Any zebras can’t fly.
*	Anything hasn’t happened to his optimism.
*	Any of the citizens hardly ever say anything.
	I didn’t find any bugs in my bed.
	Nobody told them anything.
	We never found any of the unicorns.
	Never have I stolen from any members of your family.
	Why haven’t any books been returned?
	Hardly any of the citizens ever say anything.
	One of Korea’s most famous poets wrote these lines.
	These lines were written by one of Korea’s most famous poets.
	Somebody apparently struck the unidentified victim during the early morning hours.
	The unidentified victim was apparently struck during the early morning hours.
	Targets can be observed at any angle.
	During the early evening, Saturn can be found in the north, while Jupiter rises in the east.
	I poured 20cc of acid into the beaker.
	About 20cc of acid was poured into the beaker.
	The executive committee approved the new policy.
	The new policy was approved by the executive committee.
	John has taken Bill to the library.
	John has chosen Bill for the position.
*	John has taken to the library.
*	John has chosen for the position.
*	The guide has been taken John to the library.
*	The department has been chosen John for the position.
	John has been taken to the library.
	John has been chosen for the position.
	Pat handed a book to Chris.
*	Pat handed to Chris.
*	Pat handed a book.
	A book was handed to Chris by Pat.
*	A book was handed by Pat.
	A book was handed to Chris.
*	A book was handed.
	They believe it to be easy to annoy Ben.
*	They believe Stephen to be easy to annoy Ben.
	They believe there to be a dragon in the wood.
	It is believed to be easy to annoy Ben.
*	Stephen is believed to be easy to annoy Ben.
	There is believed to be a dragon in the wood.
	No one believes that he is a fool.
	No one suspects that he is a fool.
	That he is a fool is believed by no one.
	That he is a fool is suspected by no one.
	They believe the cat to be out of the bag.
	The cat is believed to be out of the bag.
	John drove the car.
	The car was driven.
	John was driving the car.
	The car was being driven.
	John will drive the car.
	The car will be driven.
	John has driven the car.
	The car has been driven.
	John has been driving the car.
	The car has been being driven.
	John will have been driving the car.
	The car will have been being driven.
	Pat handed Chris a note.
	Chris was handed a note.
	Chris was handed a note by Pat.
	TV puts ideas into children’s heads.
	Ideas are put into children’s heads by TV.
	Ideas are put into children’s heads.
	Yesterday, the child really kicked a monkey in the street.
	The model resembles Kim in nearly every detail.
*	Kim is resembled by the model in nearly every detail.
	The coat does not fit you.
*	You are not fitted by the coat.
	I was born in 1970.
	It is rumored that he is on his way out.
	John is said to be rich.
	He is reputed to be a good scholar.
*	My mother bore me in 1970.
*	Everyone rumored that he was on his way out.
*	They said him to be rich.
*	They reputed him to be a good scholar.
	He kicked the ball.
	The ball was kicked by him.
	John kicked him.
	He was kicked by John.
	John sent her to Seoul.
	She was sent to Seoul.
	They widely believed that John was ill.
	That John was ill was widely believed.
	They haven’t decided which attorney will give the closing argument.
	Which attorney will give the closing argument hasn’t been decided.
	Which attorney will give the closing argument hasn’t been decided by them.
	You can rely on Ben.
	Ben can be relied on.
	They talked about the scandal for days.
	The scandal was talked about for days.
	The plan was approved of by my mother.
	The issue was dealt with promptly.
	That’s not what’s asked for.
	This should be attended to immediately.
*	Boston was flown to.
*	The capital was gathered near by a crowd of people.
*	The hot sun was played under by the children.
	That’s something I would have paid twice for.
	These are the books that we have gone most thoroughly over.
	They look generally on John as selfish.
*	Everything was paid twice for.
*	Your books were gone most thoroughly over.
*	He is looked generally on as selfish.
	Pavarotti relied on Loren and Bond on Hepburn.
*	Pavarotti relied on Loren and Bond Hepburn.
	Loren was relied on by Pavarotti and Hepburn by Bond.
*	Loren was relied on by Pavarotti and Hepburn on by Bond.
	The lawyer looked into the document.
	The document was looked into by the lawyer.
	Peter has been asked to resign.
	I assume the matter to have been filed in the appropriate records.
	Smith wants the picture to be removed from the office.
	The events have been described well.
	Over 120 different contaminants have been dumped into the river.
	Heart disease is considered the leading cause of death in the United States.
	The balloon is positioned in an area of blockage and is inflated.
	There was believed to have been a riot in the kitchen.
	Cancer is now thought to be unlikely to be caused by hot dogs.
	That we should call the police was suggested by her son.
	Whether this is feasible hasn’t yet been determined.
	Paying taxes can’t be avoided.
	It was suggested by her son that we should call the police.
	It hasn’t yet been determined whether this is feasible.
	Frances has had the drapes cleaned.
	Shirley seems to have Fred promoted.
	Nina got Bill elected to the committee.
	We got our car radio stolen twice on holiday.
	Frances has had her clean the drapes.
	Nina got them to elect Bill.
	Ricky can be relied on.
	The news was dealt with carefully.
	The plaza was come into by many people.
	The tree was looked after by Kim.
	We cannot put up with the noise anymore.
	He will keep up with their expectations.
	This noise cannot be put up with.
	Their expectations will be kept up with.
	They paid a lot of attention to the matter.
	The son took care of his parents.
	The matter was paid a lot of attention to.
	A lot of attention was paid to the matter.
*	New York was slept in.
	The bed was slept in.
*	The lake was camped beside by my sister.
	The lake is not to be camped beside by anybody.
*	Six inches were grown by the boy.
*	A pound was weighed by the book.
*	A mile to work was run by him.
	The beans were grown by the gardener.
	The plums were weighed by the greengrocer.
*	San Francisco has been lived in by my brother.
	The house has been lived in by several famous personages.
*	Seoul was slept in by the businessman last night.
	This bed was surely slept in by a huge guy last night.
	Rosie got struck by lightning.
	I got phoned by a woman friend.
	He got hit in the face with the tip of a surfboard.
	John’s bike got fixed or got stolen.
*	The king got feared by everyone.
*	The lesson got read by a choirboy.
*	The letter got written by a poet.
*	Tom got understood to have asked for a refund.
*	Mary got heard to insult her parents.
	John is clever.
	Is John clever?
	Who is clever?
	How clever you are!
	Be very clever.
	I ask you if this is what you want.
	Would you mind taking out the garbage?
	Can the child read the book?
	What can the child read?
	Who called the police?
	Which version did they recommend?
	With what did the baby eat the food?
	How did he eat the food?
	Which man did you talk to?
	To which man did you talk?
	How ill has Hobbs been?
	How frequently did Hobbs see Rhodes?
*	Which man did you talk?
*	To which man did you talk to?
	Who do you think Tom saw?
	Who do you think Mary said Tom saw?
	Who do you think Hobbs imagined Mary said Tom saw?
	Who did Kim work for and Sandy rely on?
*	Who did Kim work for and Sandy rely?
*	Who did Kim work for and Sandy rely on Mary?
	are collapsed into one and become who. We cannot simply move
	You can rely on Edward’s help.
	Edward’s help, you can rely on.
	We talked about the fact that he was sick for days.
	The fact that he was sick for days, we talked about.
*	You can rely on that he will help you.
	That he will help you, you can rely on.
*	We talked about that he was sick for days.
	That he was sick, we talked about for days.
*	This theory captures that arrows don’t stop in midair.
	That arrows don’t stop in midair is captured by this theory.
*	Who did you see and a picture of?
*	Who did you compare and?
	These qualities recommended him to Oliver.
	The UN recommended an enlarged peacekeeping force.
	This is the book which the teacher recommended.
	Who will they recommend?
	John put the books in a box.
	Which books did John put in the box?
	Where did John put the books?
	In which box did John put the book?
	How happy has John been?
	Who did Kim work for and Sandy rely on?
*	Who did Kim work for and Sandy rely on Mary?
*	You can rely on that he will help you.
	That he will help you, you can rely on.
	Who put the book in the box?
	Who DID put the book in the box?
	Who can put the book in the box?
	Who put the book in the box?
	Who can put the book in the box?
	Who do you think visited Seoul last year?
	That’s the UN delegate that the government thinks visits Seoul last year.
	Who do you believe that Sara invited?
	Who do you believe invited Sara?
*	Who do you believe that invited Sara?
*	Who do you think that would be nominated for the position?
	This is the kind of person who I doubt that under normal circumstances would have anything to do with such a scheme.
	John asks whose book his son likes.
	John has forgotten which player his son shouted at.
	He told me how many employees Karen introduced to the visitors.
	he had been reading the article.
*	Tom denied which book he had been reading.
	he had spent five thousand dollars.
*	Tom claimed how much money she had spent.
*	John inquired that he should read it.
*	Peter will decide that we should review the book.
	John inquired which book he should read.
	Peter will decide which book we should review.
	John told us that we should review the book.
	John told us which book we should review.
	In which box did he put the book?
	Which book by his father did he read?
	John asks in which box he put the book.
	John asks which book by his father he read.
	Kim has wondered in which room Gary stayed.
	Lee asked me how fond of chocolates the monkeys are.
*	Kim has wondered that Gary stayed in the room.
*	Kim asked me that the monkeys are very fond of chocolates.
	John knows whose book Mary bought and Tom borrowed from her.
*	John knows whose book Mary bought and Tom talked.
	I don’t know whether I should agree.
	I don’t know if I should agree.
	She gets upset if I exclude her from anything.
	She gets upset whether I exclude her from anything.
	I wonder whether you’d be kind enough to give us information.
	I wonder if you’d be kind enough to give us information.
	I am not certain about when he will come.
	I am not certain about whether he will go or not.
*	I am not certain about if he will come.
*	I am not certain about if he will go or not.
	I don’t know where to go.
	I don’t know what to do.
	I don’t know how to do it.
	I don’t know whether to agree with him or not.
*	I don’t know if to agree with him.
*	I don’t know that to agree with him or not.
	Fred knows which politician to support.
	Karen asked where to put the chairs.
	The student protected him.
	Who protected him?
	To protect him is not an easy task.
*	Fred knows which politician for Karen to vote for.
*	Fred knows which politician for her to vote for.
*	Karen asked where for Jerry to put the chairs.
*	Karen asked where for him to put the chairs.
	How carefully have you considered your future career?
	When can we register for graduation?
	Where do we go to register for graduation?
	Why have you borrowed my pencil?
*	Fed knows which politician her to vote for.
*	Karen asked where him to vote for.
	When did he say that he was fired?
	Where did he tell you that he met Mary?
	How did you guess that he fixed the computer?
	Why do you wonder whether she will invite me?
	How often did he ask when she will meet at the party?
	What causes students to select particular majors?
	Who will John ask for information about summer courses?
	Which textbook did the teacher use in the class last summer?
	Whose car is blocking the entrance to the store?
	When can we register for graduation?
	Why do you think he left?
	Where do we go to register for graduation?
	Who do you guess will be here?
	Who do you think borrowed my book?
	Which city does Fred think that you believe that John lives in?
	I wonder on which shelf John will put the book?
	What proof that he has implicated have you found?
	Joseph has forgotten how many matches he has won.
	Fred will warn Martha that she should claim that her brother is patriotic.
	That Bill tried to discover which drawer Alice put the money in made us realize that we should have left him in Seoul.
	Jasper wonders which book he should attempt to persuade his students to buy.
	The committee knows whose efforts to achieve peace the world should honor.
*	I wonder if on which shelve John will put the book.
*	Which house does your friend live?
*	I wonder what city that Romans destroyed.
*	John was wondering to whom he was referring to.
*	Who do you think that has given the tickets to Bill?
*	What city will Fred say that Mary thinks that John lives?
*	On whom does Dana believe Chris knows Sandy trusts?
*	The politician denied how the opponent was poisoned.
*	Fred knows which book for the children to read during the summer vacation.
	This needs mending.
*	This needs mending the shoe.
*	He mended.
	He mended the shoe.
	This needs investigating.
*	This needs investigating the problem.
*	They investigated.
	They investigated the problem.
	Within grammar lies the power of expression. Understand grammar, and you
	The video which you recommended was really terrific.
	The video which I thought you recommended was really terrific.
	The video which I thought John told us you recommended was really terrific.
	the student who won the prize left.
	the student who everyone likes left.
	the baker from whom I bought these bagels left.
	the person whom John gave the book to left.
	the day when I met her was sunny.
	I found the place where we can relax
	The president who Fred voted for has resigned.
	The president that Fred voted for dislikes his opponents.
	The president Fred voted for has resigned.
	has no relative pronoun at all.
	He is the kind of person with whom to consult.
	These are the things for which to be thankful.
	We will invite volunteers on whom to work.
	This is the student pictures of whom appeared in the newspaper.
*	Pictures of whom appeared in the newspaper?
	the people happy with the proposal left.
	the person standing on my foot is heavy.
*	the paper to finish by tomorrow is too long.
*	the person stand on my foot is heavy.
*	the person stood on my foot is heavy.
*	The student met the senator John met Bill.
*	The student met the senator that John met Bill.
*	The student met the senator for John to meet Bill.
	Jack is the person whom Jenny fell in love with.
	Jack is the person with whom Jenny fell in love.
*	Jack is the person whom Jenny fell in love.
*	Jack is the person with whom Jenny fell in love with.
	I met the critic whose remarks I wanted to object to.
	This is the friend for whose mother Kim gave a party.
	The teacher set us a problem the answer to which we can find in the textbook.
	We called the senators who met Fred.
	The kid picked up the apple that fell down on the ground.
*	The student met John came.
*	The problem intrigued us bothered me.
	He made a statement which everyone thought was really interesting and important.
	They all agreed to include those matters which everyone believed had been excluded from the Treaty.
	CMary knows that John was elected.
	That John was elected surprised Frank.
	Mary told Bill that John was elected.
	This is the book that we had read.
	The president abandoned the people that voted for him.
	It is an argument that people think will never end in Egypt.
*	Every essay she’s written and which I’ve read is on that pile.
*	Every essay she’s written and that I’ve read is on that pile.
	Every essay which she’s written and that I’ve read is on that pile.
	Every essay that she’s written and which I’ve read is on that pile.
	the student whose turn it was left.
*	the student that’s turn it was left.
	the pencil with which he is writing broke.
*	the pencil with that he is writing broke
	a pencil with which to write broke.
*	a pencil with that to write broke.
*	The people in who we placed our trust left.
*	The person with who we were talking left.
	The company in which they have invested left.
	The people in whose house we stayed left.
	The person with whom he felt most comfortable left.
	He bought a bench on which to sit.
	He bought a refrigerator in which to put the beer.
	There is a bench for you to sit on.
	There is a bench to sit on.
	Karen asked where to put the chairs.
*	Karen asked where for Washington to put the chairs.
	the person I met b. the box we put the books in
	He made a statement everyone thought was interesting and important.
	They all agreed to include those matters everyone believed had been excluded from the Treaty.
	I just know that the Big 12 South teams everyone knew would win actually won the game.
	The person who John asked for help thinks he is foolish.
	Mary, who John asked for help, thinks he is foolish.
	John has two sisters, who became lawyers.
	I met the man who grows peaches.
	I met the lady from France who grows peaches.
*	I met John who grows peaches.
*	I met her who grows peaches.
	In the classroom, the teacher praised John, whom I also respect.
	Reagan, whom the Republicans nominated in 1980, lived most of his life in California.
	Every student who attended the party had a good time.
*	Every student, who attended the party, had a good time.
	No student who scored 80 or more in the exam was ever failed.
*	No student, who scored 80 or more in the exam, was ever failed.
	The contestant who won the first prize, who is the judge’s brother-in-law, sang dreadfully.
*	The contestant, who is the judge’s brother-in-law, who won the first prize sang dreadfully.
	He who laughs last laughs best.
	He who is without sin among you, let him cast the first stone.
	Who did he believe that he would one day meet?
	Which celebrity did he mention that he had run into?
*	Who did he believe the claim that he had never met?
*	Which celebrity did he mention the fact that he had run into?
	The knife which he threw into the sea had a gold handle.
	The knife that he threw into the sea had a gold handle.
	The knife, which he threw into the sea had a gold handle.
??	The knife, that he threw into the sea had a gold handle.
	Bill cooked supper and washed the dishes.
*	What did Bill cook and wash the dishes?
*	What did Bill cook supper and wash?
	He refuted the proof that you cannot square it.
*	What did he refute the proof that you cannot square?
	They met someone who knows the professor.
*	Which professor did they meet someone who knows?
	That he has met the professor is extremely unlikely.
*	Who is that he has met extremely unlikely?
	She bought John’s book.
*	Whose did she buy book?
	Which topic did you choose without getting his approval?
*	Which topic did you get bored because Mary talked about?
	Did John wonder who would win the game?
*	What did John wonder who would win?
	What did he get the impression that the problem really was?
	This is the paper that we really need to find the linguist who understands
*	Which rebel leader did you hear Cheney’s rumor that the CIA assassinated?
?	Which rebel leader did you hear a rumor that the CIA assassinated?
	Which rebel leader did you hear rumors that the CIA assassinated?
	Students enter high-level educational institutions might face many problems relating to study habits.
	A fellow student saw this felt sorry for Miss Kim and offered her his own book.
	Experts all agree that dreams cause great anxiety and stress are called nightmares.
	The victims of the earthquake their property was destroyed in the disaster were given temporary housing by the government.
	This is the book which I need to read.
	This is the very book that we need to talk about.
	The person whom they intended to speak with agreed to reimburse us.
	The motor that Martha thinks that Joe replaced costs thirty dollars.
	The official to whom Smith loaned the money has been indicted.
	The man on whose lap the puppet is sitting is ventriloquist.
	The teacher set us a problem the answer to which we can find in the textbook.
	We just finished the final exam the result of which we can find out next week.
*	What did Herb start to play only after he drank?
*	Who did Herb believe the claim that cheated?
*	What did Herb like fruit punch and?
*	What was that the Vikings ate a real surprise to you?
*	What did you meet someone who understands?
	The fact that scientists have now established all the genes in the human body is still not widely known.
	The fact that the scientists used the latest technology to verify was reported at the recent conference.
	They ignored the suggestion that Lee made.
	They ignored the suggestion that Lee lied.
	They denied the claim that we had advanced by ourselves.
	They denied the claim that they should report only to us.
	The hotel where Gloria stays is being remodelled.
	The day when Jim got fired was a sad day for everyone.
	That is the reason why he resigned.
	John is tough to persuade.
	It bothers me that John snores.
	John made it clear that he would finish it on time.
	It is John that I met last night in the park.
	I wonder whom Sandy loves.
	This is the politician on whom Sandy relies.
	He is hard to love.
	To please John is easy.
	It is easy to please John.
	John is easy to please.
*	To please John is eager.
*	It is eager to please John.
	John is eager to please.
	To please John is tough.
	It is tough to please John.
	John is tough to please.
*	To please John is ready.
*	It is ready to please John.
	John is ready to please.
	Kim is easy to please.
	Kim is eager to please.
*	Kim is easy to please Tom.
	Kim is eager to please Tom.
	This doll is hard to see.
	The child is impossible to teach.
	The problem is easy to solve.
*	This doll is hard to see it.
*	The child is impossible to teach him.
*	The problem is easy to solve the question.
	John is eager to examine the patient.
	John is eager to find a new home.
*	John is eager to examine.
*	John is eager to find.
	It is easy to please John.
	John is easy to please.
	Hei is easy to please i.
	This theorem will take only five minutes to prove.
	This theorem will take only five minutes to establish that he proved in 1930.
	This scratch will cost Kim $500 to fix.
	This $500 bribe will cost the government $500,000 to prove that Senator Jones accepted.
*	Kim is eager to recommend.
	Who is Kim eager to recommend?
	This sonata is easy to play on this piano.
	Which piano is this sonata easy to play on?
	That dogs bark annoys people.
	It annoys people that dogs bark.
	Why she told him is unclear.
	It is unclear why she told him.
	to leave so soon would be inconvenience.
	It would be inconvenience to leave so soon.
	It would be inconvenience for you to leave so soon.
	That the Dalai Lama claims Tibet independence discomfits the Chinese government.
	It discomfits the Chinese government that the Dalai Lama claims Tibet independence.
	I believe the problem to be obvious.
*	I believe that the problem is not easy to be obvious.
	I believe it to be obvious that the problem is not easy.
	I do not think it unreasonable to ask for the return of my subscription.
	He made it clear he would continue to co-operate with the United Nations.
	They’re not finding it a stress being in the same office.
	That you came early surprised me.
	It surprised me that you came early.
*	Surprised me that you came early.
	It surprised me that you came early.
	That Chris knew the answer occurred to Pat.
	It occurred to Pat that Chris knew the answer.
	It really freaks me out that we invaded Iraq.
	It really freaks me out that we invaded Iraq.
	That we invaded Iraq really weirds me out.
	That we invaded Iraq really freaks me out.
	It really bites that we invaded Iraq.
	That we invaded Iraq really bites.
	Fido’s barking annoys me.
	That Fido barks annoys me.
	It annoys me that Fido barks.
	A man came into the room that no one knew.
	A man came into the room with blond hair.
	I read a book during the vacation which was written by Chomsky.
	Ray found the outcome frustrating.
	Ray found it frustrating that his policies made little impact on poverty.
*	I made to settle the matter my objective.
	I made it my objective to settle the matter.
	I made the settlement of the matter my objective.
*	I owe that the jury acquitted me to you.
	I owe it to you that the jury acquitted me.
	I owe my acquittal to you.
	I believe strongly that the world is round.
*	I believe that the world is round strongly.
	It’s their teaching material that we’re using.
	What we’re using is their teaching material.
	Their teaching material is what we are using.
	We are using their teaching material.
	I share your view but I just wonder why you think that’s good.
	It was the man that bought the articles from him.
	It was AdvP then that he felt a sharp pain.
	It was to the student that the teacher gave the best advice.
	It was not until I was perhaps twenty-five or thirty that I read and enjoyed them.
*	It was to finish the homework that John tried.
*	It is fond of Bill that John seems to be.
*	It is that Bill is honest that John believes.
	It’s the second Monday that we get back from Easter holiday.
	It was the girl who kicked the ball.
	It’s mainly his attitude which convinced the teacher.
	What you want is a little greenhouse.
	What’s actually happening in London at the moment is immensely exciting.
	What is to come is in this document.
	What I’ve always tended to do is to do my own stretches at home.
	What I meant was that you have done it really well.
	What you do is wear it like that.
	What happened is they caught her without a license.
	What the gentleman seemed to be asking is how policy would have differed.
	That is what they’re trying to do.
	Insensitive is how I would describe him.
	In the early morning is when I do my best research.
*	Wear it like that is what you do.
*	They caught her without a license is what happened.
*	That you have done it really well is what I meant.
	That’s when I read.
	That was why she looked so nice.
	That’s how they do it.
	That’s who I played with over Christmas.
*	That was which I decided to buy.
	What you heard was an explosion.
	It was an explosion, what you heard.
	It was an explosion that you heard.
	What you should do is order one first.
*	It is order one first that you should do first.
*	Order one first is what you should do.
	It was not until I was perhaps twenty-five or thirty that I read them and enjoyed them.
*	When I read them and enjoyed them was not until I was perhaps twenty-five.
*	Not until I was perhaps twenty-five was when I read them and enjoyed them.
	It’s the writer that gets you so involved.
*	That gets you so involved is the writer.
*	The writer is that gets you so involved.
	And it was this matter on which I consulted with the chairman of the Select Committee.
*	On which I consulted with the chairman of the Select Committee was this matter.
*	This matter was on which I consulted with the chairman of the Select Committee.
	What I ate is an apple.
	What we are using is their teaching material.
	The student who got A in the class was very happy.
	The one who broke the window was Mr. Kim.
	He got what he wanted.
	He put the money where Lee told him to put it.
	The concert started when the bell rang.
*	Lee wants to meet who Kim hired.
*	Lee bought which car Kim wanted to sell to him.
*	Lee solved the puzzle how Kim solved it.
*	Who achieved the best result was Angela.
*	Which book he read the book was that one.
	I ate what John ate.
	I ate an apple.
*	To whom I gave the cake is John.
*	That brought the letter is Bill.
	This is how he did it.
	This is why he came early.
	Type A: It is on Bill that John relies.
	Type B: It is Bill on whom John relies.
	It was then when we all went to bed.
	It was only gradually that I came to realize how stupid I was.
	It is John that we are looking for.
*	John that we are looking for showed up.
	It’s the second Monday that we get back from Easter.
	It was the peasant girl who got it.
	It was in 1997 when the IN introduced the alien registration receipt card.
	It is Uncle John whose address I lost.
*	It is Kim on whom that Sandy relies.
*	It is Kim on whom Sandy relies on.
*	It is Kim whom Sandy relies.
	It was the director that she wants to meet.
	It was the director that she said she wants to meet.
	It was the director that I think she said she wants to meet.
	I wonder who it was who saw you.
	I wonder who it was you saw.
	I wonder in which pocket it was that Kim had hidden the jewels.
	Who do you think it is that Mary met?
*	To whom do you think it is the book that Mary gave?
	It is difficult for me to concentrate on calculus.
	For me to concentrate on calculus is difficult.
	Calculus is difficult for me to concentrate on.
	This problem will be difficult for the students to solve.
	Being lovely to look at has its advantages.
	This toy isn’t easy to try to hand to the baby.
	That kind of person is hard to find anyone to look after.
	Letters to Grandma are easy to help the children to write.
	It was to Boston that they decided to take the patient.
	It was with a great deal of regret that I vetoed your proposal.
	It was Tom who spilled beer on this couch.
	It is Martha whose work critics will praise.
	It was John on whom the sheriff placed the blame.
	I wondered who it was you saw.
	I was wondering in which pocket it was that Kim had hidden the jewels.
*	It is Kim on whom that Sandy relies.
*	It is Kim on whom Sandy relies on.
*	It is Kim whom Sandy relies.
*	It is on Kim on whom Sandy relies.
	I wonder who it was who saw you.
	I wonder who it was you saw.
	I wonder in which pocket it was that Kim had hidden the jewels.
	Was it for this that we suffered and toiled?
	Who was it who interviewed you?
	I believe it to be her father who was primarily responsible.
	I believe it to be the switch that is defective.
	Tom ate what Mary offered to him.
	I wonder what Mary offered to him.
	What Mary offered to him is unclear.




REGEXES
^(\(.*\))(.*?)(\n.*)??([\.\?])
^((\(.*\)) |[a-z]\. )+(.*?)(\n)??(.*)??([\.\?])